<?xml version='1.0' encoding='UTF-8'?>
<DOC><DOCNO> FR89418-0028 </DOCNO><DOCID>fr.4-18-89.f2.A1027</DOCID><TEXT><FTAG tagnum="4701"/><ITAG tagnum="90"><T4>Federal Register</T4> / Vol. 54, No. 73 / Tuesday, April 18, 1989 /Proposed Rules <ITAG tagnum="52">DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH AND HUMAN SERVICES </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="18">Family Support Administration</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="56">45 CFR Parts 205, 224, 233, 234, 238, 239, 240, 250, 255 and 256</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="91">RIN: 0970-AA68</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="56">Aid to Families With Dependent Children; Job Opportunities and BasicSkills Training (JOBS) Program, Child Care and Supportive Services, andConforming Changes to Existing Regulations </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>AGENCY: </T2>Family Support Administration (FSA), HHS.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>ACTION: </T2>Proposed rule. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>SUMMARY: </T2>This proposed rule implements title II of the FamilySupport Act of 1988 (the Statute), Pub. L. 100-485, which creates the JobOpportunities and Basic Skills Training (JOBS) Program for recipients ofAid to Families with Dependent Children (AFDC). The JOBS program is designedto assist recipients to become self-sufficient by providing needed employment-relatedactivities and support services. This proposed rule also implements sections 301 and 302 of the Statute.Section 301 guarantees child care and other supportive services for JOBSparticipants, recipients in other approved educational and training activities,and those who are working. Section 302 guarantees child care for twelvemonths for certain individuals who have lost AFDC eligibility due to increasedearnings, increased hours of work, or loss of the earned income disregard.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>DATES: </T2>Interested persons and agencies are invited to submit writtencomments concerning these regulations no later than June 19, 1989.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>ADDRESSES: </T2>Comments should be submitted in writing to the AssistantSecretary for Family Support, Attention: Mark Ragan, OFA/WRTG, Fifth Floor370 L'Enfant Promenade, SW., Washington, DC 20447, or delivered to theFamily Support Administration, Office of Family Assistance, Fifth Floor,370 L'Enfant Promenade, SW., Washington, DC 20447 between 8:00 a.m. and4:30 p.m. on regular business days. Comments received may be inspectedduring the same hours by making arrangements with the contact person shownbelow.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>FOR FURTHER INFORMATION CONTACT: </T2>Mark Ragan, Family Support Administration,Office of Family Assistance, Fifth Floor, 370 L'Enfant Promenade, SW.,Washington, DC 20447, telephone (202) 252-5137.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>SUPPLEMENTARY INFORMATION: </T2><ITAG tagnum="84">Background </ITAG>Studies indicate that the average length of time an AFDC family receivesassistance is about 2 years. Included in that average are many familieswho remain on assistance for a protracted period of time. Often, the parent(or parents) in these families lacks the necessary skills or basic educationto find employment and become self-sufficient. In many cases, the parentbegan to receive assistance as a teenager, never finished high school,and has never developed the skills needed to find and keep employment.Current Federal law and implementing regulations provide for a number ofwork and training programs for AFDC recipients_the Work Incentive (WIN)program, the Work Incentive Demonstration (WIN Demo) program, the communitywork experience program (CWEP), the job search program, and the work supplementationprogram. However, since most of these work programs are optional, and Statesupport for the programs have varied, implementation of work and trainingprograms has been uneven among the States. A number of studies of possiblefactors fostering welfare dependence cite the need for reliable and affordablechild care in order to obtain and maintain employment. Lack of other supportservices, such as transportation, has also been mentioned as hinderingemployment. On October 13, 1988, the President signed the Family Support Act (the Statute),Pub. L. 100-485. Title II of the Statute establishes the Job Opportunitiesand Basic Skills Training (JOBS) program under title IV-F of the SocialSecurity Act (the Act). The purpose of JOBS is to assure that needy familieswith children obtain the education, training, and employment that willhelp them avoid long-term welfare dependence. Title III provides childcare and other services in support of employment and education and trainingactivities. Because the Statute affects programs administered by a number of Departments,we have actively sought suggestions and comments from the Departments ofEducation, Interior, and Labor. We have also considered letters receivedin the mail and comments at numerous meetings held with representativesof State IV-A agencies, Indian Tribes, welfare rights organizations, andother interested parties.<ITAG tagnum="84">Discussion of the Proposed Regulations </ITAG>This discussion is divided into three parts. The first addresses all aspectsof the JOBS program; the second addresses provisions regarding child careand certain other supportive services; and the third part describes changesto the existing regulations in the title IV-A program. The changes areeffective July 1, 1989, or a subsequent date, as determined by each State,but must be implemented by October 1, 1990, unless otherwise specified.Provisions contained in title II of the Statute regarding workers' issues,such as working conditions, tort claims protection, workers' compensation,and displacement are included in a separate regulatory package developedjointly by the Department of Health and Human Services and the Departmentof Labor. Likewise, several related amendments affecting the AFDC programcontained in the Statute, as well as changes to the title IV-D program,are included in separate regulations packages. Section 303, which providesfor the extension of Medical Assistance under title XIX of the Social SecurityAct when a family loses AFDC eligibility, will be implemented under separateregulations to be published by the Health Care Financing Administration.JOBS Pub. L. 100-485 requires State IV-A agencies to have a JOBS program undera plan approved by the Secretary of HHS no later than October 1, 1990,or, at State option, as early as July 1, 1989. It further requires eachState IV-A agency to make the program available in each subdivision ofthe State where it is feasible to do so by October 1, 1992. At least every2 years, the State IV-A agency must review and update its JOBS plan andsubmit the updated plan to the Secretary for approval. Section 201(b) of the Statute (which adds section 482(a)(1)(D)(i) to theAct) provides for the repeal of the current WIN and WIN Demonstration programsupon State implementation of the JOBS program, which may be no later thanOctober 1, 1990. JOBS program authority will be under the new title IV-Fof the Act. Child Care and other Supportive Services Under the Statute, at the time that a State IV-A agency implements theJOBS program, the State IV-A agency must provide funding for child care,or provide child care, if the State IV-A agency determines such are necessaryto enable participation in JOBS or to participate in an approved educationor training program. It also requires that participants be assisted withtransportation and other work-related expenses. Under section 302, effectiveApril 1, 1990, twelve months of child care (transitional child care) isguaranteed for former recipients who were receiving AFDC in 3 of the 6months prior to the loss of AFDC as the result of increased hours of work,increased earnings, or the loss of the earned income disregards. Childcare fees (to partially offset the costs) must be charged on a slidingscale based on family income and size. The transitional child care provisionis in effect until September 30, 1998. Technical and Conforming Amendments Section 202 of the Statute amends certain sections of title IV-A of theAct and repeals title IV-C. These changes are necessitated by the creationof the JOBS program and the close-out of the WIN and WIN Demo programs.They include, among others, the repeal of the community work experience,employment search and work supplementation programs as of October 1, 1990,unless the State IV-A agency is operating under an approved JOBS plan priorto that date.<ITAG tagnum="84">Regulatory Procedures </ITAG>Executive Order 12291 Executive Order 12291 requires that a regulatory impact analysis be performedfor any ``major rule.'' A major rule is one that:<ITAG tagnum="16">_Has an annual effect on the national economy of $100 million or more;</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="16">_Results in a major increase in costs or prices for consumers, anyindustries, any government agencies, or any geographic region; </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="16">_Has significant adverse effects on competition, employment, investment,productivity, innovation, or on the ability of United States-based enterprisesto compete with foreign-based enterprises in domestic or export markets.</ITAG>The increased expenditures authorized for JOBS and child care and othersupportive services under the Statute are expected to have an annual effecton the national economy of over $100 million in each of the first fiveyears of operation. The calculations for expenditures under the Statuteare based on the anticipation of increased expenditures in work, trainingand education programs, and related supportive services (particularly childcare), which will be partially offset by payment of child care fees byparents as well as reduced welfare costs in the long run. It is envisionedthat required funding levels will decrease over time as a result of theimpact of the JOBS program on long-term dependency and the number of familieson AFDC. We have determined that any economic impact in excess of $100 million peryear is the result of section 201 of Pub. L. 100-485 (the Statute). Theimplementing regulations will not significantly affect expenditures. Forthis reason, an extensive analysis of the economic impact of this ruleis not required. There may be increased administrative costs for State IV-A agencies dueto the expansion of work programs and related support services. While aportion of these costs is reimbursable, they are not mandated by theserules. State IV-A agency decisions concerning work programs and supportservices will affect administrative costs. Some increase in costs may benecessary because the Statute requires a minimum number of programs. There is no evidence that competition, employment, investment, productivity,innovation or the United States' competitiveness will be affected adversely,as a result of this rule. Paperwork Reduction Act Certain sections of these proposed regulations contain information collectionrequirements which are subject to review and approval by the Office ofManagement and Budget under the Paperwork Reduction Act of 1980. The Departmentwill submit these requirements to the Office of Management and Budget forits review and approval. Other organizations and individuals desiring tosubmit comments on the information collection requirements are requestedto send them to the agency official designated for this purpose whose nameappears in this preamble, and to the Office of Information and RegulatoryAffairs, OMB, New Executive Office Building_Room 3208, Washington, DC 20502,ATTENTION: Desk Officer for the Office of the Assistant Secretary for FamilySupport, Department of Health and Human Services. Regulatory Flexibility Act The Secretary certifies, under 5 U.S.C. 605(b), enacted by Pub. L. 96-354,the Regulatory Flexibility Act, that this regulation, if promulgated, willnot result in a significant impact on a substantial number of small entitiesbecause it primarily affects State governments and individuals. Certainsmall entities, such as providers of child care services, could receivea positive benefit from this program, but regulatory flexibility analysesare required for adverse impacts only. Therefore, a regulatory flexibility analysis as provided in Pub. L. 96-354,the Regulatory Flexibility Act, is not required. This regulation is issuedunder the authority of section 1102 of the Social Security Act.Federalism and Family Effects We certify that this action has been assessed using the criteria and principlesset forth in Executive Orders 12606 and 12612. Analysis Required by Executive Order 12612 on Federalism If a policy leads to Federal control over traditional State responsibilitiesor decreases the ability of States to make policy decisions with respectto its own functions, that policy is determined to have a significant federalismeffect. The Statute requires that all State IV-A agencies  implement a JOBS programby October 1, 1990. In addressing the problems of welfare dependency, whichare national in scope, the Statute mandates certain JOBS activities, andrequires State IV-A agencies to choose to implement two of four optionalprogram activities (job search, on-the-job training, work supplementation,and community work experience programs). Previously, State IV-A agencies were required to participate in a WorkIncentive (WIN) or WIN Demonstration program and could opt to provide otherwork programs. Under the work program option, the State IV-A agency chosewhich type of work programs to implement. The Family Support Act is more specific than prior work program authoritiesregarding the activities which may be offered by State IV-A agencies andthe population they are to serve under the various program authorities.However, within these limitations, the proposed rules are drafted to allowthe State IV-A agencies considerable flexibility in the design and operationof their JOBS program. Moreover, title II of the Statute provides authorityto Indian Tribes to operate autonomous programs. HHS has consulted with State IV-A Directors, other State, County, Tribaland local representatives, as well as  welfare rights advocacy groups,labor unions, and similar organizations for their comments and suggestionsin those areas of the program where options are available such as assessment,educational activities, and maintenance of effort. These proposed regulationsreflect the consideration of those comments and suggestions. The Statute mandates Federal support and technical assistance from theDepartments of Health and Human Services and Labor in enhancing the flexibilityand information resources of each State. Federal assistance is also requiredto be available to State IV-A agencies upon request for program assessmentand to ensure that State IV-A agencies have adequate information both tocarry out the program and to develop programs specifically fashioned fortheir individual demographic requirements. The Statute calls for the development of performance standards by October13, 1991. The Department is directed to do so in consultation with theSecretary of Labor, Governors, State and local program administrators,community-based organizations, and similar groups. This permits participationby States through the entire development process. In its rulemaking, theDepartment has made a conscious effort to refrain from prematurely establishingstandards but proposes, based on section 606  of the Statute, to establishcertain uniform reporting requirements. We expect no State laws to be preempted.Analysis Required by Executive Order 12606 on the Family The JOBS program is expected to have an overall beneficial family impact.This analysis discusses this impact in terms of the criteria in the ExecutiveOrder. (a) The objectives of the JOBS program, to provide training, education,job placement, and employment to end welfare dependency, will result inmore secure and stable family units. For two-parent families, the Statuteprovides State options for spousal participation, thus enlisting both parentsin the drive toward independence. The potential danger to family self-image,stability and marital commitment posed by welfare dependency increasesas a family remains on welfare. The decrease in dependency and increasein self-sufficiency which the Statute is designed to achieve will helpstrengthen families and ameliorate the erosive effects of poverty. (b) The Statute provides significant support for the nurture and supervisionof children in the form of guaranteed child care, which will enable parentsto work to achieve self-sufficiency and increase their earnings. Parents will continue to have supervision of their children as they wouldhave in any working family, with options for choosing sources of childcare. Federal financial support for child care services in no way changesthe nature of that care, which may continue to be provided by siblings,relatives, friends and neighbors without State intrusion, except insofaras States and localities have already chosen or may in the future chooseto regulate or license family day care providers. Some families may feel that their control over their own destiny is diminishedby mandatory requirements established by Congress to continue their educationor seek employment while placing their children in child care. This istrue in a limited sense, but it represents a positive compromise by a familyin which a tradeoff is made between immediate autonomy and a better futurethrough cooperation with the requirements under the JOBS program. (c) The JOBS program does not substitute governmental activity for anyof the functions of the family. It will help the family perform its nurturingfunctions. It will also provide support while the family attains economicindependence. (d) The JOBS program is specifically directed at increasing family earnings.Enhanced earned income disregards, support services, transitional childcare and other benefits lasting beyond the period of AFDC eligibility willguarantee that earnings are not wholly offset by reductions of grants orloss of associated benefits. (e) The JOBS options and services are to be designed and delivered by thenon-Federal levels of government, i.e., States, localities, and IndianTribes. The Federal government will not intrude upon family autonomy ordecisions. (f) The provisions in the Statute regarding the JOBS training program andthe related child care and other supportive services emphasize that a strongfamily structure is critical for the nation's economic strength, and isan important source of values that promote the work ethic. Targeting familiesin economic crisis with support services and active help towards gaining(or regaining) strength and self-sufficiency, sends the message that alllevels of government are getting involved in assisting families. (g) Finally, the emphasis on achievement in the JOBS program should sendthe right message to young people about the rewards of self-reliance andthe direct connection between responsible behavior and their own economicsuccess. Objectives of the Family Support Act and These Regulations The Family Support Act embodies a new consensus that the well-being ofchildren depends not only on meeting their material needs, but also onthe parent's ability to become economically self-sufficient. The Statuteassumes that self-sufficiency and family responsibility are necessary andachievable goals and makes education, training, and child care availableto allow individuals to reach that goal. The Statute further recognizesthe mutual obligations of parents, who are currently dependent, to worktoward self-sufficiency through private employment, and of the governmentto support that effort. These proposed regulations have been drafted to implement the objectivesof the Statute and of the Administration of President Bush. Several keyprinciples have guided their development:<ITAG tagnum="16">_That the value of the Aid to Families with Dependent Children programshould be measured not just by its ability to meet the income needs ofindividuals served, but also by its ability to help these individuals achieveindependence; </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="16">_That parents have the primary responsibility for the support andwelfare of their children and that programs should be designed to helpparents meet these responsibilities; </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="16">_That women and their children represent the overwhelming proportionof AFDC recipients; that within this group the most dependent are never-marriedmothers who did not complete high school and who had their first childat a young age; and that programs designed to reduce overall dependencymust necessarily address this group; </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="16">_That consistent with individual responsibility is choice, and thatparents be given a wide range of options for child care while participatingin the program; </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="16">_That basic education (such as literacy and high-school equivalency)is one of the most important tools an individual needs to achieve fullcitizenship and independence, and that this should be an important JOBScomponent; </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="16">_That basic skills training can be an important element in an individual'sreaching self-sufficiency; </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="16">_That JOBS programs be designed to prepare participants for privateemployment in jobs they can realistically be expected to obtain; </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="16">_That resources be maximized through the coordination of existingprograms at all levels of government and in concert with community-basedvolunteer and business organizations; and </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="16">_That States be given maximum flexibility to design program componentswithin the JOBS provisions of the Statute in order to tailor programs tomeet local needs. </ITAG>In the sections below, we discuss our overall plan for program implementation,and provide in-depth discussions of each section of the proposed regulations.In these discussions, we refer to the Family Support Act of 1988 as ``theStatute'', and the Social Security Act as ``the Act''. We also use thepronoun ``she'' when referring to applicants, recipients, and participants.Unless otherwise specified, ``she'' is a generic term meaning both sheand he. This choice of terminology is appropriate because the great majorityof adult caretakers in the AFDC program are women.Overview of JOBS Program Implementation Section 204 of the Family Support Act of 1988 permits State IV-A agenciesto implement a JOBS program as of July 1, 1989, regardless of the publicationof implementing regulations. Many States intend to do so. As a consequence,we provided instructions to States in January of 1989 (FSA-IM-89-3). ThisInformation Memorandum described the process for submitting JOBS and SupportiveServices plans to the Department for review until final regulations arepublished. The more detailed requirements proposed in this Notice of Proposed Rulemakingwill only be effective upon publication of the final rule. The processand guidelines described in FSA-IM-89-3 continue to apply until the finalrule is published. We expect to provide preprints for JOBS and Supportive Services plans simultaneouslywith or immediately following publication of the final regulations. Thesepreprints will contain a detailed description of the design and operationof States' JOBS programs and associated supportive services. For the purposes of the following discussion, we use the terms ``interimplans'' and ``initial plans''. Interim plans are plans submitted by a StateIV-A agency in a format other than the preprints for JOBS and SupportiveServices plans. Initial plans are the first plans submitted by a StateIV-A agency, and can be either an interim plan or a preprinted plan, dependingon when the plans are submitted. State IV-A agencies must submit initialJOBS and Supportive Services plans 45 days before planned implementation.When the plan preprint is made available, States which are operating aJOBS program under interim plans will be given 60 days to resubmit plansin the required format. Federal financial participation (FFP) will not be available for expendituresincurred before the date that initial JOBS and Supportive Services plansare approved. More information regarding this issue, as well as the proposedState JOBS and Supportive Services plan review process, is provided below.The preamble discussion generally follows the sequence of the proposedrules, with the exception that the description of conforming changes tothe existing regulations is last, whereas the conforming changes precedethe JOBS and Supportive Services sections in the proposed regulations.<ITAG tagnum="84">Part 250_Job Opportunities and Basic Skills Training Program </ITAG>Subpart A_Purpose and Definitions <ITAG tagnum="81">Purpose (andSection; 250.0 of the Proposed Regulations) </ITAG>This section of the proposed regulations contains the goals of the JOBSprogram and the regulatory objectives of Part 250.<ITAG tagnum="81">Definitions (andSection; 250.1 of the Proposed Regulations) </ITAG>We propose to include a number of definitions in order to facilitate understandingof the regulations. These definitions are discussed below. <T3>Terms Related to the JOBS Program.</T3> The term ``adult recipient''is defined in accordance with section 403(k)(4) of the Social SecurityAct. The term ``caretaker relative'' is used in several places in the Act.However, we have not provided a definition in this regulation. Traditionally,States have established procedures for determining who the caretaker relativeis for each assistance unit, and we intend to continue this practice. Theterm ``target population'' is defined to meet the requirements of sections403(l)(2)(B) and 403(l)(2)(C) of the Act. The definition includes provisionfor any State to adjust the particular target populations if it satisfactorilyjustifies the change to the Secretary. For purposes of convenient reference in the body of the regulation, wedefine a number of words and acronyms. These include standard referencessuch as ``Secretary'' and ``Department''; thus, any reference to the Departmentsof, or the Secretaries of, Education, Interior, or Labor is made specific.We define ``component'' as including all services and activities that aState may make available under andSection;andSection; 250.44 through 250.48.We define a number of acronyms common to work and welfare programs, suchas ``CWEP,'' ``OJT,'' and ``UP.'' We include ``FFP'' for Federal financialparticipation. We include a definition of ``MSA'' since we propose theuse of defined Metropolitan Statistical Areas in assessing issues relatedto statewideness requirements in the legislation. We add several acronymsthat are specific to JOBS, such as the ``JOBS'' acronym itself, and ``JAS''as the reference for the JOBS Automated System for recordkeeping and reportingpurposes. <T3>Terms Related to Educational Programs, Services or Activities.</T3>The Family Support Act provides for extensive educational services, andsets certain requirements, such as that participants make ``satisfactoryprogress'' or be in ``good standing.'' Since the relevant terms are wellunderstood by the Federal and State education establishment, we have definedthese terms in accordance with those understandings. For example, the definitionof the term ``institution of higher education'' derives from the correspondingdefinition of the term found in section 481(a) and section 1201(a) of theHigher Education Act of 1965, as amended (20 U.S.C. 1088 and 1141). The term ``postsecondary education'' is defined to include a program ofpostsecondary instruction in the institutions captured in the definitionof ``institution of higher education,'' and a program of instruction inother institutions referenced by section 435(b) and section 435(c) of theHigher Education Act (20 U.S.C. 1085) as well as in any public institutionsin the State that may not be covered by the Higher Education Act. The definitionof postsecondary education: (1) Allows a State to exercise a wide choiceamong educational activities, (2) includes private postsecondary schoolsamong the institutions that the State might utilize to meet the educationalneeds of JOBS participants, (3) provides the protections concerning educationalquality that are built into the Higher Education Act, and (4) permits Statesto select training from among any public postsecondary institutions thatmight not meet the definitions in the Higher Education Act. We wish to avoid uncertainty in applying the terms found in the HigherEducation Act to the educational activities used in the JOBS program. Therefore,our definitions provide that the State IV-A agency use the determinationsthat are available in the course of the Secretary of Education's processfor certifying institutional eligibility to apply for the Higher EducationAct student financial assistance programs. This provision does not appearto be burdensome, nor is it an unrealistic way of securing a decision regardinga postsecondary institution's compliance with the definition, since weanticipate that welfare recipients who enroll in postsecondary educationor activities will have the benefit of Federal student financial aid, suchas Pell Grants and Guaranteed Student Loans.The definitions of ``limited English proficiency'' and ``basic literacylevel'' are consistent with the manner in which the Department of Education'sOffice of Vocational and Adult Education uses these terms. We propose thatthe objective of ``education to achieve a basic literacy level'' is toprovide an individual with the equivalent of successful completion of eighthgrade. This involves instruction designed for a participant who has minimalcompetence in reading, writing and computation, and therefore is not sufficientlyprepared to meet the educational requirements of everyday life in the UnitedStates. However, this does not mean that a State IV-A agency must provideEnglish as a second language if such instruction would not be necessaryfor an individual to become self-sufficient (e.g., where an employer doesnot require English proficiency.) Since the term ``remedial'' appears within the clause, ``basic and remedialeducation to achieve a basic literacy level,'' in section 482(d)(1)(A)(i)of the Act, we believe that this term refers to repetition of educationpreviously given for the purpose of achieving a ``basic literacy level,''as we have defined that term. We have defined ``basic education'' in andSection;250.44 of these regulations as referring to such education given for thefirst time. We invite comment as to whether this can be expected to bean operationally useful distinction. <T3>Terms Related to Making Good or Satisfactory Progress in EducationalActivities.</T3> Our proposed definition of ``make good progress'' and``making satisfactory progress'' is consistent with the <T3>Federal Student Financial Aid Handbook</T3> of the U.S. Departmentof Education, which is available in most schools and public libraries.The proposed definition would require that a standard include both a qualitativeelement (e.g., grade point average) and a quantitative element (e.g., timelimit for completion of the program or course of study). The proposed rulewould permit the standard to provide that a participant may be consideredto be making  satisfactory progress during a probationary period or dueto mitigating circumstances. Operationally, we propose that an institution's current standard be used,with the mutual agreement of the State IV-A agency and the State educationagency. We see such mutual agreement as serving several purposes. First,we believe the source of the standard should be the institution offeringthe program, because of variances among educational programs. Second, thepractice is compatible with Department of Education student financial assistanceguidelines. Third, State IV-A agencies are required by the Act to permitor support educational activities only if the participant is ``making goodprogress'' and the education relates to the participant's employment goal.The rule would require another source of expertise regarding good or satisfactoryprogress to be taken into account when available. If the school or programattended by the JOBS participant is accredited by an accrediting body thatis listed as recognized by the Secretary of Education and that has an establishedpolicy relating to satisfactory progress, then that policy shall apply.This provision will ensure the compatibility of this aspect of the JOBSprogram with Department of Education policies. In  order to assure thatparticipation in these types of education components is meaningful andproductive, we are considering including time standards where the educationalactivity is not part of an established educational program, such as highschool. Examples are average hours per week or limits on the time periodpermitted to make specified educational gains. Comments are specificallyrequested on the establishment of such limits. The definition of ``make good progress'' and ``making satisfactory progress''contained in the proposed rule will at a minimum apply in two places. First,in section 402(a)(19)(E) of the Social Security Act, a State welfare agencymay require an 18 or 19 year old custodial parent who lacks a high schooldiploma or its equivalent to accept a job or training_instead of enrollingin an educational program leading to a high school diploma or its equivalent_if the participant ``fails to make good progress in successfully completingsuch educational activities.'' Second, in section 402(a)(19)(F) of theAct, a State IV-A agency may accept, as satisfactory participation in theJOBS program, a participant's attendance in good standing in an ``institutionof higher education,'' or in a ``school or course of vocational or technicaltraining,'' if the participant is ``making satisfactory progress.'' We believe that the intent of the Family Support Act in establishing astandard of ``good'' or ``satisfactory'' progress in educational activitiesis to make it clear that an individual may be permitted to obtain educationthat may enhance her ability to become self-sufficient, but that ineffectiveattendance in educational activities will not do so. <T3>Making Good or Satisfactory Progress in Training Programs. </T3>TheFamily Support Act does not include a qualitative measure of making goodor satisfactory progress for training programs under JOBS, such as OJTand skills training. However, after consultation with the Department ofLabor, we propose to expand the definition of making good or satisfactoryprogress to apply to OJT and skills training. We do so to assure that trainingoffered through JOBS results in an increase in participants' skills andcompetencies, and that such progress be monitored by the State IV-A agency.Operationally, this will require that qualitative measures be developed.If such measures already exist for a training program, then they can beapplied with the agreement of the State IV-A agency. If they do not exist,the State IV-A agency will be required to develop appropriate measuresas a condition of including such training in a JOBS component. We proposeto allow State flexibility in defining measures of good or satisfactoryprogress because there will be a great deal of variation in the types oftraining programs which States will choose to offer. However, we stronglyurge the State IV-A agency to consult with the appropriate State employmentand training agency in developing such measures. The measure of good or satisfactory progress should be used by the StateIV-A agency to determine whether a participant should continue in a courseof training and whether to continue to provide supportive services, pursuantto andSection; 255.2 of the proposed rule. We considered whether to apply the concept of making satisfactory progressin measuring participation rates for OJT and skills training. We did includequalitative measures in the standard for participation rates for educationalcomponents because such standards have common meanings that are generallyunderstood and used by educational institutions. However, we are concernedthat including such measures in training components for purposes of theparticipation standards could discourage States from setting meaningfulstandards, if such standards would affect their ability to meet the participationrates. We also considered precluding FFP for the costs of training activitiesfor individuals not making good or satisfactory progress. However, we areconcerned that this might discourage States from including training componentsin their JOBS programs. Because we believe that qualitative measures for training components areimportant for the successful and efficient operation of the JOBS program,we invite comment on the approach we propose. We also invite comments regardingthe alternatives described above, as well as other options. <T3>Terms Related to Participation. </T3>The rule proposes a definitionof ``participation'' that relates only to the question of determining whatminimum activity levels in each component a State may count towards meetingthe participation rate requirements for enhanced Federal matching set outin section 403(1)(3)(A) of the Act. This proposed definition does not precludeFFP for JOBS activities which do not count in determining participationrates. The proposed definition stems from several statements in the conferencereport that participation is intended to be significant. We received requestsfrom numerous States to permit the definitions of participation in eachof the components to be set individually by the States. We did not do sobecause we believe that Congress intended to offer flexibility to the Statesin deciding how to design successful programs, but that the measurementof participation rates be consistent among States.For example, under the proposed rule, an individual would be participatingif: (1) Her specified activity level for work supplementation or OJT isfull-time; (2) her specified activity level is not less than the equivalentof 20 hours per week in job skills training, job readiness activities,CWEP, or group job search; or (3) she is making satisfactory progress inan educational activity. A State IV-A agency may prescribe greater participationrequirements and may count partial participation in several componentswhenever the individual so assigned meets the average hours requirementof the assigned components. We propose a definition of participation for purposes of the UP work requirementthat follows the legislation. A parent's activity level must meet the l6-hourwork requirement in work supplementation, CWEP, OJT, or a State-designedwork program approved by the Secretary. An alternative is provided forparents under age 25 who do not have a high school diploma or its equivalent:In such case the State IV-A agency may require the parent to make satisfactoryprogress towards high school completion, or towards another basic educationobjective. Thus, for a UP parent, it is possible to be participating in any componentat its specified level, and contribute towards the State meeting the overallparticipation requirement. Likewise, such a parent would contribute toboth participation requirements if she is active in one of the four workcomponents at the higher specified levels. However, if the activity wasat least 16 hours per week, but less than the higher specified levels,in any of the four work components, she would only contribute to the UPparticipation requirement. We exclude two principal items from this definition of participation. Anindividual assigned to job development and placement would not count forparticipation, since our proposed definition of this required componentwould make it principally an agency activity rather than a client activity.The rule proposes that individuals whose only active involvement in JOBSis assessment or orientation, or receiving supportive services, would notcount as participating for this purpose.Our proposed definition of participation, required for purposes of andSection;250.74, is not meant to preclude a State from assigning an individual toan amount of required activity in a component that is less than the specifiedminimum if it is appropriate for the individual. For example, an individualmight be required to be engaged in ten hours of individual job search perweek. This level of activity would satisfy the requirements of the individual'semployability plan but would not meet the minimum Federal definition ofparticipation (for purposes of the participation rate requirement). In addition, we believe that States should apply a qualitative measurein determining an individual's progress in a training component. We thereforepropose that in measuring progress in reaching the goals set in an individual'semployability plan, the State IV-A agency must incorporate qualitativemeasures for training components. We considered how to treat sanctioned individuals in determining a State'sparticipation rate. One suggestion was that they be counted as participants,since the State IV-A agency had taken all steps necessary to encourageself-sufficiency. However, it is possible that such a policy could be viewedas an incentive for States to sanction individuals and to extend sanctions.Another suggestion was that sanctioned individuals be excluded from thedenominator used in calculating participation rates. We chose this optionsince it protected States from being penalized when they took appropriateactions to sanction recipients, but it does not treat sanctioning as comparableto actual participation. We welcome comments on this approach.The rule provides a definition of ``intensive job search,'' for the purposeof calculating participation rates for the Unemployed Parent work requirement,that conforms to the standards for participation in individual job search. We also considered and discussed with States the option of determiningparticipation rates based on an average of the number of hours of participationby all recipients. However, this option was rejected because of State concernsabout the administrative burden of this approach. We would welcome anyadditional comments on this approach and any other methods for determiningparticipation standards. Subpart B-Administration <ITAG tagnum="81">State IV-A Agency Administration (andSection; 250.10 of the ProposedRegulations) </ITAG>Section 482(a)(2) of the Social Security Act identifies the State IV-Aagency as the State agency responsible for the administration or supervisionof the JOBS program. Similar provisions apply to the AFDC and Adult Assistanceprograms (see sections 2(a)(3), 402(a)(3), 1002(a)(3), 1402(a)(3), and1602(a)(3) (Aid to Aged, Blind, and Disabled) of the Social Security Act).Longstanding Federal policy construing these latter requirements has interpretedthem to mean that the State IV-A agency must maintain overall responsibilityfor the design and operation of the program and may not delegate to otherthan its own officials functions involving discretion in the administrationor supervision of the program (see andSection; 205.100). Accordingly, webelieve that the same policy should apply to the State IV-A agency in itsadministration or supervision of the JOBS program. This means that theState IV-A agency may not delegate the entire JOBS program to another entity.However, it does permit the State IV-A agency broad contracting authorityas described in proposed andSection; 250.13 and related preamble. For example,the State IV-A agency may delegate a wide range of activities_such as orientation,literacy testing, and JOBS activities and services. However, it may notdelegate functions such as exemption and priority determinations or disputeresolution and hearings since these involve discretionary judgments. We believe that State IV-A agencies should have maximum flexibility toadminister their programs within the requirements of the Act. We recognizethat in many States, other agencies_such as Job Training Partnership Act(JTPA) agencies, the State education agency, the State employment securityagency and community-based organizations_have been effectively performinga range of educational, training and employment related functions for welfarerecipients. Thus, rather than requiring State IV-A agencies to train orexpand in-house staff to perform similar JOBS functions which do not directlyinvolve discretionary judgments, we propose to provide State IV-A agenciesthe flexibility of determining how they can most effectively use all potentialState resources. However, before a State IV-A agency contracts for anyJOBS service or activity, it must ensure that such service or activityis not otherwise available to JOBS participants on a non-reimbursable basis.This requirement is discussed in detail in proposed andSection; 250.13 andrelated preamble on contracting and in proposed andSection; 250.72 and relatedpreamble concerning maintenance of effort provisions. We do not intend either to encourage or discourage State IV-A agenciesfrom contracting out JOBS functions, but propose to provide State IV-Aagencies with the latitude to determine how best to administer their programs.No matter how extensively a State IV-A agency uses its contracting authority,the entity to which a function is delegated must follow the policies, rules,and regulations issued by the State IV-A agency and must not be empoweredto review, change, or disapprove any administrative decision of the StateIV-A agency.<ITAG tagnum="81">Requirement for a Statewide Program (andSection; 250.11 of the ProposedRegulations) </ITAG>Section 482(a)(1)(D) of the Social Security Act requires that by no laterthan October 1, 1992, a State IV-A agency must make the JOBS program availablein each subdivision of the State where it is feasible to do so, takinginto account the number of prospective participants, the local economy,and other relevant factors. If the State IV-A agency determines that theprogram will not be made available in all political subdivisions, it mustprovide appropriate justification to the Secretary in its JOBS plan. Ifthe justification is not adequate, the Secretary may disapprove the plan.It is expected that the State IV-A agencies will make a serious and determinedeffort to implement programs throughout all local jurisdictions to themaximum extent possible, so that eligible families will have an opportunityto benefit from the new services that are authorized under the legislation.In determining how specific to be in the regulations, we considered thestatements in the Conference Report (H. R. Rep. No. 100-998, 100th Cong.,2d Sess. 112 (1988)). The conferees intended that the program be providedto as many recipients as possible. Specifically, section 482(d)(1)(A)(i)(I)of the Act requires that the State JOBS plan include educational activities,such as high school or equivalent education, and basic literacy and Englishproficiency training. The conferees noted (H. R. Rep. No. 100-998, I00thCong., 2d Sess. 141 (1988)) that there would be those for whom enrollmentin regular school programs would be inappropriate, and consequently suitablealternatives would have to be identified or developed. We believe thatat least some of these educational activities are available in the majorityof political subdivisions in all States, and they, therefore, should bemade available, as appropriate, to AFDC recipients. However, State resources may not permit the inclusion of other components,such as the optional components in section 482(d)(1)(A)(ii) of the Act,in all political subdivisions. To allow maximum State flexibility in designingState JOBS programs, we propose the following. State IV-A agencies will not be required to implement all mandatory andoptional components in all political subdivisions in which they operatea JOBS program. Further, differences in the level of component availabilitywill be permissible. In order to determine whether a State IV-A agency should submit appropriatejustification for less than statewide operation, we propose to apply thecriteria described below. If a State meets these criteria, then no justificationwill be required. First, a ``minimal'' JOBS program should be available to most adult recipientsin a State. A minimal program includes high school or equivalent education,as specified at section 482(d)(1)(A)(i)(I) of the Act, one optional componentfrom among those specified at section 482(d)(1)(A)(ii) of the Act, andinformation and referral to non-JOBS employment services. In determiningstatewideness, we propose that a minimal program be available in a numberof political subdivisions sufficient to serve 95 percent of adult recipients.With few exceptions, high school is available in all political subdivisionsof a State. At least one of the optional components, job search, is relativelyinexpensive to operate. Referral to public employment services is a simplemethod for directing recipients to potential employment. Second, a ``complete'' JOBS program should be available to a large proportionof adult recipients. A complete program includes, but is not limited to,all mandatory and any two optional components, pursuant to section 482(d)(1)(A)of the Act. In determining statewideness, we propose that a complete programbe available in all Metropolitan Statistical Areas (MSAs) in the State,as well as in a number of political subdivisions sufficient to serve 75percent of adult recipients in the State. The use of MSA boundaries is a nationally recognized system for distinguishingamong economically different areas of States. We propose to add the 75percent requirement because the number of adult recipients living in MSAsis relatively low in many rural States. We considered requiring justification for less than statewide program operationin all cases. However, we believe that this would be a great administrativeburden, both for State IV-A agencies and for Federal reviewers. The strategydescribed above is an attempt to meet congressional intent and statutoryrequirements in a practical manner. These criteria should not be consideredto be guidelines for planning a JOBS program. Rather, they provide onlya basis for Federal review of the statewideness requirement. We invitecomments on this strategy.Section 250.11(c) of the proposed rule will provide the basis for our reviewof the statewideness requirement. If a State JOBS program will not be availablein the number of political subdivisions sufficient to meet the criteriaof that section, the justification to the Secretary for excluding any portionof the State from the JOBS program will include the information identifiedin andSection; 250.11(c)(2). The factors listed in this section expand on the items identified in section482(a)(1)(D) of the Act. That section specifies two factors_i.e., the prospectiveparticipants and the local economy. We propose to add one additional item:whether a State IV-A agency will, even with the proposed areas excluded,fully expend all JOBS funds available to it for the period covered by theplan. This additional information will help in determining whether a StateIV-A agency is proposing to concentrate services on specific geographicareas identified as particularly critical to reducing long-term dependency,and as a consequence, is unable to implement a statewide program. We do not believe that depressed local market conditions would necessarilymake a JOBS program infeasible. For example, even in areas of high unemployment,there are generally job opportunities because of job turnover and segmentedjob markets. However, in a rural area where the sole employer has recentlyclosed its plant, a State IV-A agency might be justified in not operatinga JOBS program, or in operating a minimal program. A State IV-A agencyshould consider these types of distinctions, and include this informationin the justification for less than statewide operation. In designing a State JOBS program that will be less than statewide, a Stateshould assure that political subdivisions not be excluded on the basisof ethnic, racial or religious characteristics. Because the statewideness requirement is not effective until October 1,1992, phased implementation of the program will be permitted. As a consequence,an initial State JOBS plan may not reflect a level of component availabilitysufficient to meet the statewideness requirement. We would therefore expectthat, no later than the first biennial review, for the plan period beginningOctober 1, 1992, the State JOBS plan and the State Supportive Servicesplan (pursuant to andSection; 255.1) will be updated to reflect either sufficientprogram availability to meet this requirement, or a justification for lessthan statewide implementation.<ITAG tagnum="81">Coordination and Consultation (andSection; 250.12 of the Proposed Regulations)</ITAG>Section 402(g) and section 483 of the Social Security Act contain a numberof provisions designed to assure coordination of the JOBS program, includingchild care pursuant to andSection; 255.3(h) of the proposed regulations,with other education, training, and employment programs available in aState. The purpose of this coordination is to provide comprehensive, qualityservices to meet the multifaceted needs of welfare recipients in the mosteffective and efficient manner. At the Federal level, the Department is working closely with the Departmentsof Labor, Education, and Interior, and expects State and local IV-A agenciesto promote coordination among their counterpart agencies. The JOBS programshould be coordinated with providers such as Job Training Partnership Act(JTPA) agencies, the Employment Service, vocational education, adult basiceducation, Headstart and preschool programs under chapter I of the Education,Consolidation and Improvement Act of 1981, school and nonprofit child careprograms and other human development programs. Congress intended that agencies identify existing resources to preventduplication of services and to assure that other program services are availableto JOBS participants. Such coordination is necessary to assure that costsfor services for which welfare recipients have been eligible are not shiftedto the JOBS program. The proposed regulations preclude such shifts in costs,as described in the maintenance of effort provisions in andSection; 250.72.Section 483 of the Act requires coordination with JTPA agencies, sinceone of JTPA's major goals is reducing welfare dependency. The JTPA requiresthat AFDC recipients be served in at least equal proportion to their incidencewithin the eligible population. Twenty-three percent of current participantsunder JTPA are AFDC recipients. At the State level, the JOBS plan must be consistent with JTPA coordinationcriteria and must be reviewed by the State job training coordinating council(SJTCC) prior to submission to the Secretary. We strongly encourage theState IV-A agency to meet regularly with the SJTCC regarding the planningand implementation of the JOBS program to identify common JOBS-JTPA activitiesand services, and to develop an integrated strategy which ensures thateligible AFDC recipients receive training and employment services in aneffective, non-duplicative manner. At the local level, the welfare agency must consult with private industrycouncils (PICs) on the development of arrangements and contracts underJOBS and to identify and obtain advice on the types of jobs that are available,or are likely to become available, in the area. These provisions reflectcongressional concern that JOBS resources not be used inefficiently, i.e.,provided to ineffective service providers or expended on training for jobswhich are not available to participants. The local relationship between the welfare agency and the PIC is crucialto assure that welfare recipients receive the JTPA services for which theyare eligible. Thus, we strongly urge local welfare administrators to berepresented on the PIC or, at a minimum, to become actively involved inPIC meetings, as appropriate. Initial and ongoing coordination with the State IV-A agency and local educationalsystems will enable State IV-A agencies to access needed expertise in thisnew area of welfare agency involvement, to avoid duplication of welfareservices and to assure that welfare recipients receive the necessary educationalservices for which they are eligible. Welfare agencies should meet regularlywith their State or local educational counterparts to ensure that educationalproviders are involved in the planning and delivery of the JOBS programat all levels. Section 250.21 of the proposed regulations requires State IV-A agenciesto describe in the JOBS plans efforts to coordinate with JTPA, basic andadult education programs, programs under the Carl D. Perkins VocationalEducation Act and other vocational services, and other human developmentprograms. Furthermore, the proposed regulations in andSection; 250.20 specificallyprovide that State IV-A agencies make the proposed JOBS plan availableto members of federally recognized Indian Tribes and Alaska Native organizationsduring the public comment period. This segment of the population is highlightedessentially to assure that a Tribal entity eligible to operate a separateJOBS program, pursuant to andSection; 250.91 of the regulations, has sufficientopportunity to coordinate with the State in the planning of JOBS. Coordination is necessary whether the Tribe or organization decides tooperate an independent program or receive services from the State, butis particularly important if a Tribal entity does operate a separate program.While a Tribal grantee will have responsibility for JOBS, the State IV-Aagency will maintain responsibility for the basic AFDC program and forchild care services, including transitional child care services. Giventhis interrelationship, andSection;andSection; 250.12 and 250.93(b)(1) of theproposed regulations require that the State IV-A agency and the Tribalapplicant exchange all available information on adult Tribal AFDC recipientsnecessary to determine a Tribe's or organization's JOBS funding level.In addition, the requirements in andSection; 250.94 concerning Tribal JOBSadministration and in andSection; 250.95 regarding child care elaborate onthe need for the State and Tribal grantee to develop mutually agreed uponprocedures and methodologies to assure that Tribal participants receiveequitable treatment under the AFDC and JOBS programs.<ITAG tagnum="81">Contracting Authority (andSection; 250.13 of the Proposed Regulations)</ITAG>Section 485 of the Social Security Act grants State IV-A agencies broadcontracting authority, which is reflected in andSection; 250.13 of the proposedregulations. At the same time, however, the Act requires administrationof the JOBS program by the single State IV-A agency, therefore limitingcontracts to those activities which do not involve discretion. Furtherclarification of this limitation is provided in proposed andSection; 250.10and the accompanying preamble language. Section 250.13 incorporates the requirements of section 485 of the Actregarding the factors which must be taken into consideration in selectingservice providers and the prohibition against contracts for services whichare otherwise available on a non-reimbursable basis. Regarding the issueof provider selection, the requirement for consultation with private industrycouncils is described in the proposed andSection; 250.12 on coordinationand consultation. The statutory prohibition against contracts for serviceswhich would be otherwise available reflects congressional concern thatcosts of services for which welfare recipients have been eligible not beshifted to the JOBS program. Since it is so closely connected to the provisionson maintenance of effort (section 482(a)(3) of the Act), we elaborate onits interpretation in andSection; 250.72 of the proposed regulation and preamble.Before States contract for services under JOBS, we expect that they willcarefully identify those services which have traditionally been availableto welfare recipients at no cost as well as community-based or volunteerprograms that may provide competent services at minimal or no cost. Thestatutory language clearly intends that State IV-A agencies fully utilizeall resources otherwise available to serve JOBS participants on a non-reimbursablebasis. For instance, other programs have paid for many educational servicesprovided to AFDC recipients, including those available under the AdultEducation Act (20 U.S.C. 1201 <T3>et seq.</T3>), the Higher Education Act (20 U.S.C. 2301 <T3>et seq.</T3>) and the Carl D. Perkins Vocational Education Act (20U.S.C. 1001 <T3>et seq.</T3>) Similarly, through JTPA, the State employment securityagency, State employment and training programs and the Community ServicesBlock Grant program, extensive employment and training services_such asjob counseling, job development and placement, job skills training, andon-the-job training_have been offered to eligible low income individuals,many of whom are AFDC recipients.We also have included in this section a provision which specifies thatfor the purposes of FFP, State IV-A agencies must segregate costs accordingto applicable matching rates, as defined at andSection; 250.73(b)(1), inany contract or arrangement under the JOBS program. This means that contractedservices will qualify for Federal matching funds at the same rate as thoseservices which the State IV-A agency provides directly. This provisionis included to assure that State IV-A agency decisions on contracting willbe based upon the efficient administration of the program and that consistentFederal matching will be available to the State IV-A agency regardlessof the method used to provide services. In addition to the specific contracting requirements included in this section,contracted services under JOBS are subject to the requirements of Part92 with the following exception. We propose to exclude the provisions underandSection; 92.30(d)(4). These provisions, which require prior Federal approvalof contracts, appear to be inconsistent with congressional intent sincethey would severely limit a State IV-A agency's contracting authority undersection 485 of the Act. State IV-A agencies should be aware that they are subject to the procurementrequirements of only paragraph (a) of andSection; 92.36. This means thatState IV-A agencies are required to assure that JOBS contracts follow Stateand local laws, regulations, and procedures regarding procurement. IndianTribes and Alaska Native organizations, however, are subject to the Federalprocurement requirements of andSection; 92.36 (b) through (i). This is consistentwith longstanding Federal policy.Subpart C-State Jobs Plan Requirements and Content <ITAG tagnum="81">Requirement for a State JOBS Plan (andSection; 250.20 of the ProposedRegulation) </ITAG>The JOBS provisions are found in title II of the Family Support Act, whichincludes changes to Part A and creates Part F in Title IV of the SocialSecurity Act. State implementation of these provisions will be coveredunder a new State plan for JOBS (the JOBS plan). The requirements for thatplan and the procedures for its submission are discussed below. Title IIIof the Statute also requires that States provide child care and other necessarysupportive services. These services will be covered under a SupportiveServices plan, to be developed and submitted with the JOBS plan. A discussionof the Supportive Services plan and related requirements is at andSection;255.1. We believe that it is appropriate to include the new statutory requirementsin section 402(a)(19) of the Social Security Act as well as all requirementsof Title IV-F in a separate JOBS plan. This position is supported by thelanguage of section 482(a)(1)(A) of the Social Security Act, which requiresthe JOBS plan to meet ``all of the requirements of this part and section402(a)(19).''  Section 482(a)(2) of the Act provides that the State IV-A agency will beresponsible for the administration or supervision of the State's JOBS program.Based on this provision, we propose that the State IV-A agency be responsiblefor the submission of the State JOBS and Supportive Service plans, aftercompletion of all coordination requirements and review by the Governor.<T3>Plan Approval Prior to Implementation.</T3> In FSA-IM-89-3 (``PreliminaryInformation for States Interested in Implementing JOBS * * *'', January19, 1989) as well as in andSection; 250.20(a)(2) of these proposed rules,we request that States submit the initial JOBS and Supportive Servicesplans for approval 45 days prior to implementation. The Family Support Act does not directly address the question of whethera State's JOBS plan must be submitted and approved prior to a State's implementationof the program. However, the statutory language best supports the positionthat the JOBS plan should be approved prior to a State's implementation.In several places the Statute references JOBS programs operated and fundedunder approved plans; the implication is that programs could not be  operatedand funded unless a JOBS plan had been approved. Specifically, the statutorylanguage includes the following: (1) Section 482(a)(1)(A) of the SocialSecurity Act states, ``As a condition of its participation in the programof aid to families with dependent children under Part A, each State shallestablish and operate a job opportunities and basic skills training program* * * under a plan <T3>approved by the Secretary * * * '';</T3> (2) Section 403(k)(1) providesthat ``Each State <T3>with a plan approved under Part F</T3> shall be entitled to payments* * * ''; and (3) Section 403(l)(1)(A) provides, ``In lieu of any paymentunder subsection (a), the Secretary shall pay to each State <T3>with a plan approved under section 482(a)</T3> * * * .'' (emphasisadded). <T3>Submission of Initial JOBS Plans 45 Days Before Anticipated Implementation.</T3>This timeframe is not found in the Family Support Act. In andSection; 250.20(e)(1)we propose a 90-day period for Federal review of the biennial update ofJOBS plans. We are proposing a 45-day period for the initial submissionin recognition of the fact that many States intend to implement JOBS inthe earliest possible quarter, and there will be fewer Federal requirementssince final rules will not have been published. Under the circumstanceswe believe this will provide a reasonable period of time  within whichto conduct an orderly and responsible review of a State's submission. <T3>Interim Plans.</T3> Initial State JOBS and Supportive Service planssubmitted prior to the issuance of plan preprints will be approved as interimplans. States with interim plans will be required to submit new JOBS andSupportive Service plans 60 days after the issuance of a preprint formby the Secretary. An approved interim plan shall remain in force untilaction is taken by the Secretary to approve or disapprove the preprint.Although described as a new plan, the JOBS plan preprint will not be subjectto the requirement for review by the SJTCC before submission to the Secretary,unless substantial changes have been made. In an effort to ease the administrative burden on States and to establisha uniform schedule for submission of subsequent State plans that coincideswith the Federal fiscal year, we propose the following. All plans submittedbetween the issuance of the preprints and October l, 1990, (whether resubmissionof interim plans or initial plans), if approvable, shall remain in forceuntil action is taken by the Secretary to approve or disapprove the firstbiennial update, described below. This timeframe is  appropriate becauseStates are required to have statewide JOBS programs (unless satisfactoryjustification for less than statewide operation has been provided to theSecretary) during the period covered by the first biennial update.<T3>Amendments.</T3> States may submit amendments to approved plans, ifnecessary, prior to the required resubmission described below. The currentprocess for submission and review of amendments, as described at andSection;201.3(f) and andSection; 201.3(g), will apply. Submission of plan amendmentsdoes not relieve the State of the obligation to resubmit its plan to theSecretary for approval every two years. <T3>Resubmission of State Plans: Biennial Update. </T3>Section 482(a)(1)(A)of the Act requires that the State submit its State plan not less oftenthan every two years to the Secretary for approval. We propose to considerthe biennial update a new plan, which must be submitted for approval 90days prior to the date it is to become effective. The biennial update mustbe available for public review and comment in accordance with the provisionsof andSection; 250.20(c). To ease the administrative burden, we propose toestablish October 1, 1992 as the effective date for the first resubmissionof all State plans. Therefore, we propose that all State plans be resubmittedby July 1, 1992 to be effective October 1, 1992. We recognize that this process is very different from existing title IV-Aplan amendment procedures. However, we believe that there are several compellingreasons to treat the biennial update as a new plan for which approval bythe Secretary is required: (1) The specific requirement that it be resubmitted(not less than every two years) distinguishes it from the regular titleIV-A plan amendment process at andSection; 201.3, which requires only thatplan amendments be submitted by the end of the calendar quarter of implementation;(2) the requirements for coordination and consultation, including the requirementthat the State plan be submitted to the SJTCC for review and comment, wouldbe significantly lessened if it were only required once prior to JOBS implementationand never thereafter; and (3) the nature of the information that section482 of the Act requires be in the State plan makes it an ``operationalplan.'' Much of it is specific to the period which the plan covers, suchas the number of persons to be served and the extent to which other serviceswill be available by provider and type of service. Such information mustbe updated for each new period in order to make the plan a useful document.However, we do not propose to put an undue burden on States in the submissionof State plan updates. Therefore, we propose that the State plan updateconsist of four parts: (1) Assurances regarding those parts of the StateJOBS plan and Supportive Services plan that remain unchanged; (2) a descriptionof any changes in program operations, including but not limited to, changesin the mix of components or target populations to be served; (3) specificinformation for the period of the update regarding estimates of personsto be served and the availability of services provided by the State IV-Aagency as well as other providers; and (4) an assurance that the StateJOBS plan is consistent with the coordination criteria specified in thecurrent Governor's Coordination and Special Services Plan required undersection 121 of the JTPA. The State plan preprint shall be the vehicle forthe update. <T3>Public and Inter-Agency Review of State JOBS Plans. </T3>The Act requiresthat the State agency submit its JOBS plan to the State Job Training CoordinatingCouncil (SJTCC) 60 days before submission to the Secretary. We proposeto expand this requirement in several ways. We propose to require submissionof the proposed plan to the State education agency, based on the extensiverequired and optional education activities under JOBS, and the generalcoordination requirements in section 483 of the Act related to State andlocal education agencies. In accordance with section 483(a)(1) of the Act, we propose to requirethe content of the plan, where it relates to job training and work preparation,to be consistent with the coordination criteria specified in the Governor'scoordination and special services plan required by section 121 of the JobTraining Partnership Act. The Statute also requires that the State JOBS plan be made available forpublic review and comment 60 days prior to submission to the Secretary.In response to the concerns of State IV-A agency directors, we proposethat all public and State agency comments on the plan be resolved at theState level. It was noted that if this were not made clear, the State effortsto resolve disagreements could become a problem, since commenters mightchoose to press their view at the Federal level rather than at the appropriateState level.<ITAG tagnum="81">State Plan Content (andSection; 250.21 of the Proposed Regulation) </ITAG>Proposed andSection; 250.21 lists the information we propose to require inthe JOBS plan. We will provide a preprint similar to the current StreamlinedState Plan for the IV-A program which will elicit all necessary informationin a standardized format. The preprint will guide States in submittingthe JOBS plan, and will expedite review. It will also provide a basis forcomparison of State programs. In andSection; 250.21 of the proposed rule we have listed all informationthat we expect to include in the JOBS plan preprint. This list does notinclude all JOBS program requirements. These other requirements are included,as appropriate, in other sections of the proposed rules. Subpart D_Participation Requirements, Exemptions and Sanctions <ITAG tagnum="81">Requirements for Individual Participation and Exemptions (andSection;250.30 of the Proposed Regulations) </ITAG>Under current law, all applicants for and recipients of AFDC are requiredto register and participate in WIN or WIN Demonstration program activitiesunless they are exempt. For example, an individual is exempt if she isthe parent or other caretaker relative of a child under age 6 and is personallyproviding care for the child with only very brief and infrequent absences.Section 402(a)(19)(C) of the Act provides for exemptions from participationin JOBS that are similar to those that existed under WIN. The exemptionsare contained at andSection; 250.30 and are discussed below. <T3>Child under 16. </T3>A child who is under 16 or is attending full-timean elementary, secondary, vocational or technical school is exempt. However,the exemption does not apply to a custodial parent even if she is alsoa dependent child. We make this interpretation to be consistent with thedefinition of ``adult recipient'' in section 403(k) of the Act which specificallyincludes a child who is the custodial parent of another dependent childin the definition of ``adult recipient'' for the purpose of determininga State's allocation under JOBS. <T3>Advanced Age. </T3>We propose to define ``advanced age'' for the purposesof this exemption to mean over 60 years of age. This is consistent withthe upper age exemption in the Food Stamp Program and should ease the administrativeburden on State agencies. <T3>Remoteness. </T3>Section 402(a)(19)(C)(vii) of the Act also providesan exemption for remoteness. This exemption is for the individual who livesin a political subdivision that has a JOBS program, but who resides sofar away from a JOBS activity that participation is not feasible. <T3>Working more than 30 hours per week. </T3>Section 402(a)(19)(C)(iv)of the Act retains the exemption for working 30 hours or more per week.Currently, under WIN, andSection; 224.20 provides a Federal standard forthis exemption: the job has to be unsubsidized and expected to last atleast 30 days. The Federal standard was designed to insure that the employmentis bona fide and likely to lead to self-sufficiency for the family. However,in consultation with States, we have heard that the Federal definitiondoes not provide States with enough flexibility to require participationby individuals who are working sporadically at very low wages. We, therefore, propose to allow State IV-A agencies to establish theirown standards for the type of ``work'' that qualifies for this exemption.For example, such a standard might require that the job pay at least minimumwage. The standards must be included in the State JOBS plan as providedat andSection; 250.20. <T3>Pregnancy. </T3>Currently, a pregnant woman in her third trimesteris exempt based on the pregnancy. Section 402(a)(19)(C)(vi) of the Actexempts pregnant women during the second and third trimesters based onthe pregnancy. However, we would strongly encourage States to urge pregnant women to volunteerto participate in the program, particularly those who are not yet 20 yearsof age and without a high school education. Since these women will be requiredto participate soon after their children are born, pursuant to andSection;250.32(a), it would be a much smoother transition and a more effectiveprocess if they do not drop out of the educational system during theirpregnancy. <T3>Age of the Youngest Child. </T3>Section 402(a)(19)(C)(iii) of the Actprovides that a parent or other relative of a child under 3 (or an ageless than 3, but not less than 1, if the State plan so provides) is exemptif the parent or relative is personally caring for the child. It also providesthat the parent or relative of a child under 6 is exempt if personallycaring for the child unless the State IV-A agency assures the necessarychild care and that participation in the program will not be required formore than 20 hours per week. However, both of these exemptions are supersededby the requirement at section 402(a)(19)(E) of the Act that custodial parentsunder age 20 attend educational activities if they have not finished highschool and child care is otherwise available. A more complete discussionof this requirement is contained in the preamble for andSection; 250.32.We propose to limit the child care exemption to one parent or caretakerrelative per case. This is consistent with section 402(a)(19)(D) of theAct which specifically allows only one such exemption in a two-parent unemployedparent case. We believe that by analogy it is a reasonable interpretationto apply the same requirement in an AFDC case and, therefore, where thereis more than one person who can qualify for the exemption, only one personmay be exempt. We also believe that this policy is consistent with thelanguage that the individual must be ``personally providing care.'' <T3>Exemptions in Unemployed Parent (UP) Cases. </T3>Section 402(a)(19)of the Act does not exempt a parent in an AFDC-UP family from JOBS participationdue to the other parent's participation in JOBS. Accordingly, the StateIV-A agency may require the second parent to participate unless he or shemeets another exemption criterion such as caring for a young child. However,section 402(a)(19)(D) of the Act also allows States to require both parentsto participate, notwithstanding the exemption for having a young child,if child care is guaranteed in accordance with section 402(g) of the Act.If the State IV-A agency does not elect this option, section 402(a)(19)(D)of the Act provides that only one parent may be exempt for personally caringfor a young child. We propose to allow a State to establish policy on whetherthe principal earner is eligible for the exemption for caring for a childunder age 3.<T3>Other Exemptions. </T3>Other exemptions provided in section 402(a)(19)(C)of the Act, including the incapacity, illness, and caring for another illor incapacitated individual in the household, are implemented in the proposedregulations and follow the language of the current WIN regulations, whichimplement identical exemptions. We do encourage State IV-A agencies notto automatically exempt someone as incapacitated if the individual couldbe served or employed if reasonable accommodation for the incapacity weremade. The proposed regulation requires that State IV-A agencies regularly reviewthe appropriateness of exemptions, especially those of a temporary nature.Such review must occur, at a minimum, at each redetermination for AFDC.<ITAG tagnum="81">Volunteers (andSection; 250.31 of the Proposed Regulations) </ITAG>Section 402(a)(19)(B)(i)(II) of the Act contains a general requirementthat State IV-A agencies must allow applicants for and recipients of AFDCwho are exempt under section 402(a)(19)(C) to participate in JOBS on avoluntary basis if the program is available in their area and State resourcesotherwise permit. However, section 402(a)(19)(B)(ii) of the Act contains a specific requirementthat in determining priority of participation within the target groupsdefined in section 403(1)(2)(B), the State IV-A agency shall give firstconsideration to applicants and recipients who volunteer. We interpretthe use of the term ``volunteer'' to include both mandatory and exemptapplicants and recipients so that a State may elect to prioritize amongvolunteers and, if appropriate, give priority to non-exempt volunteers.The statutory priority given to volunteers in target groups does not usurpthe State IV-A agency's authority to determine the type of program it willoffer. Several factors may affect a State's decision on priority servicesincluding (1) goals of the State program, (2) availability of resources,and (3) the effect of selection of individuals to participate on the States'sability to meet participation rate standards. Section 402(a)(19)(B)(iv)of the Act specifically provides that a State IV-A agency need not allowor require participation of an individual if such participation would affectthe State's rate of reimbursement pursuant to Section 403(1)(2) becausethe State could not expend 55 percent of its funds on individuals in thetarget groups. This provision is incorporated in the proposed regulationat andSection; 250.74(a)(3). The proposed regulation at andSection; 250.31(b) describes the consequencesfor volunteers who stop participating in JOBS. For exempt individuals whostop participating in the program without good cause, their priority statusto participate in the program is lost as long as other individuals areactively seeking to participate. For individuals who are not exempt butenter the program voluntarily, the regulation provides that if such anindividual stops participating without good cause, the individual is subjectto sanction as described in andSection; 250.34. We believe that this approachprovides fair and equitable treatment for all non-exempt participants andavoids the situation in which a non-exempt (mandatory) participant couldavoid participating in JOBS by volunteering first and then dropping outwithout good cause. If the rule about volunteers losing priority statuswere applied in that situation, the mandatory individual would become partof the group served after all others thereby avoiding her obligation toparticipate.<ITAG tagnum="81">Participation Requirements for Education (andSection; 250.32 of theProposed Regulations) </ITAG>Congress recognized the importance of education to the achievement of long-termself-sufficiency, especially for young parents, and it addressed it intwo ways in the Family Support Act. First, the Act requires State IV-Aagencies to make available a range of educational activities which aredescribed in the proposed regulations at andSection; 250.44. Second, theAct requires that to the extent educational services are available andState resources permit, the State must (subject to certain exceptions describedbelow) require the custodial parent under 20 who has not finished highschool (or its equivalent) to participate in an appropriate educationalactivity. Congress thought it important enough to specifically provide that a youngparent under 20 years of age is not exempt from educational activitieseven if she has a child under 3 and to give State IV-A agencies the optionto require that she attend full-time if it is in the pursuit of a highschool diploma or its equivalent. This is a very important step in insuringthat young parents are encouraged and helped to remain in school and notignored until their youngest child turns 3. In addition, in section 403(l)(2)(B)(iii)of the Act, Congress designated custodial parents under 24 who have notcompleted high school and who are not enrolled in high school (or a highschool equivalency course) at the time they apply for aid, one of the fourpopulations specifically targeted for services. Section 402(a)(19)(E) of the Act provides State IV-A agencies with severaloptions for young custodial parents. The State may establish criteria forexcusing custodial parents under age 18 from the high school attendancerequirements described above. We believe, however, that excusing custodialparents from high school attendance should be rare. We propose that insuch cases State IV-A agencies must provide for assignment to availableeducational alternatives and that all determinations be made based on anassessment of the individual's circumstances. The proposed regulation furtherprovides that the State agency's criteria may not excuse anyone from highschool who is subject to the State's compulsory attendance requirements.We also propose that the State may not categorically excuse someone becauseof the grade level she has completed. For example, it is not sufficientto say that a 17-year-old who has only finished 8th grade is automaticallyexcused. For custodial parents who are age 18 or 19, the State IV-A agency may requireparticipation in training or work activities in lieu of educational activitiesif the individual is not making good progress in completing educationalactivities or, if an educational assessment, prior to assignment, determinesthat such educational activities are inappropriate for the individual.The statutory reference to ``custodial parent'' in section 402(a)(19)(E)has prompted some to question whether 16- to 18-year-olds who are not parentsare eligible for JOBS services. We want to be clear that they are. If theyare not in school, they are mandatory participants because they do notmeet the exemption criteria. In addition, if the individual is a memberof a family in which the youngest child will lose eligibility within twoyears because of age, she is a member of one of the target groups describedat andSection; 250.1 earmarked for services. We believe that, like theircounterparts who are parents, 16- to 18-year-olds should be encouragedand helped to remain in school or to participate in other educational activities.For individuals 20 years of age or over, if they have not earned a highschool diploma (or its equivalent), section 482(d)(2) of the Act providesthat if the State IV-A agency requires such an individual to participate,it must include educational activities consistent with her employment goalsas a component in her employability plan. There are two exceptions: (1)If the individual demonstrates a basic literacy level, or (2) if the long-termemployment goal identified in the individual's employability plan doesnot require a high school diploma (or its equivalent).<ITAG tagnum="81">Participation Requirements for Unemployed Parents (andSection; 250.33of the Proposed Regulations) </ITAG>Section 403(1)(4)(A)(i) of the Act provides that a State IV-A agency mustrequire at least one parent in a family eligible for AFDC due to the unemploymentof the principal earner in the family to participate for at least 16 hoursa week in one of the following components of the JOBS program: work supplementationprogram, a community work experience program or other work experience program,on-the-job training, or a State-designed work program approved by the Secretary.If a parent is under age 25 and has not completed high school or an equivalentcourse of education, section 403(1)(4)(A)(i) of the Act permits the StateIV-A agency to require the parent to participate in educational activitiesdirected at attaining a high school diploma (or equivalent) or in anotherbasic education program. The Act does not specifically define minimum levelsof participation for individuals in this category. However, we have defineda minimum level of participation in educational activities for the purposeof determining the general participation rate, and we propose to adoptthe same standard for this part of the UP participation requirements. Thatstandard is ``making satisfactory progress'', as defined at andSection; 250.1.Section 403(1)(4)(A)(ii) of the Act provides that in the case of a parentparticipating in a community work experience program for the maximum numberof hours as provided in andSection; 250.63, such participation shall meetthe requirements of this section even if it is less than 16 hours per week.On the other hand, nothing in this section relieves the parent of the obligationunder andSection; 250.63(d) to participate in CWEP for the maximum numberof hours even if it exceeds the 16 hours per week provided in this section.Sections 403(1)(4)(B) and (C) of the Act provide that, by FY 1994, eachState IV-A agency must have 40 percent of its Unemployed Parent caseloadparticipating at least 16 hours per week in a work component describedin this section. This requirement increases by steps to 75 percent in FY1997. The consequences of not meeting these rates are contained at andSection;250.74(c) and discussed further in the preamble to that section. We believethat it would be prudent for State IV-A agencies to incorporate programsdesigned to meet these requirements at the time that they implement JOBS(or as soon as they have a UP program). Early implementation of this provisionwill allow States to increase the coverage of their programs on an incrementalbasis so that they can be at 40 percent by FY 1994. In addition, by implementingconcurrently with JOBS, the State IV-A agency will maintain a consistentapproach to serving unemployed parents. In addition, we have read this provision together with the technical amendmentsthat section 202 of the Statute makes to the Unemployed Parent program.These amendments impose additional requirements on States to require earlyparticipation by principal earners, and on principal earners to participateor apply for participation in JOBS within 30 days of receipt of aid. Theseprovisions are discussed more fully in the preamble to the technical andconforming amendments. By establishing a work program in accordance withthis section, the State IV-A agency would have in place a program to whichit could promptly and easily assign principal earners.<ITAG tagnum="81">Sanctions (andSection; 250.34 of the Proposed Regulations) </ITAG>Section 402(a)(19)(G) of the Act provides for sanctions if an individualwho is required to participate in JOBS fails to participate in the programor refuses to accept employment without good cause. <T3>Length of Sanctions. </T3>The length of sanctions for the Work IncentiveProgram was established in a joint regulation issued by the Secretariesof HHS and Labor. There are set periods of 3 payment months for the firstfailure to participate and 6 payment months for any subsequent failure.The length of sanction for WIN Demonstration and CWEP programs followsWIN regulations. The length of sanction for employment search also followsWIN regulations unless a State has adopted a lesser sanction period inits IV-A plan. Participation in work supplementation is voluntary. Section 402(a)(19)(G)(ii) of the Act sets forth the length of sanctionperiods for JOBS purposes. For the first failure to participate or acceptemployment, the sanction lasts until the failure to comply ceases. Forthe second failure, the sanction lasts until the failure to comply ceasesor 3 months whichever is longer. For any subsequent failure, the sanctionlasts until the failure to comply ceases or 6 months whichever is longer.We have heard from some States that it may be difficult to determine whena ``failure to comply ceases''. Accordingly, we propose a definition ofthis concept that we believe allows the State IV-A agency to determinethat the individual has actually demonstrated a willingness to participatein the program and, therefore, has ceased her non-compliance. We proposethat a State may require an individual to engage in either the activityto which she was previously assigned, or in some other activity designedby the State to lead to full participation, for a period of up to two weeksin order to demonstrate willingness to participate. If the individual successfullyparticipates in such activities, the sanction will cease as of the dayshe agreed to participate. If the State IV-A agency has no activity towhich it can assign the individual, the sanction will cease on the dayshe agrees to participate. For instance, if a sanctioned individual says on Monday that she wantsto participate, the State may require her to come in and develop an employabilityplan or attend a pre-employment orientation. If she successfully completesthe assigned activity, her sanction shall be considered to have ended onMonday. <T3>Nature of Sanction. </T3>If a parent or other caretaker relative ina one-adult AFDC family failed or refused to participate in the WIN programor accept employment, her needs were not taken into account in determiningthe family's need for assistance and the amount of the assistance payment.In addition, aid had to be paid to a third party in the form of protectiveor vendor payments unless the agency was unable to arrange such payments.Further, if the only dependent child in a family failed or refused to participate,the entire family would be ineligible for AFDC. Finally, if the parentwho was designated as the principal earner, for purposes of section 407,failed or refused to participate, the entire family was sanctioned. Section 402(a)(19)(G) of the Act makes several changes to the way the sanctionis applied to the parent (or caretaker) and her family. The general ruleis that the needs of the individual are not taken into account in determiningneed for assistance and the amount of the assistance payment. The provisionthat aid is denied to a family if the only dependent child fails to participateis not carried over so the general rule applies to such a family. Despitethe child's failure to participate, she is still considered a ``dependentchild'' for the purpose of determining the eligibility of the family. Section 402(a)(19)(G)(i)(I) of the Act retains the requirement for protectiveor vendor payments if the sanctioned individual is the parent or othercaretaker relative, and the State can make such an arrangement. This appliesto both one-parent and two-parent families. We have amended andSection; 234.60(a)(12)to incorporate this change. Section 402(a)(19)(G)(i)(I) of the Act revises the sanctions for two-parentfamilies who are eligible under section 407 of the Act. In addition toapplying the general rule to the individual who failed or refused to participate,the Act provides that the needs of his or her spouse will also not be takeninto account in determining the family's needs for assistance and the amountof its assistance payment if the spouse is not participating in the JOBSProgram. The rest of the family will have their eligibility determinedwithout inclusion of the needs of the sanctioned parent (and spouse, ifsuch spouse is not participating in JOBS).<T3>3-Month Notice. </T3>Section 402(a)(19)(G)(ii) of the Act also requiresthe State IV-A agency to notify an individual whose failure or refusalhas continued for 3 months of the individual's option to end the sanctionby terminating the failure. The proposed regulation clarifies that, inthe case of the third and all subsequent sanctions, the notice must besent after 3 months, but it must say that the individual cannot terminatethe sanction until the full 6-month sanction has elapsed. <ITAG tagnum="81">Good Cause (andSection; 250.35 of the Proposed Regulations) </ITAG>Sections 402(a)(19)(G) and (H) of the Act provide that a sanction may onlybe imposed if the individual does not have good cause for failing to participatein JOBS or refusing to accept employment. The concept of ``having goodcause'' covers a broad range of circumstances. Sometimes situations arisewhere an individual is unable to participate for a day or several daysbecause of such things as illness or a breakdown in child care arrangementsor transportation. These are often short-term situations resulting fromevents beyond her control. There are other circumstances in which goodcause will give the individual an on-going reason for not participating(lack of available child care). Between these two, there will be circumstancesin which an individual will have ``good cause'' for turning down a specificjob or assignment (``net loss of cash income'') but will be required tocontinue to participate. Under the WIN program ``good cause'' was defined in the Federal WIN Handbook.Existing regulations for CWEP and employment search require the State todefine good cause in the State IV-A plan. There are several specific provisionsthat give an individual ``good cause'' for failing or refusing to participateor to accept employment. We have incorporated them in the proposed regulationsat andSection; 250.35 and describe them as follows. (1) If the individual is a parent or other relative personally providingcare for a child under age 6 and the employment would require such individualto work more than 20 hours per week, the participant shall have good cause.(2) For all individuals, good cause exists if child care (or day care forany incapacitated individual living in the same home as a dependent child)is necessary for an individual to accept employment or enter or continuein the program and such care is not available and the State agency failsto provide the care. In judging whether good cause exists in these circumstances,the State IV-A agency should determine whether there are any other individualsin the home who are capable of providing the necessary care. (3) If accepting a job would result in a net loss of cash income for anassistance unit pursuant to section 402(a)(19)(H) of the Act, good causeexists. However, if the State IV-A agency elects to make a supplementalpayment to the family so that it does not experience a net loss of cashincome, good cause does not exist.(4) Finally, the State IV-A agency may define other reasons for good cause.These could include such events as inclement weather, breakdown of transportationand/or child care arrangements, short-term illness not requiring a doctor'scare, or a family emergency. While we believe that each State is in the best position to establish itsown definition of other reasons for ``good cause,'' we expect that Stateswill develop standards that will insure the integrity of the JOBS program.<T3>Calculating Net Loss of Cash Income. </T3>``Net loss of cash income''means that work-related expenses which would otherwise not be incurredmust be subtracted from the gross income to determine whether the resultingnet income is at least equal to the cash assistance received at the timethe employment is offered. We propose that ``gross income'' includes, butis not limited to, earnings, unearned income, and cash assistance. Thecalculation of the amount of cash assistance to be counted in ``gross income''must be based on current determination including the application of theappropriate earned income disregards. The need for and amount of a ``supplementalpayment'' must be computed each month and include application of the appropriateearned income disregard. Certain categories of expenses would logically be deducted from the grosssalary, e.g., mandatory payroll deductions. However, other necessary expensesrelated directly to work must also be deducted. We considered two methodsof measuring these other work expenses: (1) A reasonable allowance, similarto the $75 work expense deduction ($90 as of October 1, 1989) at andSection;233.20(a)(11)(B) or (2) actual, reasonable work-related expenses. In thisregulation, we propose that State IV-A agencies use actual, reasonablework-related expenses in determining whether a ``net loss of cash income''will occur. This calculation should be figured on an individual basis.The use of actual expenses best serves the legislative purpose of ensuringthat a participant who is required to accept a job is not penalized byhaving less income than was available while she was receiving assistance.The use of a ``reasonable allowance'' seems to duplicate the disregardrequirement of section 402(a)(8) of the Act. If Congress had intended toadd mandatory payroll deductions to the disregards of section 402(a)(8),such language could have been included. <T3>Treatment of Supplemental Payments. </T3>Supplemental payments aretreated as AFDC expenditures under sections 403(a) (1) or (2) of the Act.Families receiving such payments shall not be considered categoricallyeligible for AFDC and are not eligible for Medicaid as AFDC recipients.Eligibility for extended Medicaid (or transitional benefits after April1, 1990) will be determined as of the month the family becomes ineligiblefor AFDC due to the acceptance of the offer of employment. <T3>Application to UP Cases. </T3>This definition does not supersede the100-hour rule as applied to unemployed parents (UPs). Since the Act doesnot allow for AFDC payments to families where deprivation does not exist(two-parent families where neither is incapacitated and in which the principalearner is working more than 100 hours per month), it follows that a supplementalcash payment cannot be made to a UP family if the parent who is the principalearner is working more than 100 hours per month. Congress did recognizethat the current definition of ``unemployment'' for the purposes of qualifyingfor aid under section 407 of the Act should be studied and authorized severaldemonstrations where alternative definitions to the 100-hour rule couldbe tested. <ITAG tagnum="81">Conciliation and Fair Hearings (andSection; 250.36 of the Proposed Regulations)</ITAG>Prior to the Family Support Act, there was no statutory requirement fora conciliation process. However, Federal regulations at andSection;andSection;224.60, 224.62, and 224.63 outline procedures for dispute resolution andconciliation in the WIN Program. Section 482(h) of the Act requires that a State IV-A agency establish aconciliation procedure for the resolution of disputes involving an individual'sparticipation in the JOBS program. We do not propose to describe specificprocedures that all States must adopt. However, we believe that it wasCongress' intent that States have a conciliation procedure that is neitherso short as to be meaningless nor so long as to undermine the mandatorynature of the program and the imposition of sanctions. An effective conciliation process can resolve misunderstandings or disagreementsbefore they get to the point of resulting in a sanction. For example, aconciliation process could be used to resolve disagreements over the employabilityplan. It could also be used when a participant's attendance at an assignedactivity has been irregular but not yet sanctionable. Even if it appearsthat the failure to participate or refusal to accept employment is clear,the conciliation process can prevent the need to go to a full hearing.We believe that an effective conciliation process has the following features.Either the recipient or the agency can request conciliation. At some pointin the conciliation, the individual's rights and responsibilities underthe program should be clearly explained, and she should be informed ofthe consequences of continued failure to participate. The conciliationshould be time-limited, and the individual should be made aware of this.We recommend that the period be no more than 30 calendar days. The agencyshould attempt to schedule at least one face-to-face meeting between theindividual and a representative of the agency. It may be appropriate fora disinterested third-party to participate in such a meeting. If the agencyinitiates the conciliation process and, after reasonable efforts to scheduleand hold a conciliation meeting, the individual does not appear for suchmeeting, the agency may end the conciliation process. The State's effortsat conciliation should be well-documented in the case file. <T3>Fair Hearings. </T3>Under WIN the fair hearing process is complicatedby the joint administration of the program. The WIN sponsor (the employmentagency) is responsible for resolving disputes and providing for a hearingprocedure on issues related to the individual's participation in WIN activities.An individual has a right to appeal through the State employment agencyto the National Review Panel at the U.S. Department of Labor. An individualwho exhausts all her appeals through the Department of Labor is ``deregistered.''The deregistration notice is sent to the State IV-A agency which then institutesits procedures to reduce or close the grant based on failure to be registeredwith WIN. Proper notice has to be sent to the individual, and she has aright to a hearing under andSection; 205.10. Such a hearing can only addressissues related to the amount of the reduction or closure of the grant.It cannot review the employment agency's determination of failure or refusalto participate. This two-tiered system often means that enforcing participationrequirements in WIN is difficult and time-consuming. For the WIN Demonstration program, community work experience program, worksupplementation program, and employment search, the State IV-A agency isrequired to follow the hearing and notice procedures in andSection; 205.10.Under section 482(h) of the Act, the State IV-A agency must provide a hearingwhen the conciliation process does not resolve a dispute. The Act providesStates with two options. The State may follow the hearing and notice proceduresof andSection; 205.10. As an alternative, the State may establish a separatehearing system. However, the State IV-A agency may not contract out theresponsibility for providing a hearing to any other agency. An alternativehearing system could provide for a hearing only on the issues associatedwith JOBS disputes. It should be noted, however, that before an individual'sgrant could be reduced, suspended, discontinued, or terminated, she mustbe afforded an opportunity for a hearing that meets the standards of <T3>Goldberg </T3>v. <T3>Kelly,</T3> 397 U.S. 254 (1970).Subpart E_Operation of State Jobs Programs/Program Components <ITAG tagnum="81">Providing Program Information to AFDC Applicants and Recipients (andSection;250.40 of the Proposed Regulations) </ITAG>Section 482(c) of the Social Security Act requires the State IV-A agencyto provide all AFDC applicants and recipients with information on the JOBSprogram including education, training, and employment opportunities; availablesupportive services including child care and transitional child care forwhich they are eligible; the State IV-A agency's obligations; and the participant'sresponsibilities. Although the Act only requires that this information cover the JOBS program,the conference report indicates that it is also important that the informationcover child support responsibilities. Thus, this section of the proposedregulations requires that the State IV-A agency provide information onsecuring child support and establishing paternity as well as related requirements.The purpose of providing program information on JOBS and child supportis to ensure that all applicants and recipients are encouraged, assistedand required to fulfill their responsibilities to support their childrenby preparing for and obtaining employment and by ensuring their cooperationin the establishment of paternity and enforcement of child support obligations.To provide a State IV-A agency with the flexibility to administer theirprograms to accommodate variations in local resources and needs, the proposedregulations permit a State IV-A agency to develop the processes, methodsof delivery, and timeframes for providing this information. These mustbe described in the JOBS plan pursuant to andSection; 250.21(g)(5). A StateIV-A agency may provide this program information as the JOBS program isphased in by district office or target groups, as long as it is providedin a timely manner. We propose that a State IV-A agency provide this programinformation to applicants at the time of application and to recipientsat the time of the first redetermination after the State IV-A agency'simplementation of JOBS. According to section 482(c)(5) of the Social Security Act, after the StateIV-A agency provides a recipient with the information described above,it must, within one month, notify the recipient of the opportunity to indicateher desire to participate in JOBS. The agency must provide a clear descriptionof how to enter the program. The Act does not, however, provide specificsregarding this notification process. To allow the State IV-A agency latitudein providing such notification to applicants, except those assigned tojob search, this proposed section permits the State IV-A agency to makesuch notification within one month of eligibility determination. Thus theState IV-A agency does not have to provide information to all applicants,many of whom may never become eligible. Following the language of the conferencereport, the regulations indicate that such notification must be in writing.H.R. Rep. No. 998, 100th Cong., 2nd Sess. 132(1988). Because the idea of participant preference can be confusing as it appliesto non-exempt recipients, the proposed regulations clarify that an indicationby a non-exempt individual that she does not want to participate does notprevent a State IV-A agency from requiring that individual to participate.Alternately, consistent with other due process guarantees, a State IV-Aagency may not interpret a lack of response or indication of a preferencenot to participate in JOBS by a non-exempt individual to constitute, byitself, failure to participate. Also, a State IV-A agency must inform anon-exempt participant before she decides to voluntarily enter the programthat she would be subject to sanction if she stopped participating in theprogram without good cause.<ITAG tagnum="81">Initial Assessment and Employability Plan (andSection; 250.41 of theProposed Regulations) </ITAG><T3>Initial Assessment. </T3>We are proposing that the State IV-A agencymust conduct an initial assessment of each participant's employabilitybased on: (1) Educational, child care and other supportive services needs;(2) the participant's proficiencies, skills, deficiencies, and prior workexperience; and (3) a review of the family circumstances, which may includethe needs of any child of the participant. The proposed regulations further provide that the initial assessment canbe conducted through various methods including interviews, testing, counseling,and self-assessment instruments. Self-assessment instruments generallyinclude check-off lists or survey forms designed to help the individualidentify supportive service needs such as child care and transportation,and accomplishments such as educational level completed, prior work experienceand skills acquired through employment or hobbies. Appropriate assessment methodologies may vary among State IV-A and localprograms due to differences in caseload size, program resources, and programphilosophies. A State IV-A agency may also use different assessment methodologiesto address individual recipient needs. For example, a State IV-A agencymay find it cost-effective to do a limited, initial assessment for recipients,followed by a more in-depth assessment only as participant needs dictate.Since the Act does not provide specific details about assessment servicesand the conference report eliminated the requirement for testing literacyand reading skills, we believe Congress intended to give a State IV-A agencybroad flexibility in this area. We recommend that, where appropriate, State IV-A agencies use nationallyrecognized, standardized, and industry-developed tests to determine readingand literacy levels and aptitude skills before assigning participants tospecific educational and vocational training programs. Such testing mayhelp the State IV-A agency assure that limited resources are used effectivelyand that participants are not placed in activities that are inappropriatefor them. The proposed regulations permit a State IV-A agency to use awide variety of assessment methods. The proposed regulations do not set forth timeframes (except for thoseindividuals in job search pursuant to andSection; 250.60) or establish aprocess for conducting the initial assessment. However, the proposed ruleprovides that a State IV-A agency must conduct the initial assessment withina reasonable timeframe prior to participation. The assessment process mustbe described in the State JOBS plan, as provided at andSection; 250.21. <T3>Employability Plan. </T3>Section 482(b) of the Act requires that theState IV-A agency develop an employability plan in consultation with theJOBS participant based on the initial assessment. It further specifiesthat the employability plan must contain an employment goal, describe thesupportive services to be provided and the JOBS activities to be undertaken.The proposed regulation follows the requirements of the Act as to the basiccontent of the employability plan but leaves design and administrationof the actual employability plan to the State IV-A agency. Congress was particularly concerned that employability plans reflect theavailability of jobs in the local job market so that JOBS resources wouldbe expended efficiently. This concern is discussed in more detail in thepreamble to proposed andSection; 250.12 on coordination.As appropriate, the employability plan may identify services to be providedto address the needs of a participant's child, such as drug education orlife skills planning courses. Many services for children are generallyavailable to low-income community residents at no cost through local educationalprograms or volunteer services. The employability plan should reflect a direct path to available employment.States might consider including a schedule of activities that would leadto employment by a specified date to achieve this goal. The employabilityplan should include activities which are selected to achieve self-sufficiencyin an expeditious manner. Section 482(b)(1)(B) provides that the employability plan must also takeinto account participant preferences as much as possible within the limitsof the State's JOBS program. We interpret this to mean that in developingan individual's employability plan, the State IV-A agency must considerthe needs and preferences of the participant in the context of agency goalsand constraints (including program resources, available services and localemployment opportunities). The proposed regulation specifies that finalapproval of the employability plan rests with the State IV-A agency. Thisapproval provision is particularly important in establishing the StateIV-A agency's authority to determine the appropriateness of self-initiatedactivities as provided in proposed andSection; 250.48. In developing employment goals and establishing appropriate participationrequirements, the State IV-A agency should not limit a participant's optionsbased upon traditional views of appropriate male and female roles. Suchlimitations would be inconsistent with the requirements on non-discriminationat section 484(a)(3) of the Social Security Act, and could contravene theself-sufficiency goals of the program. <ITAG tagnum="81">Agency-Participant Agreement (andSection; 250.42 of the Proposed Regulations)</ITAG>Section 482(b)(2) of the Social Security Act provides that, following theinitial assessment and the development of the employability plan, the StateIV-A agency may require the JOBS participant (or the adult caretaker inthe family of which the participant is a member) to negotiate and enterinto an agreement with the State IV-A agency. This is not a new concept. Currently, some State IV-A agencies requireWIN/WIN Demonstration participants to sign a written agreement or contractwith the welfare agency. Usually, this agreement is included as part ofthe employability plan and specifies the actions the recipient will taketo implement the plan and the agency services and resources to be madeavailable to the recipient. Generally, the agreement or contract includeswell-defined time lines and benchmarks for progress for both the recipientand the agency. Thus, the agency-participant agreement is viewed as thebasic tool for outlining the mutual responsibilities, expectations andspecific tasks of both the recipient and the agency. The proposed regulations follow the conference report and permit a StateIV-A agency to consider the agreement a contract. H.R. Rep. No. 998, 100thCong., 2nd Sess. 129 (1988). Such contract is subject to applicable Statelaws and regulations. This section of the proposed regulations provides that the option neednot be statewide. However, the State IV-A agency will be required to describein its JOBS plan the purpose and content of such agreements or contractsand the types of participants for whom it will be used. Proposed andSection;250.21 contains the State JOBS plan content requirements.<ITAG tagnum="81">Case Management (andSection; 250.43 of the Proposed Regulations) </ITAG>Generally, a case management system is designed to support and strengthenthe participant's capacity to become self-supporting and to help assurethat participants and their families have access to the resources and opportunitiesrequired for self-support. Case management may be advocated on the groundsthat the activities and services a recipient may need to progress to self-supportare so scattered among programs and agencies that a case manager is neededso that progress is not delayed and frustrated. Under the proposed regulations, a State IV-A agency that chooses to establisha case management system is given flexibility to design its case managementservices and procedures. Case management does not have to be offered inall political subdivisions that have a JOBS program. Proposed andSection;250.21 provides that State IV-A agencies must describe their case managementapproach covering the scope of services offered, the political subdivisionsincluded, and the types of recipients and percent of caseload served intheir State JOBS plan. <ITAG tagnum="81">Mandatory Components (andSection; 250.44 of the Proposed Regulations)</ITAG><T3>Education. </T3>Section 482(d)(1)(A)(i) of the Act provides that therequired educational activities are: (1) High school education or its equivalent;(2) basic and remedial education to achieve a basic literacy level (wepropose a definition that is discussed in andSection; 250.1); and (3) educationin English as a second language. The conference report (H.R. Rep. No. 998,100th Cong., 2nd Sess. 142 (1988)) states that where enrollment in regularhigh school programs is deemed inappropriate, the State IV-A agency isexpected to identify or develop alternative education activities to meetthe needs of JOBS participants. The proposed regulation provides at andSection; 250.32(b) that if a Staterequires participation in JOBS of an individual age 20 or over who hasnot completed high school, it must include educational activities consistentwith her employment goal. There are two exceptions: if the individual demonstratesa ``basic literacy level,'' or if her long-term employment goal does notrequire a high school level of education. We propose elsewhere, on advicefrom the Department of Education, to define ``basic literacy level'' assuccessful completion of the eighth grade. In responding to these two requirementsin the Act, we note that levels of education between ``basic'' educationand ``high school'' are not explicitly specified. Nonetheless, they areclearly allowable as JOBS educational activities. Section 250.44(a) providesthat the educational activity may include any activity below the postsecondarylevel, which means that an intermediate educational goal between basiceducation and high school is acceptable if the State IV-A agency concludesthat it corresponds to the individual's long-term employment goal. The Family Support Act provides no definition for the required work andtraining programs. It does, however, require reporting of activity andcosts related to each selected program or activity. We, therefore, proposeto regulate functional definitions for the three remaining mandatory componentsof ``job skills training,'' ``job readiness activities,'' and ``job developmentand placement.'' We sought available definitions of these terms from the Department of Labor,principally with reference to definitions used by the State employmentsecurity agencies and the Job Training Partnership Act programs. Not allprograms required by the Family Support Act are defined in DOL programs,such as ``job readiness activities.'' Other programs or activities aredefined differently, such as ``job development'' and ``job placement'',which are established in the Act as a single, combined, required programactivity, but which are each defined differently by JTPA and the EmploymentService. In a two-day meeting with selected State welfare agency directors and theirwork program directors, strong opinion was voiced that wherever possible,definitions of employment and training terms correspond with existing definitionsused by the State agencies from whom State welfare agencies would oftenbe seeking both contracted and non-reimbursed services. While we have endeavoredto be responsive to these State concerns in this regard, we had to choosebetween or combine definitions. We invite comment on the operational usefulnessof the distinctions we propose for such purposes as program design anddata maintenance in case records.<T3>Job Readiness Activities. </T3>Under the proposed rule, ``job readiness''centers on pre-employment preparation, and would exclude activities thatwould readily fit within the scope of other defined components, such asvocational skills training. The Department of Labor advised us that ``jobreadiness activities'' are not defined by the Employment Service. However,employment security agencies define several closely related terms. Thus,a ``non-job-ready'' person is one who is deficient in work attitudes, behaviorsor skills and is therefore unable to get and keep a job; a ``job readyindividual'' is one who, among other things, has no physical, mental orjob skill barriers that preclude employment; and ``employability'' is definedas, among other things, work behavior and attitudes that are necessaryto compete successfully in the labor market. We agree with the Departmentof Labor observation, and propose in the rule, that an activity relatedto removing such barriers would be defined as a job readiness activity.<T3>Job Skills Training.</T3> We propose to adhere to what we believe isthe commonly understood meaning of the term_pre-employment training intechnical job skills. It would, for example, correspond approximately towhat was understood in the WIN and WIN Demonstration programs as institutionaltraining. In order to assure that skills training offered through JOBS results inan increase in participants' skills and competencies, and that progresscan be monitored by the State IV-A agency, we propose to require that qualitativemeasures for progress be developed for all skills training that is includedas a JOBS component. This is discussed in more detail in the definitionof making good or satisfactory progress in a training component in andSection;250.1. <T3>Job Development and Job Placement. </T3>The proposed rule would define``job development and job placement'' as agency activity on behalf of participantsto create or discover openings, and to market participants for them. Thisis consistent with a longstanding approach in employment programs. We havefollowed that historical pattern as a means of distinguishing agency activitythat is relatively intense on behalf of a participant, from a participant'sintense activity in Job Search. Based on this distinction, we propose toexclude this component from the definition of ``participation'' found inandSection; 250.1. We also do not intend that this component should have any connection withthe longstanding concept in employment security agencies of a ``placement''as an outcome. The specialized meaning of this outcome measure for employmentsecurity agencies does not correspond to the requirements or expectationsof JOBS.<ITAG tagnum="81">Optional Components (andSection; 250.45 of the Proposed Regulations)</ITAG>In addition to the four required components, the State IV-A agency mustalso offer at least two of the following four activities in its JOBS program:(1) Group and individual job search; (2) On-the-job training; (3) Work supplementation; and (4) Community work experience, or other approved work experience program.Except for on-the-job training, these optional components are generallybased on existing law and program regulation. The Act provides for a fewchanges to programmatic aspects of these components which are discussedin the following sections. Otherwise, we have adopted as much of the existingregulations as possible. Since the Act establishes common sanctions, eligibilitycriteria, FFP guidelines, target populations and service area coveragefor the JOBS program, the regulations governing the optional componentswill no longer have specific language addressing these areas as there waswhen they were discrete IV-A work programs. Like the required components, the optional components need not be operateduniformly throughout the State. However, the additional State options doprovide an opportunity for the State IV-A agency to develop a program meetingspecific needs of individuals while recognizing State economic and environmentalfactors. Congressional conferees (H.R. Rep. No. 100-998, 100th Cong., 2dSess. 141 (1988)) stressed the desirability of programs that respond tovarying circumstances, including changes in the unemployment rate and differentneeds that exist in rural and urban areas. Our regulations seek to reflectthis congressional intent. <ITAG tagnum="81">Postsecondary Education (andSection; 250.46 of the Proposed Regulations)</ITAG>We have defined postsecondary education in andSection; 250.1. We interpretthe language of section 482(d)(1)(B)(i) of the Act to mean that the offeringof postsecondary education is an entirely optional matter for the StateIV-A agency to address in its JOBS plan, except that we have limited sucheducation to that which is directly related to the fulfillment of an individual'semployment goal, i.e., to obtain useful employment in a recognized occupation.Within this occupational limitation, the State IV-A agency must set forththe bases upon which it will determine whether postsecondary educationis appropriate. We believe that the proposed restriction of postsecondary education toeducation related to the goal of obtaining useful employment in a recognizedoccupation is consistent with the intent of the JOBS program. The program'saim to reduce long-term welfare dependence would not be served by permittinga JOBS participant to embrace the broader, more general educational goalsthat also fall within postsecondary education but that have a less well-definedoccupational connection. While we cannot prohibit the use of JOBS funds for this activity, we areextremely concerned about the potential cost. We strongly urge States touse other available resources for postsecondary education and concentrateJOBS funds on short-term activities which lead to employment. A State mustconsider the wide range of other components which must be included in theirJOBS program when determining whether to fund postsecondary education.We will monitor State expenditures in this area carefully. We propose to exclude the costs of such education, including tuition, booksand fees, from coverage as special needs under andSection; 233.20(a)(2)(v).Since the Act now provides funding for this activity and places a specificcap on the overall JOBS funding, we would be circumventing the Statutewere we to allow additional funding under special needs.<ITAG tagnum="81">Other Education, Training, and Employment Activities (andSection; 250.47of the Proposed Regulations) </ITAG>Section 482(d)(1)(B)(ii) of the Act provides that the Secretary may approveadditional components not specified in the Act. Because, in the courseof the conference, public service employment was specifically consideredas a potential optional component and finally rejected by the conferees,we have expressly excluded public service employment from the acceptablepossibilities. By public service employment we mean what that term meantunder the WIN and CETA programs: a fully subsidized job in a public agencythat is not expected to convert to unsubsidized employment.  <ITAG tagnum="81">Self-Initiated Education or Training (andSection; 250.48 of the ProposedRegulations) </ITAG>This section describes State options regarding individuals already engagedin education or training at the time they are otherwise required to beginparticipation in JOBS. Section 402(a)(19)(F) of the Act gives the StateIV-A agency the option to allow such individuals to continue attendanceat an institution of higher education or in a school or course of vocationalor technical training if certain conditions are met. The proposed rulerequires that a participant: (1) Attend the educational activity at leasthalf-time; (2) make ``satisfactory progress in such institution, school,or course''; and (3) be enrolled in a course of study that is consistentwith her employment goals. While the wording of the Act could lead to an interpretation that the half-timeattendance provision pertains only to the school or course of vocationalor technical training, this would leave a question as to the amount oftime the participant would have to be in attendance at an institution ofhigher education. We see no reason to distinguish an ``institution of highereducation'' from a ``school or course of vocational or technical training''in applying a minimum attendance  requirement. Rather, we see the proposalto have the half-time attendance requirement apply to higher educationas serving three beneficial purposes. First, it provides guidance as tominimal expectations of participation. Second, it serves as an indicatorassociated with making satisfactory progress in the institution, as definedin andSection; 250.1. Third, the proposed half-time requirement is consistentwith such requirements for half-time attendance contained in certain studentfinancial aid programs operated under the Higher Education Act. For example,the Guaranteed Student Loan Program requires a student to be enrolled atleast half-time in order to receive aid from that program. The proposed meaning of the term ``vocational or technical training'' isincorporated into andSection; 250.48 of the proposed rule. In this context,it is included within the meaning of ``postsecondary education,'' as definedin these regulations, but limited to education that both leads to usefulemployment in a recognized occupation and results in other than a baccalaureateor advanced degree. This limitation is compatible with definitions containedin the Higher Education Act and the Carl D. Perkins Vocational EducationAct. Such a limitation also fits with the more fundamental purpose of theFamily Support Act to reduce welfare dependency. We do not believe theJOBS program was  intended to foster the acquisition of postsecondary educationin the broad sense of the programs found in the Higher Education Act, underwhich long-term educational activities clearly are supported. In supplying definitional information, the Department of Education statedthat one of its primary concerns was ``whether welfare recipients who areenrolled in postsecondary schools have the ability to benefit from theprograms in which they are enrolled. The Division of Adult Education believesthat the State should perform an educational assessment of the abilityto benefit of any JOBS participant * * * before enrollment is considered\6\ `satisfactory participation * * *.''' Other commenters asserted that there is potential for abuse by the institutionscited in section 402(a)(19)(F) that would enroll welfare recipients asa means of securing indirect funding by means of student aid under theHigher Education Act. We believe that, in the case of self-initiated training which the StateIV-A agency might find to be satisfactory for participation in the JOBSprogram, an educational assessment of the participant and adherence tobenchmarks of satisfactory progress are crucial to the  protection of boththe participating student and Federal funds. Therefore, the proposed rulerequires an assessment and development of an employability plan, beforethe agency determines the appropriateness of her pre-existing educationor training activity to a defined employment goal. The proposed rule provides that the State IV-A agency may place restrictionsupon the self-initiated postsecondary education that may be accepted asmeeting JOBS participation requirements. For example, the State IV-A agencymight restrict such postsecondary education to a maximum of two years.Further, a State IV-A agency might choose to permit an individual who iswithin two years of completing a four-year program to complete it if therequirements of this section otherwise are fulfilled. We would encourageStates in delineating restrictions to be mindful that the goal of self-initiatedtraining should be to move the participant from welfare dependence withina reasonable time. Therefore, shorter programs leading to specific occupationalgoals are preferable to longer educational programs that may have far lessspecific employment goals. The proposed rule prohibits the use of Federal JOBS funds to pay self-initiatedpostsecondary education that  the State may consider to constitute satisfactoryparticipation in the program, pursuant to andSection; 250.48. In the caseof self-initiated postsecondary education, section 402(a)(19)(F) of theAct specifically states that such costs shall not constitute federallyreimbursable expenses under JOBS. The remaining proposed provisions of andSection; 250.48 largely repeat provisionsfound in section 402(a)(19)(F) of the Act. The rule proposes that, consistentwith the Act, the State IV-A agency must not permit other JOBS activitiesto interfere with State-approved self-initiated training. Also, while thecosts of self-initiated postsecondary education will not be reimbursableunder JOBS, the costs of child care, transportation, and other supportiveservices that the State IV-A agency determines are necessary for attendanceare eligible for Federal reimbursement. Subpart G_Optional Components of State JOBS Programs <ITAG tagnum="81">Job Search Program (andSection; 250.60 of the Proposed Regulations)</ITAG>Section 482(g) of the Act provides for group and individual job searchas an optional component under JOBS. Although we describe all mandatoryand optional components in separate sections, we recognize that it willbe appropriate for States to combine them for certain clients. Job searchis an excellent example. While job search by itself is an appropriate activityfor the job ready who have basic workplace skills, for those who are skillsdeficient, job search should be coupled with other education and trainingactivities. The Act generally retains the provisions of the current law at section402(a)(35) of the Act with some modifications. The first change is thatCongress expressed its intent that job search be ``intensive''. We interpretthis to mean that, in order to qualify as an optional component in whichparticipation counts for the purposes of calculating participation ratespursuant to andSection; 250.74, a job search program must be well-structuredand include specific activities to be undertaken by the participant orthe agency on behalf of the participant. Such activities must be definedin the State JOBS plan. Current law provides that a State IV-A agency may require an initial periodof up to 8 consecutive weeks of job search which may begin at the timeof application for aid. Some States have used this initial period to doa preliminary screening of the individual's employability prior to assessmentand development of the employability plan. The Act amends this provisionto provide that the State IV-A agency may not require an individual toparticipate in job search for longer than 3 weeks without performing anassessment as defined at andSection; 250.41. The 3 weeks of job search priorto assessment count as part of the 16 weeks that are allowable during theapplication period and first year. The Act also permits an additional 8 weeks of job search in any subsequentperiod of 12 consecutive months. We propose to adopt the existing interpretationof ``an additional 8 weeks'' to mean 8 weeks or its equivalent. For example,an equivalent would be one week a month for 8 months. We point out, however,that if a State IV-A agency adopts a definition of ``equivalent to 8 weeks''that stretches out the length of job search, without combining it withother activities, such job search may not meet the proposed standards forjob search for the purposes of computing participation rates. Those standardsare found at andSection; 250.1. The Act also provides that a State IV-A agency may require additional jobsearch only in conjunction with some other education, training or employmentactivity which is designed to enhance the individual's employment prospects.For example, if a State IV-A agency requires an 8-week period of job searchfor a recipient and then assigns the individual to skills training, itis permissible to require her to engage in job search at the end of thetraining as part of the training. However, participation in job search is not an allowable activity for FFPor participation rates under the JOBS program if an individual has participatedfor more than 4 months out of the 12 preceding months. We interpret ``4months'' to be 4 months or its equivalent. Therefore, job search for oneweek a month for 8 months (after the initial 8 weeks), as described above,would be within the allowable activities.<ITAG tagnum="81">On-The-Job Training (andSection; 250.61 of the Proposed Regulations)</ITAG>Section 482(d)(1)(A)(ii)(II) of the Act provides for on-the-job training(OJT) as one of the four optional components in JOBS. Section 250.61 containsthe regulations for OJT. Our definition of OJT is based on the definition contained in WIN regulationsat andSection; 224.42(a) and information provided by the Department of Labor.JTPA regulations do not define OJT, although it is an allowable activity.There are a few basic principles that govern OJT. The participant is hiredfirst by the employer. While engaged in productive work, she is providedtraining which gives her the knowledge or skills essential to the fulland adequate performance of that job. She is compensated at a rate (includingbenefits) comparable to that of other employees performing the same orsimilar jobs, and the employer is reimbursed by the State IV-A agency orits agent for the extraordinary costs of training and the additional supervisionthat is required. At the end of the OJT, the participant is retained asa regular employee. In order to assure that OJT assignments offered through JOBS result inan increase in participants' skills and competencies, and that progresscan be monitored by the State IV-A agency, we propose to require that qualitativemeasures for progress be developed for all OJT assignments that are includedunder JOBS. This is discussed in more detail in the definition of makinggood or satisfactory progress in a training component in andSection; 250.1.<T3>Rate of Reimbursement and Duration of OJT. </T3>We propose to limitthe rate of reimbursement to employers to no more than an average of 50percent of the wages paid by the employer to the participant during theperiod of the OJT. The operational experience of the six federally-fundedgrant diversion demonstration projects in which subsidy levels ranged from25 percent to 83 percent did not suggest that higher rates significantlyincreased job opportunities. Furthermore this limitation is consistentwith JTPA, WIN, and employment security policy. We, therefore, believethat by adopting a comparable policy, we avoid fostering competition amongprograms as to the wage subsidies they offer. Section 250.61(b) containsthis provision. We also considered whether to regulate the length of OJT. We have decidedagainst setting limits in regulation because we believe that States shouldhave the flexibility to design the program that both meets the needs ofthe State and the individuals they plan to serve, especially if they useOJT for target populations. While we permit State flexibility, we stronglyrecommend that State IV-A agencies use the guidance that is available,such as the Dictionary of Occupational Titles, in determining the appropriatelength of training and that State IV-A agencies assure that training isonly for as long as is reasonable to learn the necessary skills.<T3>Eligibility for Services during Participation.</T3> Wages from OJTare considered to be earned income for any purpose of the law, which isconsistent with current AFDC policy. A person who loses eligibility forAFDC because of earned income in accordance with andSection; 233.20 or becauseof the application of the 100-hour rule in the case of the principal earnerin a Unemployed Parent case will continue to be considered a participantin JOBS for the duration of the OJT. This will allow the agency to makepayments to the employer through the completion of the OJT. This is comparableto the WIN regulations at andSection; 224.42 which provide that a personin an OJT is considered to be a WIN registrant for the duration of theOJT even if she is no longer receiving AFDC. It also means that the participantmay be eligible for the supportive services available to other participantsin JOBS even though she is not receiving an AFDC grant. However, sincethe participant will have earned income, we believe that the State IV-Aagency, in determining the need for supportive services, should treat theparticipant as it would treat an individual who finds unsubsidized employment.As a participant in JOBS, the individual will be eligible for child careas determined by the State IV-A agency to be necessary for participationfor the duration of the OJT. We have considered how to handle child careonce the OJT ends. We propose the following approach in the regulation.Since the individual was not in receipt of AFDC in the previous month,she is not eligible for the twelve months of transitional child care whenthe OJT ends. However, if she would have been eligible for transitionalcare at the time that she lost eligibility for AFDC due to going into theOJT, she can get transitional care for the number of months left in the12-month eligibility period. For example, an individual who goes into OJT loses eligibility for AFDCin January. The OJT continues until April during which time she receiveschild care as a participant. If she would have been eligible for transitionalchild care under Part 256 in February, she is eligible for the remaining9 months (from May to January). She would, of course, have to meet therequirements of eligibility and would have to contribute to the cost ofthe child care in accordance with the State's sliding fee scale. Alternatively,a State IV-A agency may simply provide child care as transitional childcare from the time that the individual becomes ineligible for AFDC dueto income from the OJT if she would otherwise qualify. This approach hasthe advantage of being fairly simple although it would disadvantage anindividual who would not qualify for transitional benefits because shedid not meet the other eligibility criteria (for example, was not in receiptof AFDC for 3 of 6 preceding months). We believe that our approach of providingup to 12 months of transitional child care to OJT participants assuresthat individuals who enter employment are treated equitably whether theemployment is unsubsidized or subsidized. Eligibility for Medicaid extensions is determined at the time the individualloses eligibility for AFDC. In other words, there is no provision, as thereis under work supplementation, which allows OJT participants who are nolonger AFDC recipients to be eligible for Medicaid based solely on theirstatus as participants. <T3>Differences between OJT and Work Supplementation. </T3>Under JOBS,OJT and work supplementation are two of the four programs from which aState must choose its optional components. We carefully considered thedifferences between OJT and work supplementation under the Act. Since theDeficit Reduction Act of 1984 broadened the kinds of jobs that could befilled under work supplementation to include jobs in the private sector,many State IV-A agencies have used the existing work supplementation programauthority to run what is essentially an OJT program. The diverted grantsare used to pay the subsidy to the employer. There have been many recommendations to make OJT and work supplementationas compatible as possible in our regulations so as to allow States maximumflexibility in program design. We have carefully considered all the argumentsand conclude that OJT and work supplementation must be considered separatecomponents. We have two major reasons for reaching this conclusion. The first is a new provision (section 484(c) of the Act) which specificallybars any participant in a work supplementation component from being assignedto ``fill any established, unfilled position vacancy.'' The same prohibitionhas always existed in CWEP and is carried over to CWEP by the Statute.However, it is a new provision as it applies to work supplementation and,if we assume that it has the same meaning as it has under CWEP, it appearsto limit the use of the work supplementation component to jobs that didnot previously exist. The second reason is that the Act allows State IV-A agencies to apply specialrules to participants in work supplementation jobs that are not availableto persons in OJT. The State IV-A agency may reduce or extend earned incomedisregards as they apply to work supplementation participants (section482(e)(2)(G)). The State IV-A agency may exempt work supplementation participantsfrom retrospective budgeting requirements (section 482(e)(3)(D)). In addition,the State IV-A agency must extend Medicaid coverage to participants inwork supplementation (section 482(e)(6)). There is no basis for extendingany of these special rules to OJT participants and, if we did not makeany distinction, there would be no way to determine which rules shouldapply to a given participant. Furthermore, there is no compelling reason in OJT to invoke the specialrules which are necessary to divert grants to a wage pool in work supplementation.Since JOBS funds are used to reimburse the training costs of the employer,the State IV-A agency, in its planning process, should calculate how manyOJT training opportunities the State will develop and proceed accordingly.For States which are concerned that diverted grants will not provide anadequate wage pool for their work supplementation component, we point outthat they may earmark JOBS program monies at any time to add to the divertedgrant money in the wage pool to ensure that sufficient funds are availablefor subsidy. This money could be unused OJT money, or any other JOBS programmoney. However, it is not permissible to use diverted AFDC grants in theOJT component.<ITAG tagnum="81">Work Supplementation Program (andSection; 250.62 of the Proposed Regulations)</ITAG>Section 482(e) of the Act provides for a work supplementation program (WSP)as an optional component under the JOBS program. This component allowsthe State IV-A agency to pay, or ``divert,'' all or part of the AFDC grantto an employer to cover part of the costs of the wages paid to an AFDCrecipient who is participating in the program. The Act adopted most ofthe existing law. However, there were a few changes made to the work supplementationprogram by the Statute which are discussed below. Currently, only those individuals who would have been eligible for AFDCunder a State IV-A Plan as it was in effect in May 1981, or as modifiedthereafter as required by Federal law, can participate in work supplementation.The Act does not carry over this provision to the JOBS program. Currently, participation in the work supplementation program is voluntary,i.e., the AFDC recipient can elect to participate in work supplementationby accepting an offer of work. However, once the individual enters theprogram, she can be considered a mandatory participant. This is necessaryto insure the integrity of the program and to carry out the agreementswith employers. Under the Act, the State IV-A agency may require an individualwho is not exempt to participate in any appropriate component, includingwork supplementation. <T3>Retrospective Budgeting/Monthly Reporting. </T3>The Deficit ReductionAct of 1984 and interim final rules at andSection; 233.36, published Septemberl0, 1984, provide that State IV-A agencies must require monthly reportsfrom those assistance units with earned income or recent work histories.Additionally, andSection; 233.31(a) provides that all assistance units requiredto file monthly reports must have the amounts of their assistance paymentsdetermined retrospectively. Because work supplementation program participantshave earned income, they have been subject to monthly reporting and retrospectivebudgeting rules. The States, however, had the option to request waiversto exempt such participants from these two requirements. The proposed regulation at andSection; 250.62(g) permits State IV-A agenciesto exempt individuals who are participating in work supplementation fromretrospective budgeting requirements and to determine their monthly paymentsprospectively. This means the amount of assistance payable to the participant'sfamily for any month will be based on the income and other relevant circumstancesin that month. While the legislation does not specifically address the monthly reportingissue, we propose that State IV-A agencies be permitted to exempt participantsin supplemented jobs from monthly reporting without seeking a waiver. Thispolicy is consistent with past practice. Furthermore, exemption from monthlyreporting will allow the States to have one policy for all recipients whosepayments are computed prospectively. <T3>Calculating the Diverted Grant. </T3>The regulation at andSection; 250.62(f)allows the State IV-A agency to ``freeze'' a participant's AFDC grant (residualpayment) as an alternative to monthly recomputations. Under this procedure,upon taking a supplemented job the participant's AFDC base grant is recalculatedconsidering her earnings from the job and any other sources. If her earningsand other income drop her base grant to zero, the entire amount of thegrant is ``diverted'' to a wage pool from which the employer is paid. Ifthe earnings and other income do not cause the complete loss of the basegrant, she receives a ``residual'' payment. The difference between thebase grant and residual payment is diverted to a wage pool.A wage pool is a mechanism which allows States to pool (divert) AFDC grantsnot paid to the WSP participant and pay employers a standardized amountfor all WSP participants' wages. From the Federal perspective, the poolis an account or listing for accumulating and tracking the diverted amountsso that FFP can be claimed when payments are made to employers. The following example illustrates: The potential participant is a parentin a regular AFDC case receiving a monthly grant of $450. A full-time supplementedjob is found which would pay $720 per month. The individual is currentlyeligible for the $30 and \1/3\ and standard earned income disregards, hasno other income, child care is being provided at no cost and no changesare foreseen in the family's needs, income, or resources.<ITAG tagnum="16">Countable Income=$720^$90 (work expense  after 10/1/89)^$30=$600 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="16">   $600^(\1/3\ of $600)=$400 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="16">Residual Payment=$450 (AFDC grant)^$400 (countable income)=$50 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="16">Diverted Grant=$450 (AFDC grant)^$50 (residual payment)=$400</ITAG>If a State elects to ``freeze'' a participant's residual payment, the StateIV-A agency must determine at the time of placement what payment amount,if any, the participant will be eligible for given the hours of work, wagesand other circumstances while participating in a supplemented job. Oncethis initial payment is determined, the amount is ``frozen'', and the participant,if otherwise eligible, receives the same amount (residual payment) foreach month of participation regardless of changes which occur during theparticipation. Even though a participant may be otherwise ineligible forAFDC benefits, she can continue to participate, and the State can continueto receive FFP. Although the basic concept of ``frozen'' grants is attractive, States maybe concerned about their ability to make adjustments in certain limitedcircumstances (for example, when the household size changes). Therefore,State IV-A agencies are permitted to make limited adjustments to a participant'sresidual payment within a ``frozen'' grant policy. Under such a ``partial''freeze, for example, one State might make adjustments only in cases wherethe State's need or payment standards change. Another State might makeadjustments not only under those circumstances, but also where the familysize changes. If a State chooses a partially frozen grant policy, it mustbe consistently applied. That is, if a State IV-A agency provides adjustmentsfor factors which would increase the payment amount, it must also makedownward adjustments if changes in those same factors would cause a decreasein payment amounts. The use of the terms ``frozen'' and ``partially frozen'' grants is notnew. This policy is retained from the previous work supplementation programbecause States feel that freezing grants eases administration of the program.It is also consistent with andSection; 250.62(b)(2) which gives State IV-Aagencies broad discretion in establishing the terms and conditions underwhich jobs, payments, wages, and the conditions of participation are defined.If a participant becomes ineligible for AFDC for any reason other thanearnings from the supplemented job, the individual will not be eligiblefor a residual payment. However, she may continue in the supplemented job.Since she is not due a residual payment, the entire basic grant amountis diverted to the wage pool. For example, if a family becomes ineligiblebecause of the receipt of a lump sum payment, the family would no longerreceive a residual payment, but participation in the supplemented job couldcontinue. <T3>Wage Pool Sampling. </T3>Section 482(e)(2)(F) of the Act allows theStates to use a sampling methodology to determine the amount of money availablefor the wage pool. By selecting a sample of work supplementation casesto determine available monies for the wage pool, State IV-A agencies willnot need to track all grants diverted on an individual basis. Reconciliationof the wage pool for each participant served is eliminated. Reconciliationis still required based on the results of the sample. The State IV-A agencies will need to develop a method to select an unbiasedsample of work supplementation cases of sufficient size to produce statisticallyvalid results when applying this method across the universe of work supplementationparticipants. The method used by the State IV-A agency must be describedin its JOBS plan. <T3>Medicaid Eligibility. </T3>Currently, States have the option to provideMedicaid to the participant and her family if they are otherwise eligible.Section 482(e)(6) of the Act requires that States provide Medicaid coverageto the participant and family members who would be otherwise eligible forAFDC if not participating in work supplementation. The Health Care FinancingAdministration (HCFA) is responsible for issuing regulations to implementthis section of the Statute. <T3>Child Care Eligibility. </T3>In andSection; 250.62(h) we propose to allowState IV-A agencies to provide child care to work supplementation participantsaccording to the same policy that we apply to OJT participants. A morecomplete explanation of this policy is contained in the preamble to andSection;250.61 on OJT.<ITAG tagnum="81">Community Work Experience Program (andSection; 250.63 of the ProposedRegulations) </ITAG>Section 482(f) of the Act provides for a community work experience program(CWEP). The new program generally retains the provisions in the currentlaw, with modifications. The Act allows for training along with actualexperience as ways to improve the employability of participants. We interpretthis to mean that a State IV-A agency can include an element of trainingin a work experience position. Under current law, section 409(a)(1) of the Act, the maximum number ofhours in any month that a participant may be required to work is that numberwhich equals the amount of financial assistance payable to the assistanceunit divided by the greater of the Federal or the applicable State minimumwage. The Statute modifies this calculation to clarify that the State IV-Aagency must deduct any child support collected (except the $50 pass-through)in making the calculation of maximum hours. Section 482(f)(2) of the Act provides that after 6 months of an individual'sparticipation in CWEP and at the conclusion of each work and/or trainingassignment, the State IV-A agency must provide a reassessment and revision,as appropriate, of the individual's employability plan. Section 482(f)(1)(B)(ii) of the Act provides that after an individual isassigned to CWEP for 9 months, she may not be required to continue in theassignment unless the maximum number of hours of participation is no greaterthan the amount of the assistance payment (excluding child support collectedbut not the $50 pass-through) divided by the highest of: (a) The Federalminimum wage; (b) the applicable State minimum wage; or (c) the rate ofpay of individuals employed in the same or similar occupations by the sameemployer at the same site. The provision requiring a State IV-A agency to exclude the amount of aidfor which it is reimbursed by a child support collection from the calculationof the maximum hours an individual must participate is new, although severalStates have done so under current law. Since the reimbursement from thechild support collection will often not occur in the month for which thecalculation of hours is being made, we welcome suggestions, particularlyfrom States which have such calculations, on ways to implement this provisionthat would meet the intent of Congress but would not be overly burdensometo States to apply. We propose to incorporate the provisions of the Food Security Act of 1985(Pub. L. 99-198) regarding the addition of food stamp benefits into thecalculation of CWEP hours. The Food Security Act provides that recipientsare exempt from Food Stamp work registration if they are participatingin an AFDC CWEP program. The Food Security Act gives States the optionof adding food stamp benefits to the AFDC grant in the computation of CWEPhours in these cases. The maximum number of hours that a Food Stamp recipient,who is exempt from Food Stamp work requirements because of participationin CWEP, can be required to participate in CWEP is 120 hours a month. Sincethe Statute makes minimum changes to CWEP in incorporating its basic provisionsinto JOBS, we propose to consider JOBS CWEP to be the same as AFDC CWEPfor the purposes of this provision. The Act allows States to have other work experience programs. States mayoffer such programs if they are described in the State JOBS plan and approvedby the Secretary. An alternative work experience program could be modeledafter the WIN work experience program in which a participant is assignedto a full-time, temporary position for a limited number of weeks. Sucha program gives the participant the experience of working full-time andlearning what the demands of full-time employment are, both on the joband at home. Alternative work experience programs offer States the opportunityto be more creative and may be less burdensome administratively. Any alternativework program is subject to the FFP limitations at andSection; 250.63(j) andthe general program standards contained in section 484 of the Act.Subpart H_Funding <ITAG tagnum="81">JOBS Allocation Entitlement (andSection; 250.70 of the Proposed Regulations)</ITAG>Federal funding for JOBS is provided as a capped entitlement. The amountof funds available to a State with an approved JOBS plan under title IV-Fis determined by the formula provided in the proposed regulation at andSection;250.70(b). Unlike funds authorized under title IV-A, which is an open-endedentitlement program, funds not obligated by the end of the fiscal yearcannot be carried over, as stated in the proposed regulation at andSection;250.70(c). States will be required to liquidate all obligations incurred during afiscal year within one year after the end of that fiscal year. The liquidationperiod for grant programs subject to the regulations at Part 92 is normally90 days (andSection; 92.23(b)). However, we are proposing to permit one yearfor liquidation in the regulation at andSection; 250.70(d) for the JOBS programbecause we recognize that States may need more flexibility in administeringthe program. <ITAG tagnum="81">Allotment of JOBS Limit of Entitlement (andSection; 250.71 of the ProposedRegulations) </ITAG>All States are required to have an operating JOBS program effective October1, 1990. However, States may begin operating a JOBS program before thatdate. At the earliest, States may begin their JOBS programs on July 1,1989. Funding proportional to the quarters the program is in operationin the State in a given fiscal year will be provided as described in theproposed regulation at andSection; 250.71(a). JOBS funding for Puerto Rico, Guam, the Virgin Islands, and American Samoais not subject to the funding restrictions at section 1108 of the SocialSecurity Act (see the proposed regulation at andSection; 250.71(c)(1)). Forthese jurisdictions, the costs related to the provision of child care underPart 255 are subject to the JOBS limit of entitlement. This includes thecosts of child care services and related administrative costs (see theproposed regulations at andSection; 250.71(c)(2)). For these same jurisdictions,the costs related to the provision of transitional child care servicesunder Part 256, which includes the cost of the services and the relatedadministrative costs, are available for matching under title IV-A (seethe proposed regulations at andSection; 250.71(c)(3)). The JOBS program provides direct funding to Indian Tribal and Alaska Nativeorganizations. The Federal funds available to Tribes and organizationsconstitute a reduction to the allotment of the State in which the Tribeor organization is located. The proposed regulations at andSection; 250.90provide the specific requirements for Indian Tribal and Alaska Native organizationparticipation in the JOBS program. <ITAG tagnum="81">Maintenance of Effort (andSection; 250.72 of the Proposed Regulations)</ITAG>Funding for the JOBS program is not intended to refinance existing programs,but to add to the effort of assisting individuals to avoid long-term dependency.We interpret this purpose to mean that JOBS funds are not to be used toreplace non-Federal funds to pay for education, training, and employmentactivities which were already in existence prior to a State's implementationof the JOBS program. The proposed regulation at andSection; 250.72(a) defines``non-Federal'' funds. State and local funding for the purposes of the JOBS program must not beless than State and local expenditures incurred in fiscal year 1986 foreducation, training, and employment activities dedicated to assist AFDCindividuals in becoming self-sufficient, as provided in the proposed regulationat andSection; 250.72(b). Examples of types of expenditures included in thisfiscal year 1986 ``maintenance of effort'' provision are: A State's shareof costs incurred in operating the title IV-A work programs and the WIN,or WIN Demonstration, program, as appropriate; a State's costs for a GEDprogram operated in behalf of welfare recipients and applicants; a State'sshare of costs incurred in operating a State education, training, or workprogram for welfare recipients including AFDC recipients; a State's costsfor work-related supportive services, such as child care, also incurredin this effort. The proposed regulations at andSection; 250.72 (c) and (d) establish theconditions under which FFP will be provided for expenditures certifiedfor activities that are not otherwise available to the JOBS participant.We are proposing that FFP will not be provided for activities and servicesthat are otherwise available to an AFDC recipient on a non-reimbursablebasis. Thus, it would not be permissible to begin claiming the costs ofAFDC recipients' high school attendance as an expenditure for JOBS. Norwould it be permissible to claim subsidy costs where the State has hada program in effect to subsidize an activity for low-income residents;however, under JOBS a State could pay for the portion that was not previouslysubsidized. On the other hand, it would be a permissible JOBS expenditureto pay for an additional education program established solely for AFDCrecipients.<ITAG tagnum="81">Matching Rates (andSection; 250.73 of the Proposed Regulations) </ITAG>JOBS program activities are subject to three different rates of FFP. TheFFP rate for that part of the total JOBS funds comprised of the States'WIN or WIN Demonstration allotment for FY 1987 is 90 percent. This ratemay be applied toward any allowable cost of the JOBS program. A State's10 percent share may be in the form of cash or in the form of in-kind contributions.Section 403(1)(1)(B) of the Act does not provide a definition of ``in-kind'';it states only that it be fairly evaluated. Therefore, in order to provideStates flexibility in this area, we are proposing to permit a State's shareof in-kind to be State in-kind or third party in-kind contributions. Thisis currently the practice for the WIN program and we propose to incorporatethis practice in the JOBS program but only for this portion of the fundingfor JOBS. <T3>Costs Matched at the FMAP Rate with a 60 Percent Floor. </T3>Federalmatching under the JOBS program is also available at a State's Medicaidmatching rate (the FMAP) for certain costs of the program that exceed aState's WIN or WIN Demonstration allotment. In this category, for the purposesof the JOBS program, the minimum matching rate is 60 percent. Expenditures which may be claimed in this category are the personnel costs(defined throughout the preamble and proposed regulations as salary andbenefits only) of full-time staff involved in any capacity of the JOBSprogram, whether programmatically or administratively. Full-time staffare those individuals employed for a normal work week according to a State'sdefinition of full-time. We propose that States cannot count part-timestaff as full time with a full-time equivalency measure. The Act provides the same match rate for those full-time JOBS employeeswho will be involved in administrative functions such as: assessing theneeds of JOBS participants and developing appropriate employability plans;accounting; systems operation; and supervision. The assessment of childcare needs and referral to appropriate services for JOBS participants canbe matched at this rate when performed by a full-time JOBS employee. The match rate also applies to costs associated with a JOBS participant'sinvolvement in a component of the program. This includes program costs,such as OJT payments to an employer or tuition and fees for GED classes,if not precluded by the proposed regulations at andSection; 250.48. It alsoincludes the personnel costs of staff and first-line supervisors directlyproviding component services to participants on less than a full-time basis.The costs of equipment, supplies, and materials that are used by a JOBSparticipant while she is actively participating in a JOBS component areavailable at the FMAP rate (with a minimum of 60 percent). However, indirectcosts are not matchable at this rate. <T3>Costs Matched at 50 Percent. </T3>The FFP rate of 50 percent for theJOBS program includes the costs of general administrative activities. Thisincludes personnel costs of staff administering the program on less thana full-time basis and all other non-staff costs not matchable at the programmatching rate. Administrative costs include, for example, personnel costsfor case managers and program planners not employed full-time for the JOBSprogram. FFP at 50 percent is available within the JOBS cap funding limitfor both direct and indirect costs, such as utilities and space. (See OMBCircular No. A-87.) A State's share of costs at the program matching rate or at the administrativematching rate must be in cash. In-kind contributions, whether State in-kindor third party in-kind, cannot be used as the State's share. State agencies are encouraged to seek financial support from private sourcesto develop and enhance JOBS program activities and other activities whichhelp individuals to become self-sufficient. Funds donated from privatesources for the JOBS program may be considered as a portion of a State'sshare of matching costs if such funds meet the criteria of andSection; 235.66.<ITAG tagnum="81">Reduced Matching Rate (andSection; 250.74 of the Proposed Regulation)</ITAG><T3>Target Groups. </T3>For the JOBS program, the Act provides certainsafeguards to assure that the increased Federal funding intended to assistindividuals in avoiding long-term dependency is directed largely towardsthose individuals who are most in need of assistance. The proposed regulationat andSection; 250.74(a) provides that if, in any fiscal year, a State failsto expend 55 percent of its JOBS allotment on members of the State's targetpopulation as defined in proposed andSection; 250.1, the Federal matchingrate for all JOBS expenditures for that same year will be reduced to 50percent. The Secretary, however, may waive this reduction if a State cansatisfactorily demonstrate that the characteristics of the caseload inthat State make it infeasible to meet the requirements of the proposedregulation at andSection; 250.74(a) and that the State is targeting otherlong-term or potential long-term recipients. <T3>Participation Rates. </T3>To ensure that States effectively serve thepurpose of the JOBS program, section 403(1)(3)(A) of the Act establishesparticipation rates that States should meet for fiscal years 1990 through1995. The proposed regulation at andSection; 250.30 and its accompanyingpreamble describe participation requirements under the JOBS program. Theterm ``participation'' is defined in the proposed regulations at andSection;250.1. Failure to meet the participation rates, which are defined in the proposedregulation at andSection; 250.74(b), will reduce the matching rate for allJOBS expenditures to 50 percent. The participation rate for fiscal year1990 is 7 percent; however, States are not subject to a reduction in theFederal matching rate to 50 percent in the following fiscal year. Fiscalyear 1992 is the first year in which States will become liable for reductionof FFP for failure to meet the participation rates (for failure to meetthe fiscal year 1991 standard). Methods for determining participation ratesare included in the proposed regulations at andSection; 250.74(b) (2) and(3). The Secretary may waive in full or in part any penalties applicable toa State for not meeting these participation rates. The proposed regulationsat andSection; 250.74(b)(4) provide the conditions under which a full orpartial waiver may be granted. <T3>AFDC-UP Participation Rates. </T3>JOBS participation rates for theAFDC-unemployed parent (AFDC-UP) program have also been established bythe Act and appear in the proposed regulations at andSection; 250.74(c)(1).AFDC-UP participation rate requirements go into effect in fiscal year 1994,and the first penalty would be imposed in fiscal year 1995. While the statutory language refers to waiving the penalty for not meetingthe participation rates, and sets the waiver criteria, the actual penaltyis not defined in the Act. We believe it is appropriate that the penaltyfor failure to meet the AFDC-UP participation rates be a reduction to 50percent in FFP. This penalty is identical to the penalty established inthe Act for failure to meet the general participation rates. It is alsoconsistent with the penalty established for failure to expend 55 percentof JOBS funds on targeted groups. As an alternative, we considered applying the penalties cited under section404 of the Act for failure to substantially comply with the provisionsof section 402(a). The appropriate penalties under this section includethe withholding of all AFDC grant funds to a State or the withholding ofcertain funds limited to specific categories. However, we concluded thatthis penalty would be too harsh. The Secretary may waive in full or in part any penalties applied to a Statefor not meeting the participation rates for the AFDC-UP program. The proposedregulations at andSection; 250.74(c)(3) provide the conditions under whicha full or partial waiver may be applied.<ITAG tagnum="81">Activities Excluded from FFP (andSection; 250.75 of the Proposed Regulations)</ITAG>There are certain activities for which Federal matching under the JOBSprogram is not available under any circumstance. These are identified inthe proposed regulations at andSection; 250.75. In addition, there are certaincosts unallowable for FFP that apply only to the community work experienceprogram and alternative work experience programs included in an approvedJOBS plan. The proposed regulations pertaining to these unallowable costsare located at andSection; 250.63(j). <ITAG tagnum="81">Financial Reports, Records, Statements and Audits (andSection; 250.76of the Proposed Regulations) </ITAG>Grants provided under the JOBS program of title IV-F are subject to thegrant management regulations at Part 92. These regulations apply to federally-assistedprograms that are not funded as open-ended entitlement programs, such asthe AFDC program. (For the AFDC program, the grant regulations at Part74 continue to apply.) The following provisions of Part 74 also apply togrants subject to Part 92: andSection;andSection; 74.62(a), 74.173, 74.174(b),74.304, 74.710, and 74.715. With respect to these regulations, States are reminded that all claimsfor Federal reimbursement must be supported by appropriate documentation.JOBS funds under title IV-F are subject to audit and financial and programmaticreview. Claims for improper costs under the JOBS program will be subjectto disallowance. Comments are specifically requested on a standard samplingprocedure (within the guidelines found in andSection; 250.80) to determinesuch disallowances. Disallowance procedures for JOBS funds will be similarto the disallowance procedures for the AFDC program. Where appropriate,expenditures of the JOBS program are subject to the cost allocation provisionsat Part 95, Subpart E. <ITAG tagnum="81">Costs Matchable as AFDC Payments (andSection; 250.77 of the ProposedRegulations) </ITAG>Section 402(a)(19)(H) of the Act specifies that costs incurred by the Statefor supplemental payments to families so that they do not experience anet loss of cash income, pursuant to andSection; 250.35, shall be treatedas title IV-A costs. However, they are not considered AFDC benefit paymentsfor any purpose. Payments to employers in the work supplementation program include partor all of an AFDC grant that has been diverted to cover part of the wagespaid to an AFDC recipient participating in this program (see proposed regulationsat andSection; 250.62(1)). Because these payments are AFDC benefit payments,they are available for Federal matching under the AFDC program.Subpart I_Uniform Data Collection Requirements <ITAG tagnum="81">Uniform Data Collection Requirements (andSection; 250.80 of the ProposedRegulations) </ITAG>The Family Support Act imposes substantial reporting requirements relatedto the JOBS program and its attendant child care provisions. Section 487(b)of the Social Security Act contains a minimal set of uniform reportingrequirements that may be augmented as the Secretary determines. Section403(e), among other data elements, requires a State to provide informationon the use of child care by AFDC recipients. The Act also implicitly establishes reporting requirements by conditioningenhanced FFP on meeting requirements for certain levels of participationand for a minimum expenditure level for certain target groups. In order to meet the above reporting requirements, we are proposing thatStates be required to submit electronically on an ongoing basis a sampleof unaggregated case records of JOBS participants in each month with aminimal set of data elements as prescribed in andSection; 250.82. The caserecords would be identified by a State-supplied substitute for the SocialSecurity Number. The sample in a State would have to be of sufficient sizeto provide accurate data at the State level, plus or minus one percentagepoint, at a 95 percent confidence level, for all data elements necessaryto determine whether a State qualifies for enhanced FFP under any of theprovisions of andSection; 250.74. In addition to this sample, States would submit aggregate reports on aquarterly basis of the number of non-exempt AFDC recipients. Finally, inlieu of a cost tracking system that would identify all funds spent on eachindividual member of the State's target population, we propose that a Statedevelop a table of average total unit cost per component and service madeavailable by the State. The table would be updated annually. We proposeto use activity data submitted in the State's sample of unaggregated caserecord data, as discussed above, in conjunction with the State's tableof costs, to determine whether the State has met the 55 percent requirement.We are offering the above described approach as an alternative to requiringperiodic aggregate, hard-copy reporting. We propose this sample in lieuof aggregate reporting because we believe it will meet statutory reportingrequirements, provide more useful information to the Federal government,and be less burdensome to States. Very few of the data elements are notdirectly involved in meeting an explicit or implicit statutory reportingrequirement. On the other hand, we foresee the possibility that a sample-based reportingrequirement may introduce levels of complexity for States. We also anticipatethat in States with relatively smaller numbers of AFDC cases, a State mayfind it less burdensome to submit the universe of their case records, ratherthan develop a sample that might need to approach the universe in orderto achieve the required levels of accuracy. The rule would allow universereporting in lieu of a sample. The above described method of reporting would place a more substantialburden on the Department than simply handling input of hard-copy reportforms from the States. Nonetheless, the overall approach may be of sufficientvalue both to States and the Department, that the additional complexitiesand burdens would be worth the effort. We invite comment, particularlywith regard to operational implications for the States. Given the substantial data reporting requirements mandated statutorily,we have attempted to keep additional reporting requirements to a minimum.However, many individuals and organizations with whom we have consultedhave urged us to collect outcome information such as job entries, welfaregrant reductions, case closures and retained employment for JOBS participants.We realize that such information is frequently requested by legislativebodies and by the public, and that some States might want to compare themselvesto others with respect to the measures cited above. Others have commentedthat the interpretation of these data is ambiguous and that there is anadditional burden that collecting them would place on States. We have notincluded outcome measures or other types of measures, such as receipt oftransition services, in these proposed regulations, but we may includesuch reporting requirements in the Final Rule. We invite comment with respectto the utility and the data collection burden of outcome measure reporting.<ITAG tagnum="81">State Data Systems Options (andSection; 250.81 of the Proposed Regulation)</ITAG>Given the large number of individuals who may participate in the JOBS programand the detailed nature of the subcategories of data required by the Statute,we believe it is unlikely that a State can either operate its program effectivelyor meet the minimum requirements in the Statute without an automated client-basedinformation system. To these ends, we propose in andSection; 250.81 to permitvarious rates of FFP for different parts of the system needed to operatethe JOBS program effectively. For the sake of distinguishing this subsystemfrom all others in a State's welfare data system, we refer here and inthe definitions in andSection; 250.1, to a State's JOBS Automated System,or JAS. We propose that all requirements of andSection; 95.611, and of andSection;205.37, be met with regard to any funding for a State's JAS. We propose three JAS funding arrangements be available to the States. TitleIV-F funding at 50 percent FFP would be available for a State's JAS. TitleIV-A funding, also at 50 percent FFP, would be available for the interfacebetween a State's IV-A system and its JAS, if the State's  IV-A systemis a non-FAMIS system. For the interface between a State's JAS and a FAMISIV-A system, title IV-A FFP would be available at 90 percent. We propose the interface of an automated JOBS program with the title IV-AFAMIS system, for verification of eligibility and reconciliation of data,would include planning, development and implementation of title IV-A subsystemsto: (1) Manage information on eligibility factors or target group membership;(2) effect notifications and referrals including non-cooperation; (3) checkrecords of applicants and recipients on a periodic basis with other agenciesto verify continued eligibility; and (4) notify appropriate officials whena recipient ceases to be eligible.  <ITAG tagnum="81">Required Case Record Data (andSection; 250.82 of the Proposed Regulation)</ITAG>In this section we propose a minimum content for the case record that willpermit our derivation of all reportable data required by the several partsof the Statute and the Act noted with regard to andSection; 250.80 above.We specify this minimum, in part, in support of the proposed submissionof a sample of unaggregated case record data. However, we believe thisapproach also enables States to record the minimum data necessary to operatethe JOBS program effectively. We particularly seek comment on States' viewsas to whether some or all of the minimal case record data should be requiredfor all JOBS participants, or only for the sample of cases the State wouldbe required to submit to the Department.  Subpart J-Operation of Jobs Programs by Indian Tribes and Alaska NativeOrganizations <ITAG tagnum="81">Scope and Purpose (andSection; 250.90 of the Proposed Regulations) </ITAG>The Statute provides that Indian Tribes and Alaska Native organizationsmay apply to the Secretary by April I3, 1989 for direct funding to conducta JOBS program. Tribal (refers to both Indian Tribes and Alaska Nativeorganizations) groups had to apply by this date in order to receive directJOBS funding in any future year. The Department issued initial application guidelines (FSA-AT-89-11) onFebruary 24, 1989, to officials of federally recognized Indian Tribes andAlaska Native organizations. Based on comments received from Tribal leaders,requesting that the April 13, 1989 application not be treated as a finaldocument, and on the fact that we were still developing Federal policyat the time these guidelines were issued, we advised Tribal applicantsthat we would not disapprove their applications based on their initialsubmittal. We also advised applicants that we would issue further guidanceafter April 13, 1989. <ITAG tagnum="81">Eligible Indian Tribe and Alaska Native Organization Grantees (andSection;250.91 of the Proposed Regulations) </ITAG>The proposed regulations clarify the general eligibility requirements ofthe Act concerning Indian Tribes. They reflect congressional intent thatan Indian Tribe must be recognized by the Federal government as eligibleto receive services from the Bureau of Indian Affairs in order to be eligiblefor the JOBS program. Specifically, Report 100-37 of the Senate Committeeon Finance (p. 39) states that `` * * * an Indian tribe is any tribe, band,nation, or other organized group or community of Indians * * * that isrecognized by the Federal government as eligible for services from theBureau of Indian Affairs and is located on a reservation * * *.'' In addition, consortia or Tribal organizations representing eligible Tribesmay operate a JOBS program if they meet certain conditions. These conditionsprovide that such consortia or organizations have the managerial and administrativecapacity to operate the program and have received documented authorityfrom the participating Tribes to conduct the program on their behalf. <ITAG tagnum="81">Selection Criteria for Eligible Alaska Native Organizations (andSection;250.92 of the Proposed Regulations) </ITAG>The Act is very specific about the program eligibility of Alaska Nativeorganizations. It limits Departmental approval to only one applicationfrom an Alaska Native organization for each of the 12 geographical regions.The proposed rules establish criteria which the Department will use todesignate the Alaskan Native organization grantee. The criteria are verysimilar to those used by JTPA in designating Native American grantees forits program. However, since under the JOBS program the Alaska Native granteemust serve all eligible Native Alaskans residing in the region in whichthe grantee is located, we have specifically required that the granteedemonstrate either that it has previous experience in operating regionwideprograms or that it can establish the capability to effectively administerthe program throughout the region. <ITAG tagnum="81">Funding Formula (andSection; 250.93 of the Proposed Regulations) </ITAG>The Act specifies that JOBS funding for an Indian Tribe is based on thenumber of adult members of the Tribe receiving AFDC compared to the totalnumber of adult AFDC recipients in the State. The formula for Alaska Nativeorganizations is based on the number of adult Alaska Natives receivingAFDC who reside within the boundaries of the region which the Alaska Nativeorganization represents compared to the total number of adult AFDC recipientsin the State of Alaska. Since the Act does not establish a designated geographical service areafor Tribes, as it does for Alaska Native organizations, the proposed rulesdefine such area. The Tribe will receive JOBS funds based on the numberof adult members of the Tribe receiving AFDC who reside in the designatedservice area as compared to the total number of adult AFDC recipients inthe State. Thus, the designated area creates a manageable program servicearea which permits funds to be provided based on those Tribal members whocould realistically be served by the Tribe. The State IV-A agency willbe expected to provide JOBS services to Tribal recipients outside of thedesignated area. A designated service area concept is used in various otherprograms such as JTPA, the Community Services Block Grant and those underthe Bureau of Indian Affairs (BIA). State IV-A agencies and Tribes or organizations have a mutual responsibilityto share all available information so a funding level can be calculated.Accordingly, the proposed regulations specify that the State IV-A agencyand the Tribe or organization must exchange available information on adultTribal AFDC recipients needed to determine the estimated number of theeligible Tribal recipients and to define the designated service area, ifother than the reservation or trust lands, as appropriate. This requirementreflects the fact that the State IV-A agency is the most appropriate sourceof data relating to AFDC recipient status. However, many State IV-A agenciescannot identify individuals in their caseload by Tribal affiliation andthus will probably need membership or residence information from Tribesor organizations to verify Tribal AFDC recipient status. We recognize that State IV-A agencies and Indian Tribes or Alaska Nativeorganizations may have difficulty developing data on adult Tribal AFDCrecipients, especially using the definition of adult recipient containedin the Act (i.e., an individual other than a dependent child, includinga minor custodial parent of another dependent child, who is receiving AFDC).Because of these data deficiencies, we strongly encourage Indian Tribesor Alaska Native organizations and State IV-A agencies to enter into agreementswhich establish population estimates as well as service area definitions,as appropriate. If a State IV-A agency and Tribe or organization cannotagree on the number of Tribal eligible recipients and/or the designatedservice area, the Department will, in consultation with the Tribe or organizationand the State IV-A agency, make the final determination. Non-Tribal recipients in a designated area are subject to the requirementsof the State's JOBS program. However, a State IV-A agency may through contract(or other referral arrangement) authorize an Indian Tribe grantee to servenon-Tribal members residing in the designated service area. The State IV-Aagency may only delegate to a Indian Tribe grantee those functions whichdo not involve agency discretionary judgment, as discussed in proposedandSection; 250.10 and related sections of the preamble.<ITAG tagnum="81">Program Administration, Implementation and Operations (andSection; 250.94of the Proposed Regulations) </ITAG><T3>Program Administration. </T3>Under the proposed rules, the Tribe ororganization must designate an administrative entity, such as the socialservices agency or the Tribal JTPA agency, to be responsible for the administrationof the JOBS program. This responsibility for program administration includesall the requirements under the Act, unless waived under proposed andSection;250.96, as well as applicable requirements under all other related Federalregulations. Such regulations include the general funding provisions underPart 92 which are generally applicable to Tribal administration of Federalprograms (as reflected in andSection; andSection; 250.13 and 250.77 of theproposed rules) and the joint Department of Labor/Department of Healthand Human Services regulations being developed which cover worker's issuessuch as working conditions and displacement, as appropriate. The responsibility to administer JOBS means that the Tribe or organizationhas the responsibility for program functions such as exemption and prioritydeterminations, orientation, referrals, assessment and development of theemployability plan, JOBS activities and hearings involving JOBS participationissues. However, the proposed regulations clarify that certain other relatedfunctions, such as imposition of sanctions, are retained by the State IV-Aagency based on its responsibility to administer the IV-A program. Forinstance, if the Tribe or organization determines that an individual failedto meet participation requirements, the State IV-A agency would be responsiblefor making the necessary AFDC payment changes, after the individual hasbeen afforded appropriate due process. Part 255 proposes that the State IV-A agency (which receives matching Federalfunds under title III of the Statute to guarantee child care for JOBS participants)provide necessary child care for Tribal participants either directly orthrough contract with the Tribe or organization. Also, under Part 256 theState IV-A agency is responsible for transitional child care benefits.Because of these interrelated functions, we encourage State IV-A agenciesand Tribal grantees to enter into agreements to develop the referral andoperating procedures necessary for effective program implementation. <T3>Implementation. </T3>The proposed rules permit the Tribe or organizationto begin its JOBS program before the State implements its program. Thisprovision reflects the sovereignty of the Tribe or organization to operateits program to the full extent allowable under the Act. Given that proposedandSection; 255.2(f) requires the State IV-A agency to guarantee child carenecessary for Tribal members' participation, this proposed section (andSection;250.94) of the regulations provides options to permit a Tribe or organizationto conduct its program prior to the State's implementation. During theperiod prior to the State's implementation of the program, these optionspermit the Tribe or organization to either guarantee necessary child carefor its participants or to operate its program on an entirely voluntarybasis. These provisions are discussed in detail in the proposed andSection;250.95 and accompanying preamble concerning supportive services. Also, the proposed rules and the initial application guidelines (FSA-AT-89-11)require that the Tribe or organization submit its application with finaldocumentation to the Department at least 45 days prior to implementationto provide sufficient opportunity for the Secretary's review and approval.Similar to the requirements for State IV-A agencies at andSection; 250.20(b),the proposed rules indicate that the Tribe or organization may not beginits JOBS program prior to approval by the Secretary. Prior approval isnecessary given the complexity of the program, the needed interface whichmust occur between the Tribal applicant and the IV-A agency, and the factthat Tribal programs represent a whole new direction for welfare work programs.<T3>Operations. </T3>This section of the proposed regulations exempts Tribesand organizations from the requirements of andSection; 250.12 in order tospecify appropriate coordination requirements for Tribal grantees. Underthis proposed section, the Tribe or organization is required to provideits application to the State IV-A agency prior to its submittal to theDepartment. This is to ensure that necessary interface with the State IV-Aagency has been established, including the development of agreements ormethodologies, to assure that Tribal recipients receive equitable treatmentunder both the AFDC and JOBS programs. The proposed rules also indicate the appropriate agencies and programswith which the Tribe or organization must coordinate. The coordinationrequirements reflect congressional concern that agencies administeringJOBS identify available resources from other programs in order to preventduplication of services, to assure that the maximum level of services isavailable to participants and to ensure that costs of these other programservices for which welfare recipients have been eligible are not shiftedto the JOBS program. This latter provision is closely related to the provisionson maintenance of effort which are described in the proposed andSection;250.98 and preamble. Furthermore, although Tribal grantees would be subject to andSection; 250.44,which covers mandatory components, they would not be subject to andSection;250.45, which covers optional components. The proposed andSection; 250.94(e)instead requires Tribal JOBS programs to include four mandatory componentsand at least one optional component. The following program design modificationis proposed to more realistically reflect the special circumstances andneeds of Tribal grantees. Because the four mandatory components cover basic education, training andemployment activities, many of which should be available to Tribal participantsthrough other program resources, we believe that most Tribal programs shouldbe able to offer all four components. For example, many literacy programsshould be available to Tribal recipients through the Office of Indian Educationand, thus, would not be funded under JOBS. The Tribal program need include only one optional component. Of the fouroptions given to States, two components_community work experience program(CWEP) and the work supplementation program_are integrally linked withAFDC recipient grants. Thus, the proposed rules require that adequate operationalagreements be worked out between the State IV-A agency and Tribal granteebefore the Department can approve these components. A Tribe is permitted to include, as an optional component, a work experienceprogram as approved by the Secretary or alternative education, training,and employment activities as approved by the Secretary. We would approve,for example, an alternative work experience program which generally metthe requirements of a CWEP, JTPA, or BIA work experience program. Tribesor organizations are cautioned that in order to receive approval of alternativeeducation, training and employment activities, such approaches must beconsistent with the purpose of the JOBS program to reduce welfare dependencyand must serve only eligible AFDC recipients. Thus, if JOBS is linked withanother program such as JTPA, a Tribal grantee must be able to validatethat JOBS funds were used only to serve Tribal JOBS participants. Thesestipulations are proposed to protect the integrity of the program. Basedon congressional concern as well as our careful consideration, the proposedrules further indicate that JOBS funds not be used for public service employmentor for allowances.<ITAG tagnum="81">Supportive Services (andSection; 250.95 of the Proposed Regulations)</ITAG>Under the proposed rules, the Tribal grantee must provide for the work-relatedsupportive services, such as clothing or transportation, necessary to enablean individual to participate in the JOBS program. Tribes or organizationsmust follow the proposed requirements regarding work-related supportiveservices under Part 255. The Tribal grantee is given flexibility to determinethe types of supportive services and methods of delivery but must describethese services/methods in its application documentation pursuant to proposedandSection; 250.97(f)(6). Since State IV-A agencies are required to provide child care under Part255 of the proposed regulations, this section proposes that the Tribe ororganization must ensure, based on a method which is acceptable to theTribe or organization and the State, that necessary child care is availablewhen requiring an individual to participate in its program. Since the StateIV-A agency will be providing child care services and the Tribe or organizationwill be designating who participates, we strongly encourage Tribal granteesto develop with State IV-A agencies appropriate referral mechanisms toensure that Tribal participants receive necessary child care services.In addition, we are encouraging State IV-A agencies to contract with Tribalgrantees for providing child care services for Tribal participants. The proposed regulations at andSection; 255.2(f) are designed to ensure thatStates provide sufficient funds to meet the child care needs of Tribalparticipants and that States use comparable and appropriate methods ofproviding child care for Tribal participants as they use for non-Tribalparticipants in the State. The Tribe or organization may guarantee childcare for its participants through other program sources. If the Tribe or organization begins its JOBS program before the State IV-Aagency, the Tribal grantee can operate an entirely voluntary program. However,after the State implements its JOBS program, the Tribe or organizationmay no longer operate an entirely voluntary program, and necessary childcare must be arranged to require non-exempt individuals to participate.This provision is consistent with congressional concern, as reflected bythe participation and exemption requirements in andSection; 250.30, thatindividuals who are reasonably able to participate in the program, andfor whom guaranteed child care is available, should be required to participate.<ITAG tagnum="81">Waiver Authority (andSection; 250.96 of the Proposed Regulations) </ITAG>This proposed section indicates that certain requirements of the Act andof the proposed rules do not apply to Tribal grantees, as they are uniqueto State programs. These include provisions relating to State agency administration,the State's JOBS funding allotment or State matching requirements. Thus,these have been determined to be inappropriate for Tribal JOBS programsby the Secretary pursuant to his authority under the Act. A Tribe or organization may also request waivers for any other requirementsof the Act not specifically mentioned but must provide proper justification.The Secretary would consider the appropriateness of such waivers on a case-by-casebasis.<ITAG tagnum="81">Application Requirements and Documentation (andSection; 250.97 of theProposed Regulations) </ITAG>The proposed Tribal application requirements generally follow State JOBSplan requirements, which are discussed in detail in proposed andSection;250.20 and related preamble. Under the Act, Tribes and organizations had to apply to the Departmentby April 13, 1989, in order to conduct a JOBS program. Since we were stilldeveloping JOBS policies at the time we released guidelines for Tribalapplication, we advised Tribal groups in the application notice (FSA-AT-89-11)that their April 13 submissions would probably need to be supplemented.We believe that the additional application documentation proposed in thissection is necessary in order to provide the Secretary with a sufficientlevel of information upon which to base approval. We determined that thisadditional documentation was needed, based on our review of all the requirementsreflected in the Act and those being proposed for State JOBS programs.Because of the complexity of the JOBS program requirements and the degreeof program flexibility we would like to provide Tribal grantees under ourwaiver authority, we do not think these application requirements imposean undue administrative burden upon Tribal grantees. The application mustserve as the Department's primary vehicle for assessing whether a Tribalgrantee is meeting the requirements of the Act and regulations. <ITAG tagnum="81">Maintenance of Effort for Indian Tribes and Alaska Native Organizations(andSection; 250.98 of the Proposed Regulations) </ITAG>Tribal grantees are not subject to the requirements in proposed andSection;250.72. Proposed andSection; 250.98 makes maintenance of effort provisionsmore appropriate for Tribal entities. The proposed requirements on maintenanceof effort reflect congressional concern that JOBS funding not be used tosupplant existing funding for programs which have been available for welfarerecipients. This means that JOBS funds should be used only to provide educational,training and employment activities for Tribal participants which are inaddition to those which would otherwise be available. For example, wherea high school education has been available to Tribal members, JOBS fundsmust not be used to pay for this activity. Thus, the Tribal grantee maynot contract for services which are otherwise available on a non-reimbursablebasis pursuant to the proposed regulation at andSection; 250.13. <ITAG tagnum="85">Part 255_Child Care and Other Work-Related Supportive Services DuringParticipation in Employment, Education, and Training </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="81">Purpose (andSection; 255.0 of the Proposed Regulations) </ITAG>The purpose for the issuance of the proposed regulations is to implementsection 301 of the Family Support Act of 1988.<ITAG tagnum="81">State Plan Requirements (andSection; 255.l of the Proposed Regulations)</ITAG>Title III of the Statute adds section 402(g) to title IV-A of the Act.Thus, child care is not part of the title IV-A plan which is covered insection 402(a) of the Act. Neither is it included in the State JOBS planunder title IV-F, which is covered in section 482(a) of the Act. In fact,section 402(g) does not address whether a plan is needed regarding theprovision of supportive services. However, we propose that services providedunder sections 301 and 302 of the Statute be covered by a separate plansubmitted in accordance with these regulations. Further, we propose thatthe State Supportive Services plan covering services under section 301of the Statute be submitted at the same time as the JOBS plan to ensureappropriate public and Federal review. The approval process will followthat for the State JOBS plan which is specified in andSection; 250.20. We propose that the State Supportive Services plan contain informationabout child care services, work-related supportive services, and work-relatedexpenses necessary for JOBS. We propose to require a description of theservices in the State Supportive Services plan. We further propose to askthe State IV-A agency to cross reference the State Supportive Servicesplan in their State JOBS plan to show the coordination between the twoplans. The specific State Supportive Services plan requirements are containedat andSection; 255.1. In States where Tribal entities are direct-funded tooperate a JOBS program, the State Supportive Services plan must includespecific information on the State's provision of child care services forJOBS participants served by those Tribal entities. <ITAG tagnum="81">Eligibility (andSection; 255.2 of the Proposed Regulations) </ITAG>Section 402(g) of the Act provides that the State IV-A agency must guaranteechild care to the extent that the State determines necessary for an individualin a family with a dependent child to: (1) Accept or maintain employment,or (2) participate in an education and training activity if the agencyapproves the activity and periodically determines that the individual issatisfactorily participating in the activity. (Such education and trainingis not limited to activities funded under JOBS.) Where the State IV-A agencydetermines that child care is necessary, it cannot require an individualto participate in an activity or to accept or maintain employment unlessit guarantees child care. <T3>Child Care Guarantee. </T3>The State IV-A agency must guarantee childcare for an eligible family if resources are available. The guarantee maybe limited by State appropriation ceilings, the available supply of otherState, local and federally-funded services, such as title XX services,and the target group priorities. We propose that the state should assurein its Supportive Services plan that child care provided or claimed forreimbursement is reasonably related to the hours of participation or employment.The State IV-A agency must also assure that sufficient child care willbe available to meet the participation rates described in andSection; 250.74.We propose that the State Supportive Services plan must describe how sufficientchild care will be made available as a condition of plan approval. We areparticularly interested in comments intended to further specify State planrequirements for a ``description of how the State will assure that sufficientchild care will be available to meet participation rates in andSection; 250.74.''A State IV-A agency is not required to treat child care benefits underthis Part of the proposed regulations as an absolute entitlement and toprovide all employed recipients and participants in JOBS with child carebenefits. Frequently, child care is provided through informal arrangementsat no cost. The child care guarantee does not mean that paid child caremust be available for every participant. In determining whether child careis necessary, the State IV-A agency may take into account informal care.We propose to limit the guarantee of child care to those families withdependent children under 13 or who are physically or mentally incapableof caring for themselves, when the State IV-A agency determines such careis necessary. Limiting child care to these situations is a reasonable policy,consistent with the limits enacted for the Dependent Child Care Tax Creditby section 703(a) of the Family Support Act, and, which will apply to taxableyears beginning after December 31, 1988. We believe these limits reflectwidely-held views (reflected in a variety of laws and legislative proposals)on appropriate governmental participation in expenditures for child careservices. We also propose to require State IV-A agencies to guarantee care for anychild who would be required to be in the assistance unit if it were notfor the receipt of SSI under title XVI or foster care payments under titleIV-E and would otherwise be guaranteed such care. Although these two categoriesof individuals are excluded from the AFDC assistance unit, they are treatedas dependent children for certain other purposes. State IV-A agencies must guarantee needed care to recipients who are workingat the time the State implements JOBS as well as to recipients who beginworking on or after the date the State IV-A agency implements this provision.<T3>Other Supportive Services. </T3>The Act require that the State IV-Aagency pay for or reimburse the costs of transportation and other work-relatedexpenses, including work-related supportive services, if the State IV-Aagency determines they are necessary for an individual to participate inJOBS. We propose to allow State IV-A agencies to define work-related supportiveservices and work-related expenses in the State Supportive Services plan.They may include one-time, special work-related expenses which would enableindividuals to accept or maintain employment. On-going expenses relatedto employment are already covered by the work expense disregard (whichis raised to 90 effective October 1, 1989); therefore, no provision forsuch expenses has been made under section 301 of the Statute or these proposedregulations. We propose that the plan must describe methods of providingother supportive services, specify monetary limits for each type, and indicatethe basis for determining the need for the type of service. <T3>Verification of Participation in Education or Training Activities.</T3>Child care, transportation, and other supportive services necessaryfor an individual to participate in JOBS or other education and trainingactivities that are approved under JOBS by the State IV-A agency are eligiblefor FFP. Under the Act, child care and other supportive services for thosein ``non-JOBS'' education and training is allowable only to the extentthat these activities are ``consistent with the individual's employmentgoals.'' This language led us to the conclusion that an employability planwould need to be developed for those in outside education and training.Such a conclusion is also consistent with the statutory language indicatingthat participation in outside education and training would constitute satisfactoryparticipation in JOBS. Thus, we propose to consider participants in theseactivities as JOBS participants and to authorize their supportive servicesother than child care through the JOBS program. We propose that the State IV-A agency document approval of outside educationand training activities in an employability plan and that the agency periodically(but not less than every three months) determine that a recipient is makingsatisfactory progress, as defined at andSection; 250.1. Three months is considereda review period. However, State IV-A agencies should be aware that childcare services (or other supportive services) provided to individuals whoare not satisfactorily participating could be considered payments for ineligibleindividuals and might be subject to disallowances, even if States werefollowing this three-month monitoring standard. We propose to permit State IV-A agencies to provide child care and othernecessary supportive services for up to two weeks for families in whichan individual is waiting to enter approved education or training activitiesor to begin a component. This provision is included to ensure that childcare services (or other service arrangements) are not lost and that continuityof care is provided so that an individual may continue the employabilityprocess.<T3>Services for Applicants. </T3>We were faced with the question of whetherCongress intended that child care be available to recipients of AFDC only,or to applicants as well. In considering this issue, we concluded thatchild care should be available, as it was under prior law, when the agencyrequires an applicant to participate in job search. We also propose thattemporary child care be available for other activities necessary to preparethe individual for participation in the program, such as orientation. Stateshave told us that the lack of such child care during orientation resultsin a very high absenteeism rate. However, we do not believe that it is proper or efficient use of resourcesto provide child care to applicants who are already in education or trainingor who are employed, until their eligibility is determined. Also, it isnot proper use of resources to provide services to applicants who are notlikely to be determined eligible. A State IV-A agency may provide servicesto certain individuals (e.g., job search participants) whose eligibilityhas not been determined, as long as it has no information indicating thatthe individual would not likely qualify for benefits. We are proposing that the State IV-A agency must provide child care toAFDC applicants and recipients who are served by a JOBS program administeredby Tribal or Alaska Native organizations. Such services shall be availableto the same extent that they are available to eligible participants inthe State's JOBS program. State IV-A agencies must provide an equitablelevel of services for Indians and Alaska Natives, and they must providethe same range of methods or arrangements, unless certain methods wouldnot be feasible because of the nature of child care services availablein Tribal service areas. Although the Act requires that child care be guaranteed so that an individualmay accept or maintain employment, it is silent on whether the State IV-Aagency can pay for work-related expenses in order for the same individualto accept or maintain a job. We are proposing that such expenses would be allowable if the individualparticipates in a component, including work supplementation, which involveactual work. Further, if a State IV-A agency assigned the individual tothe optional component of job search, such expenses would be allowable.However, in other components like skills training or education, job acceptanceor maintenance expenses would not be incurred, and therefore not allowed.We propose to allow State IV-A agencies to make one-time payments for reasonablework-related expenses to an applicant or recipient so that she may acceptor maintain employment, if the State IV-A agency so provides in its SupportiveServices plan. Such expenses might include a uniform, a set of tools, apair of eyeglasses (if not available elsewhere), or the fee for a driver'slicense.<ITAG tagnum="81">Methods of Providing Child Care and Other Supportive Services (andSection;255.3 of the Proposed Regulations) </ITAG>The Act provides a number of methods to guarantee child care. Specifically,we propose that the State IV-A agency may: (1) Provide the care itself; (2) Arrange care through public or private providers by use of contractsor vouchers; (3) Provide cash or vouchers in advance to the caretaker relative so thatthe child care costs may be prepaid; (4) Reimburse the caretaker relative for child care expenses incurred;(5) Arrange with other agencies and community volunteer groups for non-reimbursedcare; (6) Use the earned income disregard; or (7) Adopt such other measures as the State IV-A agency deems appropriate.We propose that the State IV-A agency describe which of these methods itwill use in its Supportive Services plan. We elaborate on certain of theoptions here. <T3>Direct Provision of Child Care.</T3> Historically, State IV-A agencieshave not provided child care directly except in a few instances. The Actprohibits the State IV-A agency from spending money on construction, soinstances where a State IV-A agency would provide the care itself may remainrare. However, we can foresee a situation where a State IV-A agency mightprovide child care services within the agency while a parent is in a JOBSorientation session. Where care is provided directly, Federal matchingis subject to the same limits on costs as would be applied for outsidechild care; State IV-A agencies cannot charge their direct and overheadcosts for providing care without regard to the limits established pursuantto andSection; 255.4(a). <T3>Vouchers.</T3> Vouchers have become a very popular method of providingcare as they may give parents great freedom of choice. Many States areusing voucher systems, also referred to as purchase-of-care mechanisms,for child care delivery. If a State IV-A agency wishes to institute sucha system, the Department can provide referrals to agencies with expertisein establishing one.  <T3>Voluntary Providers.</T3> In planning to meet the child care demandsrelated to the Statute, there may be an opportunity for communities tomobilize volunteer resources to expand existing programs. For example,there is a growing need for before and after school care for school-agechildren. Volunteers under the supervision of professional caregivers couldbe a tremendous addition to the staff necessary for such programs. Manycommunities are also recruiting retired citizens to help fill personnelshortages in day care centers by creating staff positions for aides whichcan be filled by volunteers. <T3>Direct Payments to the Caretaker Relative.</T3> The State IV-A agencymay pay the caretaker relative directly either by providing payment inadvance or by reimbursing the caretaker relative who has already paid forthe care. In these situations, the family member cannot receive the earnedincome disregard for child care specified at andSection; 233.20(a)(11)(i),and the determination of eligibility and payment amount must be determinedwithout considering child care costs or payments. <T3>Income Disregards. </T3>The State IV-A agency may use the existingchild care disregards as provided at andSection; 233.20(a)(II)(i). Althoughthe child care disregard is not specifically listed among the methods inthe Act, Congress demonstrated its intent that the disregard continue whenit raised the amount of the child care disregard in title IV of the Statuteeffective October 1, 1989. Inclusion of the disregard as a method for guaranteeing child care underthis Part does not mean that the provisions of this Part supersede existingprovisions regarding the child care disregard. Thus, the disregard remainslimited by the amount specified in section 402(a)(8)(A)(iii) of the Act,it remains available for expenditures on children aged 13 and over, andit is not limited by the local market rate. We propose that State IV-A agencies could make supplemental payments forchild care costs which exceed the disregard amounts, but are within thelimits established under this Part. We also propose at andSection; 255.3(f),that, in cases subject to retrospective budgeting, State IV-A agenciescould modify their budgeting procedures to provide for child care costsin the first one or two months of employment. This option is discussedin more detail later. The Statute prohibits a State IV-A agency from disadvantaging any familyreceiving AFDC on October 13, 1988, through a change in its method of reimbursingthe cost of child care. The only method for reimbursing child care costsfor recipients with earnings on that date was the earned income disregard.The only families who could be disadvantaged by a change in method arethose who received the disregard on October 13, 1988 and who would be subjectto a new method under the State's Supportive Services plan. In these cases,failure to apply the disregard method increases the likelihood that a familywould be ineligible due to income. At andSection; 255.3(e), we propose to require that, for recipients who receivedAFDC payments on October 13, 1988, which were determined by using the childcare disregard at andSection; 233.20(a)(11)(i), the State IV-A agency mustdetermine current AFDC eligibility and payments based on the continuedapplication of the disregard in order to find out if the family would bedisadvantaged. If the family would be disadvantaged, we propose to prohibitthe State IV-A agency from using one of the direct payment methods forthese individuals. <T3>Parental Choice. </T3>The proposed regulations at andSection;andSection;255.3(c) and 255.3(d) reflect our desire to allow the caretaker relativeto choose the type of child care (center, group family day care, familyday care or in-home care), if more than one type is available. This isconsistent with section 482 of the Act which requires State IV-A agenciesto provide information to individuals about child care, including whatassistance is available to help the participant select appropriate childcare services. Our proposed regulations at andSection; 255.3(d) also provide that an individualwho is required to participate under Part 250 may not refuse appropriatecare unless she can arrange other care or demonstrate that such refusalwill not prevent or interfere with participation. Thus, an individual'schoice is not constrained by the methods or types of care which the StateIV-A agency has elected to provide under its Supportive Services plan.The State IV-A agency is required to pay for the child care services arrangedby the individual, even if that would require that it set up an alternativemechanism for payment of such services. Such payment would still be subjectto the limits established by this Part. <T3>Needs of the Child. </T3>The Act and the proposed regulations at andSection;255.3(b) requires that the State IV-A agency must take into account theneeds of the child if it arranges the care. This means that care must beavailable during the hours needed, including before or after school (orboth) as well as care for the entire day. The care must be reasonably accessibleso that neither the child nor the caregiver must travel distances beyondwhat is normally acceptable in the community.Special attention should be given to children with special needs. Thereare a variety of programs funded at the Federal and the State level forchildren with special needs. Often, there is little or no coordinationbetween these programs and other dependent care. We encourage State IV-Aagencies to make a special effort to identify programs that might benefitJOBS participants and their children and to coordinate with these programs.There are many materials already developed by the Department, the States,and the private sector that contain information on the types of care andselection of appropriate care. State IV-A agencies may find it cost effectiveto use local child care resource and referral (CCRandamp;R) agencies to providethis information for them. Child care resource and referral agencies existthroughout the country as a public/private venture to serve the community.They keep data on available resources (including openings and providers),often listing not only name, address, and cost of care, but informationon curriculum and special programs. <T3>Other Supportive Services. </T3>We propose at andSection; 255.3(g) thatState IV-A agencies can provide transportation or other supportive serviceseither directly or through payment or reimbursement. This policy is consistentwith current Federal policy and State practices under existing work programoptions. <T3>Coordination. </T3>Under the Act and proposed regulations at andSection;255.3(h), the State IV-A agency must coordinate its child care activitieswith existing early childhood education programs in the State, includingHead Start and preschool programs funded under Chapter 1 of the EducationConsolidation and Improvement Act. State IV-A agencies should build uponexisting resources to expand the range of services available to JOBS participants.We recognize that helping a mother set up a stable child care plan, especiallyif it involves more than one provider, can be difficult. However, we alsoknow how important a well-developed plan is; poorly thought-out arrangementsbreak down, causing disruption to training and employment. We believe thatthe provision of services for the two-week interim may prevent the disruptionof such carefully planned arrangements and allow continuity of care. <T3>Meeting Child Care Costs Under Retrospective Budgeting. </T3>Recipientswho need child care before beginning employment often lack sufficient fundsto pay for such care before receiving their paychecks. In State IV-A agenciesthat use a two-month retrospective budgeting cycle and meet child carethrough the disregard at andSection; 233.20(a)(11), for the first four monthsof employment, a family only receives recognition of child care costs fortwo of those four months. For example, under current rules, if a recipientbecomes employed in January and has child care costs in January, February,March and April, the child care disregard will not offset income in determiningthe amount of the payment until March and April. If a State IV-A agencydecides to provide child care for the first and second month of employment,as a start-up cost, the State IV-A agency could not use the disregard tooffset income used to determine March and April's payment because the recipientdid not actually meet the cost of child care in January and/or February.We propose to allow State IV-A agencies to provide start-up costs for childcare for the initial one or two months of employment and to apply the disregardfor the third and fourth months as if such costs had been paid by the recipient.However, in order to prevent duplication of benefits, if a State IV-A agencyelects to do this, it may not apply the disregard to income used to determinethe payment for the month(s) following the month in which child care ceases.The State IV-A agency may meet the start-up costs by making direct paymentsto the provider or by reimbursing the recipient. Any reimbursement shallnot be counted as income or resources for any month. <ITAG tagnum="81">Allowable Costs and Matching Rates (andSection; 255.4 of the ProposedRegulations) </ITAG>Section 402(g)(1)(C) of the Act and andSection; 255.4(a) of the proposedregulations provide that FFP is available for payments for the actual costof child care up to the statewide limit chosen by the State IV-A agency.This statewide limit may be the disregard level at andSection; 233.20(a)(11)(i),or some higher figure. In no case is FFP available for payments which exceedthe applicable local market rate. An example may help to explain this provision. Suppose a State IV-A agencysets a statewide limit ($250), which is higher than the child care disregard,for the purpose of calculating the amount of child care costs that it willpay for or reimburse. In City A, the applicable local market rate is also$250. Thus the State IV-A agency can pay for the actual cost up to $250.In City B, the applicable local market rate is $225. Thus even if the carecost $250 in City B, FFP would only be available for $225. In City C, theapplicable local market rate is $275. FFP would be available for only $250(the Statewide limit) or, if less than $250, the actual cost of care.<T3>Local Market Rates. </T3>Each State IV-A agency must establish localmarket rates, and the State Supportive Services plan must explain the methodologyused to establish them. We do not propose to impose any statistical formulato be used uniformly. However, in andSection; 255.4(a)(2), we are proposingfour guidelines which the State IV-A agency would have to follow in establishingthese rates. First, the State IV-A agency would have to base the rates on a representativesample of providers, obtained in a survey by the State IV-A agency or underan outside survey. Second, we believe the data generally should be collectedfor areas no greater than political subdivisions. While we are interestedin minimizing the administrative burdens on the State IV-A agency in establishingthese rates, we are also concerned that local market rates be determinedfor small enough geographical areas to reflect actual expected costs. Inmajor urban markets, political subdivisions may be too large an area forthis purpose, and we will continue to consider alternative approaches.Also, it might be appropriate to consolidate information on areas whichare very small or which are very similar in nature (such as small townsor remote regions of a state) rather than to develop independent estimatesfor all subdivisions. We would welcome suggestions in both these areas.Thirdly, we are proposing that the local market rates be established atthe 75th percentile. This level was selected because it represents a reasonablebalance between concerns about fiscal accountability and accessibilityto services. Finally, we are proposing that local market rates should be determinedby type of care such as center care, group family day care, family daycare, and in-home care. Rates should be differentiated by care for infants,toddlers, preschool and school children and whether there are differentrates for full-time and part-time care. Where appropriate, rates shouldreflect reductions in the cost of care for additional children from thesame family. States IV-A agencies should not find it a burden to establish local marketrates since they have told us that they have used local market rate informationfor the preparation of their State budgets and in the calculation of theirallowable title XX rate for child care. Also, studies are available toa State IV-A agency if help is needed in establishing local market rates.Many States rely on information provided by the local child care resourceand referral agencies such as the studies done in 1987 and 1988 by theCalifornia Child Care Resource and Referral Network that gave costs ofcare, licensed capacity, enrollment, open slots, wait lists, hours of care,transportation, and types of regulated providers. Collecting data on unregulated caregivers providing care in the home ofthe child may be more difficult and demand a different approach. We areaware of this difficulty, and we welcome suggestions that would help StateIV-A agencies obtain this information. We will make information about currentstudies and methodologies available to interested State IV-A agencies.<T3>Applicable Standards for Child Care. </T3>The Statute requires that FFP be available for child care only if it meetsapplicable standards of State and local law and requires that parents beallowed access to the child care services. The requirement for parentalaccess would cover custodial parents and non-custodial parents consistentwith court orders governing such matters. The State IV-A agency must also establish procedures to ensure that center-basedcare will be subject to State and local requirements designed to ensurebasic health and safety, including fire safety, protections. The Statemust also endeavor to develop guidelines for family day care if it doesnot already have them. We do not believe, however, that Congress intendedto limit child care only to care that is specifically regulated by currentState or local law. Other care, even if it is unregulated at the Stateor local level, is reimbursable under the Act. For example, some Statesexempt from their standards any center care that is under the auspicesof a religious organization. Some States do not have licensing or registrationstandards for family day care. Other States do not require licensing orregistration for family day care until they serve more than a specifiednumber of children. It should be noted that there are few laws covering in-home care, i.e.,care of a child in that child's own home. Appropriate individuals may bepaid as in-home caregivers, unless there are State restrictions regardingthe age of the caregiver or restrictions based on the fact that the caregivermay already be in the grant. We propose that FFP be available for childcare provided in the child's home by a relative (who is not a member ofthe AFDC unit) such as a grandparent, aunt, or older sibling. FFP is alsoavailable for care by a relative outside of the home if care by that relativemeets any applicable standards. Many State and local agencies have indicated concern that adequate childcare resources will not be available. However, the Conference Report doesnot support an interpretation that Congress intended to provide funds foractivities such as resource development, recruitment and training underthis program. Therefore, the proposed regulations at andSection; 255.4(f)specify that administrative costs for such activities as recruitment andtraining of providers, licensing, or resource development would not beconsidered allowable IV-A costs. Under the Statute, Congress authorized a separate appropriation of $13,000,000for fiscal years 1990 and 1991 for the Secretary to make grants to theStates to improve their licensing and registration requirements and procedures,and to monitor child care provided to children who receive aid under theState plan. State grants would reflect the State's proportion of the numberof children in the State receiving aid under the State IV-A plan comparedto the national total. The State would have to provide matching funds forthese funds for an amount that is not less than 10 percent of the amountof the grant.FFP is available for child care on Indian reservations if that care meetsapplicable State or Tribal standards. When both State and Tribal standardsexist, the Tribal standards are the applicable standard. Following theAct, we propose that any such applicable Tribal standards for center-basedchild care include, at a minimum, requirements to ensure basic health andsafety protections, including fire safety. <T3>Matching Rates. </T3>The costs of providing transportation, work-relatedexpenses, and other work-related supportive services are matched at 50percent and are under the JOBS cap. FFP is available for child care benefits at the Federal medical assistancepercentage and is not subject to the funding cap for JOBS for any StateIV-A agency other than Puerto Rico, the Virgin Islands, Guam and AmericanSamoa. For these jurisdictions, treatment of child care costs incurredis described at andSection; 250.71(c). Although the Statute does not directlyaddress child care administrative costs, we propose that such costs bematched at the administrative matching rate for AFDC as expenditures necessaryfor the proper and efficient administration of the program. Matchable administrativeexpenditures would include costs such as staff, supplies and overhead associatedwith the determination of eligibility for benefits, computation and issuanceof benefit payments, reviews of payment accuracy, hearings, program referrals,program planning and management, and data collection and reporting. Although the Statute does not explicitly extend safeguarding against fraudand abuse to the supportive services authorized under the Statute, we believethat it is in the best interest of the Federal government and the StateIV-A agency to require the State IV-A agency to do so. We have incorporatedsuch a requirement at andSection; 255.4(h). State IV-A agencies may use anymethod they deem reasonable to insure that charges are properly claimedand paid, and that they cover services actually received. Financial reviewsto identify costs not eligible for FFP will be an important part of Federaloversight. <T3>Special Needs. </T3>In the past, many supportive services, especiallyfor persons participating in employment and training programs, have beenallowed as special needs. With the enactment of JOBS and the new childcare provisions, Congress established specific programs for funding forsuch services and eliminated the need to treat such costs as special needs.Furthermore, for education and training activities and supportive servicesother than child care, it established an overall cap on the amount of Federalfunds which it wanted to commit for these purposes. We, therefore, proposethat State IV-A agencies not be permitted to provide child care or paymentfor other supportive services that may be provided under JOBS as specialneeds. <T3>Nature of Child Care Payments. </T3>Under section 402(g)(3)(A), ofthe Act, child care payments are funded under 403(a). However, they arenot IV-A assistance payments as such. Thus, (1) they are covered undera Supportive Services plan, rather than the State IV-A plan; (2) theirreceipt does not provide categorical Medicaid eligibility; (3) there isno entitlement to direct payment of benefits; (4) they are not subjectto disallowance under the AFDC quality control system; and (5) they arenot treated as assistance payments for the purposes of child support enforcement.At the same time, however, these child care benefits are funded on thesame basis as AFDC, as an open-ended entitlement program, and they areadministered by the same agency. Thus, for ease of administration, we areproposing at andSection; 255.4(i) that they be subject to many of the sameadministrative and financial rules as AFDC. For example, we are proposingthat child care payments be subject to similar financial reporting requirements,that similar procedures apply with respect to issues like the appeal ofdisallowances and the treatment of cancelled and uncashed checks, and thatgrants to States are subject to the same basic administrative rules. As indicated earlier, we are proposing that child care expenditures notbe subject to disallowance under the AFDC Quality Control (QC) system.It appears that the QC system would not be an effective or proper vehiclefor this purpose. However, consistent with the efficient administrationof the program, we are considering using the existing QC process as a meansof sampling cases and gathering information on the correctness of childcare payments. Using the data from the QC system, we propose to take disallowancesfollowing the procedures currently used for AFDC administrative costs.We welcome comments on this matter. Due process requirements (using the JOBS or IV-A hearing process, as appropriate)would apply. However, except in situations where a change in the methodof payment affects AFDC benefit levels, requirements for timely noticewould not apply to disputes about the method of payment. Under this Part,State IV-A agencies have discretion about the method of payment to be used;unlike the AFDC program, recipients are not necessarily entitled to assistancein any particular form. Also, we view child care benefits under this Part to be a conditional entitlementin that they must be guaranteed only to the extent necessary for an individualto accept or retain employment or to participate in a JOBS activity whichthe State IV-A agency is requiring. Therefore, if disputes arise aboutthe provision of child care benefitsunderthispartortheStateIV-A agencyproposes to deny, discontinue, terminate or reduce child care benefits,the individual is entitled to a hearing, but is not entitled to a continuationof child care benefits in the same amount or form pending that hearing.Consistent with the requirements of andSection; 205.10, however, the individual'sAFDC payment may not be reduced because of sanctions under andSection; 250.33or because of changes in the method of guaranteeing an individual's childcare benefits while a hearing is pending. For example, in cases where a recipient's participation in a JOBS activityor in outside education or training ceased (e.g., due to illness or terminationdue to unsatisfactory progress), the State IV-A agency would cease providingchild care benefits. The individual could appeal that State IV-A agencydecision, but child care benefits would not have to be provided duringconciliation or while a hearing was pending. In the meantime, the recipientmight be prevented from continuing (or resuming) participation becauseof the termination of child care benefits. She could not have her AFDCbenefits reduced for non-participation while a hearing was pending, andthe termination of child care benefits would be considered in determiningwhether she had good cause for non-participation. If the State IV-A agencylater requires the individual to again participate, necessary child carewould have to be guaranteed.<ITAG tagnum="81">Child Care Standards (andSection; 255.5 of the Regulations) </ITAG>The language of the Act reflects Congress' intent to ensure the healthand well-being of the children for whom child care is provided. Child caremust meet current applicable standards of State and local law; however,States are not required to develop new standards. Consistent with congressionalintent, we are not proposing to create Federal requirements in this area.At andSection; 255.1(e), we propose that the State Supportive Services planinclude an assurance that the State will meet the appropriate standardsof State and local law. The State must make the standards available uponrequest to the Family Support Administration for the purposes of programreviews, payment reviews and audits. The proposed rules incorporate the requirements in the Statute that theState provide the Secretary with a description of State and local requirementsfor center-based care designed to ensure basic health and safety, includingfire safety, protections and endeavor to develop guidelines for familyday care. The Secretary shall report to the Congress on the nature andcontent of State and local standards for health and safety by October 1,1992. We will be sending an Action Transmittal to the State IV-A agencyat a future date requesting the information necessary to meet these requirements.For the purpose of the one-time report to Congress it would be helpfulif the State IV-A agency describe both the procedures that have been andthat will be established. The State also must endeavor to develop guidelinesfor family day care if such guidelines do not already exist. <ITAG tagnum="81">Uniform Reporting Requirements for Child Care (andSection; 255.6 ofthe Proposed Regulations) </ITAG>Consistent with the requirements of Section 606 of the Statute, State IV-Aagencies are required to report information on child care to ensure thatthe provisions of the Statute are effectively implemented. These requirementsare addressed in andSection; 255.6 of the proposed rules. We are also consideringincluding a requirement that the State IV-A agency report the number ofchildren for whom care is provided, by type of care, under both Parts 255and 256. We invite comments on this proposal. However, more informationwill be sent to State IV-A agencies concerning these requirements. StateIV-A agencies should know that, as in any other fiscal expenditure, adequateinformation must be in the case record documenting these expenditures.<ITAG tagnum="84">Part 256_Transitional Child Care </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="84"><T3>Purpose (andSection; 256.0 of the Proposed Regulations) </T3></ITAG>The purpose for the issuance of the proposed regulations is to implementsection 302 of the Family Support Act of 1988. <ITAG tagnum="81">State Plan Requirements (andSection; 256.1 of the Proposed Regulations)</ITAG>The State Supportive Services plan must include the methods available toprovide extended child care. We suggest that the State IV-A agency usethe same methods, except for the income disregard, that it has in placefor providing child care during employment, education and training, includingJOBS. The State Supportive Services plan must also contain the sliding fee scaleunder which the family will contribute to the cost of the child care. Like the initial JOBS plan, we would expect the State IV-A agency to submita Supportive Services plan for transitional child care 45 days before theApril l, 1990, effective date. Where a State has not previously submitteda Supportive Services plan because it has not implemented its JOBS program,the Supportive Services plan for transitional child care would containboth the provisions discussed here and any provisions described at andSection;255.1 that apply to transitional care. For example, the transitional planwould include necessary assurances on procedures and information on localmarket rates.<ITAG tagnum="81">Eligibility (andSection; 256.2 of the Proposed Regulations)</ITAG>Effective April 1, 1990, certain AFDC recipients will, upon loss of eligibilityfor AFDC because of employment, become eligible for 12 consecutive monthsof child care. To be eligible for this benefit, the former recipient musthave received AFDC (or been considered a recipient under andSection; 233.20(a)(3)(viii)(D))for 3 of the prior 6 months. The proposed rule defines the first monthof the period of eligibility as the first month the individual becomesineligible for AFDC because of one of the following three events: (1) Any increase in earned income; (2) The loss of the $30 + 1/3 or the $30 disregard because of the expirationof the time limit on its use; or (3) For AFDC-UP cases only, an increase in the number of hours worked toover 100 hours per month. We propose to require that the former recipient request this benefit inwriting on a form prescribed by the State and that the payment of the benefitcannot be for any month prior to the request. This is similar to the basicrule for the AFDC program, in which no payment can be made for any periodprior to the filing of an application, even though otherwise eligible. We are proposing these policies at andSection; 256.2(b)(3) so that the StateIV-A agency can obtain the information it needs to determine eligibilityon a timely basis and to evaluate the need for child care. They also providethe State IV-A agency and the former recipient an opportunity to explorealternative child care arrangements before costs are incurred. The State has the responsibility of informing the recipient that the transitionalchild care benefits are available. Such notification should take placeat the time the State provides the program information required at andSection;250.40 and be repeated at the time of termination of the individual's AFDCbenefits. We are therefore proposing to require that recipients be notifiedof their potential eligibility for transitional child care when they becomeineligible for AFDC and that they be informed of the steps they need totake to ensure that they apply for and receive all benefits for which theywould be eligible. Individuals should also be clearly informed of the consequencesof the failure to apply, i.e, the loss of transitional child care benefitsfor any month prior to the month of application. We considered when the first month of ineligibility must occur to qualifya former recipient for this benefit.  We decided that the first month ofineligibility for AFDC-and the concomitant first month of eligibility fortransitional child care_must be April, 1990, or later, because April l,1990, is the effective date for the transitional child care provisions.Therefore, to receive transitional child care for April, 1990, the lastmonth of AFDC benefits must have been in March, 1990, and March would beone of the three months with receipt of AFDC benefits required during thesix-month period following September which are necessary for eligibility.We propose that, based on the intent that families have help with theirchild care needs for 12-months after losing their AFDC benefits, familieswho do not need child care immediately after such loss of AFDC may beginto receive child care in any month during the 12-month eligibility periodfor the remaining balance of the 12month period. For example, a familythat does not need child care until five months after going off AFDC wouldqualify for that month and the remaining six months of the 12 month eligibilityperiod. If child care is not requested until the fifth month, the Statecannot pay retroactively for the first four months of the 12-month period.The law provides that a family is ineligible for  transitional child careif the caretaker relative, who is a member of the AFDC family, terminatesemployment without good cause or fails to cooperate in establishing paternityand enforcing child support. Cooperation in establishing paternity andenforcing child support is discussed at andSection; 232.12. We propose that if the caretaker relative loses a job (with good causeas defined at andSection; 250.35), and then (prior to re-establishing eligibilityfor AFDC) finds another, the family would qualify for the remaining portionof the 12-month eligibility period. Also, if the caretaker relative losesa job and the family goes back on AFDC, that family could again becomeeligible for a full 12 months of transitional child care as long as itmeets the eligibility requirements discussed above. <ITAG tagnum="81">Fee Requirement (andSection; 256.3 of the Proposed Regulations) </ITAG>Section 402(g)(3)(A)(vii) of the Act requires the State agency to establisha sliding fee scale for the purpose of calculating a family's contributionfor transitional child care. Section 256.3 of the proposed regulationsdescribes this requirement. We considered imposing specific limits on the fee scales determined bythe States. In particular, we considered setting a minimum contributionby families with income above the poverty level, and limiting the availabilityof these benefits to those with income below 185 percent of poverty, asis the case with certain Medicaid benefits. However, we have not proposedthese or other limits because we recognize that States currently employa variety of different fee scales, and we want to solicit suggestions forFederal limits which would not be too cumbersome for States, in light oftheir current practices. We believe Federal rules should be developed becausewe are concerned that: (1) Without a realistic contribution by the formerrecipient to her child care expenses, the transitional nature of thesebenefits will be lost; (2) the interests of self-sufficiency and cost-effectivenessbe served; and (3) the benefits available to former welfare recipientsnot be disproportionate to those available for families similarly situated.We are therefore interested in specific suggestions for Federal rules inthis area. We also propose at andSection; 256.3(c) to allow the States to set differentperiods of payment collection for differing levels of payment. For example,it may not be cost-effective to collect and record very low fees everymonth. Data will be required in the case record concerning the fee scheduleand the collection of the fee. Under the proposed regulations at andSection; 256.3(e), the State IV-A agencymust take appropriate action if a family does not pay its fee. If a familydoes not cooperate in paying its fee, we propose that it would become ineligiblefor continued transitional benefits, and it would remain ineligible forso long as back fees were owed, unless satisfactory arrangements have beenmade to make full payment. However, transitional child care benefits wouldnot be discontinued without due process, and benefits would be continuedpending a hearing, if requested. Unless the fee requirements are takenseriously by States and recipients of benefits, the program will not beeffective in providing a transition toward self-sufficiency. States must keep case records open for 12 months after the individual,who loses AFDC eligibility, becomes eligible for the transitional childcare. <ITAG tagnum="81">Other Provisions (andSection; 256.4 of the Proposed Regulations) </ITAG>In part because the transitional child care provisions of the Statute havedistinct beginning and ending dates separate from the other child careprovisions of the Statute, we have included them as a separate part inthese proposed regulations. However, most of the provisions in Part 255apply to this part. For example, the provisions of andSection; 255.3(a) regardingthe methods of providing child care generally apply to transitional childcare although the income disregard is not an option in these cases. Theother provisions in Part 255 that pertain to allowable costs, matchingrates, standards, disallowance procedures, and uniform reporting also apply.One minor exception to this general rule relates to the funding of PuertoRico, Guam, the Virgin Islands and American Samoa. The exception reflectsthe fact that child care costs under Part 255 for these jurisdictions arecovered under the JOBS funding cap, while their transitional child carecosts fall under the section 1108 limits. Another exception is that transitionalchild care benefits cannot be suspended, reduced, discontinued or terminateduntil a decision is rendered after a hearing requested within a timelynotice period. Transitional child care benefits under this Part representan entitlement in a broader sense than benefits under Part 255, and recipientsof these benefits do not have the same protections (in terms of continuationof AFDC benefits and the option to cease participation) as those availableto individuals receiving child care under Part 255.<ITAG tagnum="81">Technical and Conforming Amendments (andSection;andSection; 205.50, 224.0,233.20, 233.90, 233.100, 234.60, 238.01, 239.01 and 240.01 of the ProposedRegulations) </ITAG>Section 202 of the Family Support Act, Pub. L. 100-485, contains the technicaland conforming amendments to title IV-A of the Social Security Act whichare required by the enactment of the Statute. Until October 1, 1990, we cannot remove existing Federal regulations whichhave been amended by the Statute because the existing regulations willcontinue to govern State IV-A agencies until they have approved JOBS plans.Therefore, in amending the Federal regulations, we have either incorporatedJOBS provisions in the existing regulation (for example, andSection; 205.50on safeguarding of information) or added a provision specific to Stateswith JOBS programs (for example, treatment of earned income at andSection;233.20(a)(11)(v)). Sections 202 and 204 repeal the following statutory provisions of titleIV as of October 1, 1990: Part C (WIN); section 409 of Part A (communitywork experience program (CWEP)); section 402(a)(35) of Part A (employmentsearch); and section 414 of Part A (work supplementation). For States whichimplement JOBS prior to October 1, 1990, the Federal regulations governingWIN (Part 224), CWEP (Part 238), work supplementation (Part 239), and employmentsearch (Part 240) will no longer apply. Therefore, we have added a provisionto each of these existing regulations clarifying that the current regulationsdo not apply to States with approved JOBS plans and will be repealed forall States as of October 1, 1990. The proposed regulations which distinguishthe applicability of the current regulations are found at andSection;andSection;224.0(c) (WIN), 238.01(b) (CWEP), 239.01(b) (work supplementation), and240.01(b) (employment search). Section 202 of the Statute amends section 402(a)(9)(A) of the Act to includeprograms under Part F for which the State IV-A agency must also providesafeguards which restrict the use or disclosure of information concerningapplicants or recipients. In accordance with these amendments, we haveamended andSection; 205.50(a)(1)(i)(A) to cover programs under Part F underour safeguarding regulations. Section 202 of the Statute also amends section 402(a)(8)(A)(iv) of theAct regarding the treatment of earned income to remove special treatmentafforded earned income from public service employment and incentive paymentsfor institutional training under the Work Incentive program. In lieu ofamending andSection; 233.20(a)(11)(iv) which governs treatment of earnedincome under WIN, we have added a new provision at andSection; 233.20(a)(11)(v)that governs the treatment of earned income and expenses in States withapproved JOBS plans. For regular employment or OJT, the disregards in andSection;andSection;233.20 (a)(11)(i) and (a)(11)(ii)(B) apply. For earned income from a jobunder work supplementation, the same disregards apply unless a State IV-Aagency has elected to provide differently in its State JOBS plan in accordancewith andSection; 250.62 (j) and (k). Section 233.20(a)(11)(v)(C) providesthat any advance payment or reimbursement to the JOBS participant for childcare, transportation, work-related expenses, or work-related supportiveservices is to be disregarded. Section 233.20(a)(11)(v)(D) provides thatpayment for or reimbursement of child care pursuant to Part 255 for employedindividuals who are not JOBS participants is disregarded. <T3>Changes to Section 407. </T3>Section 202 of the Statute amends section407(d)(1) of the Act which defines a ``quarter of work'' for the purposesof qualifying for benefits under the Unemployed Parent (UP) Program. Undercurrent law, a ``quarter of work'' is defined as having earned income of$50 or more during the period of three consecutive calendar months, oras having participated in WIN or CWEP during the quarter. The amendmentreplaces participation in WIN or CWEP with participation in a JOBS program.Similarly, we are amending the definition of ``quarter of work'' at andSection;233.100(a)(3)(iv) to add participation in JOBS if a State IV-A agency hasan approved JOBS plan under andSection; 250.20. We keep participation inWIN and CWEP in the definition of ``quarter of work'' because, even aftera State IV-A agency has an approved JOBS plan, participation in eitherCWEP or WIN during a quarter prior to implementation of JOBS will countas meeting the ``quarter of work'' requirement. Under current law, a principal earner in an AFDC-Unemployed Parent Casemust be registered with WIN or, if exempt because of remoteness, with apublic employment office as a condition of eligibility for aid. In addition,there is a requirement that the principal earner be certified to participatein WIN within 30 days after receipt of AFDC. Certification means that thenecessary support services are available so that recipients can participatein training or employment. Additionally, Federal financial participationis not available if, after the 30 days, the State IV-A agency has not takenaction to certify the principal earner to WIN.The Statute amends the current law to provide that aid will be denied ifthe parent, unless exempt under the new section 402(a)(19)(C)(vii), isnot currently participating or available for participation in a JOBS program,or, if exempt due to remoteness, is not registered with the State publicemployment office. We have amended andSection; 233.100(a)(5)(i) to add thisprovision for States with approved JOBS plans. The Statute further amends the Act to provide that within 30 days afterreceiving aid, the parent must participate or apply for participation inthe JOBS program, unless the program is not available in the area wherethe parent is living. We have amended andSection; 233.100(a)(6) to add thisprovision for States with approved JOBS plans. The Statute also amends the Act to provide that FFP will not be availableto the State IV-A agency for any period beginning with the 31st day afterthe individual receives aid, if the State has not taken appropriate stepsdirected towards the participation of the parent in a JOBS program. Wehave amended andSection; 233.100(c)(2)(iii) to add this provision for Stateswith approved JOBS plans. <T3>Other Provisions. </T3>We are also proposing to remove the provisionat andSection; 233.90(b)(2) which states that an otherwise eligible childunder age 18 may not be denied aid if he fails to attend school or makesatisfactory grades. This regulation runs counter to the provisions inthe Act and congressional intent that State IV-A agencies focus their attentionon school attendance requirements for teen-aged recipients. Since it raisedquestions about the ability of a State IV-A agency to impose such requirementson non-exempt recipients, we have deleted it. The Statute also amends section 402(a)(19)(G) of the Act to extend to theJOBS program the requirement that the State IV-A agency make vendor orprotective payments in the event the caretaker relative is sanctioned forfailure to participate. Therefore, we have revised andSection; 234.60(a)(12)to add JOBS to the list of programs for which imposing a sanction requiresa State IV-A agency to provide protective or vendor payments. Finally, we also propose to amend andSection; 233.20(a)(2)(v) to prohibitthe use of special needs for child care, work-related expenses, and otherwork-related supportive services that can be paid for under JOBS. A morecomplete discussion of this provision is contained in the preamble to andSection;255.4. All conforming amendments and other changes to Chapter II necessitatedby the Family Support Act will be handled in another regulatory package.<ITAG tagnum="20">(Catalog of Federal Domestic Assistance Programs 13.780, AssistancePayments Maintenance Assistance) </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21"><T4>Note: </T4>We have requested that the JOBS program be added to theCatalog of Federal Domestic Assistance and we have received a tentativeassignment of No. 13.781. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="84">List of Subjects </ITAG>45 CFR Part 205 Computer technology, Grant programs_social programs, Privacy, Public assistanceprograms, Reporting and recordkeeping requirements, Wages. 45 CFR Part 224 Administrative practice and procedure, Grant programs_social programs,Reporting and recordkeeping requirements, Work Incentive (WIN) Programs.45 CFR Part 233 Aliens, Grant programs-social programs, Public assistance programs, Reportingand recordkeeping requirements. 45 CFR Part 234 Grant programs-social programs, Health care, Public assistance programs,Rent subsidies. 45 CFR Part 238 Aid to Families with Dependent Children, Grant programs-social programs,Manpower training programs. 45 CFR Part 239 Aid to Families with Dependent Children, Employment, Grant programs-socialprograms. 45 CFR Part 240 Aid to Families with Dependent Children, Employment, Grant programs-socialprograms. 45 CFR Part 250 Aid to Families with Dependent Children, Grant programs-social programs,Employment, education and training. 45 CFR Part 255 Aid to Families with Dependent Children, Grant programs-social programs,Employment, education and training, Day care. 45 CFR Part 256 Aid to Families with Dependent Children, Grant programs-social programs,Employment, education and training, Day care.<ITAG tagnum="21">Dated: April 6, 1989.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="6">Catherine Bertini,</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="4">Acting Assistant Secretary for Family Support.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">Approved: April 6, 1989.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="6">Louis W. Sullivan,</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="4">Secretary, Department of Health and Human Services. </ITAG>Accordingly, Chapter II, Title 45, Code of Federal Regulations is amendedas set forth below: <ITAG tagnum="56">PART 205_GENERAL ADMINISTRATION_PUBLIC ASSISTANCE PROGRAMS </ITAG>1. The authority citation for Part 205 is revised to read as set forthbelow:<ITAG tagnum="21"><T4>Authority: </T4>Sections 402, 403, 406, 411, 1102, and 1106(a) of theSocial Security Act (42 U.S.C. 602, 603, 606, 611, 1302, and 1306(a));Section 202 of pub. L. 100-485, 102 Stat. 2377.</ITAG>2. Section 205.50 is amended by revising paragraph (a)(1)(i)(A) to readas follows: <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 205.50</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Safeguarding information for the financial assistance programs. </ITAG>(a) * * * (1) * * * (i) * * * (A) The administration of the plan of the State approved under title IV-A,the plan or program of the State under title IV-B, IV-C, IV-D, or IV-For under title I, X, XIV, XVI (AABD), XIX or XX or the supplemental securityincome (SSI) program established by title XVI. Such purposes include establishingeligibility, determining amount of assistance, and providing services forapplicants and recipients. <ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="52">PART 224_WORK INCENTIVE PROGRAMS FOR AFDC RECIPIENTS UNDER TITLE IVOF THE SOCIAL SECURITY ACT </ITAG>1. The authority citation for Part 224 is revised to read as set forthbelow and the authority citations following all the sections in Part 224are removed:<ITAG tagnum="21"><T4>Authority: </T4>Sections 402(a)(19), 430-444 and 1102 of the SocialSecurity Act (42 U.S.C. 602(a)(19), 630-644, and 1302); Sections 202 and204 of Pub. L. l00-485, 102 Stat. 2377, 2381.</ITAG>2. ln andSection; 224.0, paragraph (c) is added to read as follows: <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 224.0</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Purpose and scope. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * * </ITAG>(c) The provisions of this part do not apply to any State IV-A agency whichhas an approved JOBS plan under andSection; 250.20. A list of State IV-Aagencies with approved JOBS plans is available from the Family SupportAdministration, Office of Family Assistance, 370 L'Enfant Promenade, SW.,Washington, DC 20447. For all State IV-A agencies the provisions of thispart are repealed as of October 1, 1990. <ITAG tagnum="52">PART 233_COVERAGE AND CONDITIONS OF ELIGIBILITY IN FINANCIAL ASSISTANCEPROGRAMS </ITAG>1. The authority citation for Part 233 is revised to read as set forthbelow and the authority citations following all the sections in Part 233are removed:<ITAG tagnum="21"><T4>Authority: </T4>Sections 1, 402, 406, 407, 1002, 1102, 1402, and 1602of the Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. 301, 602, 606, 607, 1202, 1302, 1602,and 1382 note); and Section 6 of Pub. L. 94-114, 89 Stat. 579 and PartXXIII of Pub. L. 97-35, 95 Stat. 843, and Pub. L. 97-248, 96 Stat. 324,and Pub. L. 99-603, l00 Stat. 3359, Section 221 of Pub. L. 98-181, as amendedby Section 102 of Pub. L. 98-479 (42 U.S.C. 602 note) and Section 202 ofPub. L 100-485, 102 Stat. 2377.</ITAG>2. In andSection; 233.20, paragraph (a)(2)(v) is revised, paragraphs (a)(11)(v)and (a)(11)(vi) are redesignated as paragraphs (a)(11)(vi) and (a)(11)(vii)respectively and a new paragraph (a)(11)(v) is added to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 233.20</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Need and amount of assistance. </ITAG>(a) * * * (2) * * * (v) If the State IV-A agency includes special need items in its standard:(A) Describe those that will be recognized and the circumstances underwhich they will be included, and (B) Provide that they will be considered for all applicants and recipientsrequiring them; except that: (<T3>1</T3>) Under AFDC, work expenses and child care (or care of incapacitatedadults living in the same home and receiving AFDC) resulting from employmentor participation in either a CWEP or an employment search program cannotbe special needs, and (<T3>2</T3>) In a State which has a JOBS program under Part 250, child care,work-related expenses, and other work-related supportive services resultingfrom participation in JOBS (including participation pursuant to andSection;andSection;250.46, 250.47, and 250.48) cannot be special needs. <ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * * </ITAG>(11) * * * (v) The treatment of earned income and expenses under JOBS is as follows:(A) For earned income from regular employment or on-the-job training, asdescribed at andSection; 250.61, the disregards in paragraphs (a)(11)(i)and (a)(11)(ii)(B) of this section shall apply. (B) For earned income from a job under the work supplementation component,as described at andSection; 250.62, the disregards in paragraphs (a)(11)(i)and (a)(11)(ii)(B) of this section shall apply unless the State IV-A agencyin its State JOBS plan, has elected to provide otherwise under andSection;250.62(j) and andSection; 250.62(k). (C) For all activities under JOBS, advance payments or reimbursement tothe participant for child care, transportation, work-related expenses,or work-related supportive services is disregarded. (D) Payment or reimbursement of child care pursuant to Part 255 for employedindividuals who are not JOBS participants is disregarded. <ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 233.90</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">[Amended] </ITAG>3. In andSection; 233.90, paragraph (b)(2) is removed and paragraphs (b)(3)through (b)(6) are redesignated (b)(2) through (b)(5). 4. Section 233.100 is amended by revising paragraphs (a)(3)(iv); (a)(5)(i);(a)(6); and (c)(2)(iii) to read as follows: <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 233.100</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Dependent children of unemployed parents. </ITAG>(a) * * * (3) * * *(iv) A ``quarter of work'' with respect to any individual means a period(of 3 consecutive calendar months ending on March 31, June 30, September30, or December 31) in which he or she received earned income of not lessthan $50 (or which is a ``quarter of coverage'' as defined in section 213(a)(2)of the Act), or in Which he or she participated in a community work experienceprogram under Part 238, the Work Incentive program under Part 224, or,if the State IV-A agency has an approved JOBS plan pursuant to andSection;250.20, in a program under Part 250. <ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * * </ITAG>(5) * * * (i) If and for so long as such child's parent, unless exempt under andSection;224.20, is not currently registered for the work incentive program or ifexempt under andSection; 224.20(b)(6), is not currently registered with apublic employment office in the State, except that in a State with an approvedJOBS plan under andSection; 250.20, such child's parent, unless exempt underandSection; 250.30(b), must be currently participating (or available forparticipation) in a program under Part 250, or, if he is exempt under andSection;250.30(b)(5), must be registered with a public employment office in theState, and <ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * * </ITAG>(6) Provide that within 30 days after the receipt of such aid, unemployedprincipal earners will be certified for participation in the Work Incentiveprogram under Part 224 or, if the State IV-A agency has an approved JOBSplan pursuant to andSection; 250.20, will participate or apply for participationin a program under Part 250 unless the program is not available in thearea where the parent is living. <ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * * </ITAG>(c) * * * (2) * * * (iii) For any period beginning with the 31st day after receipt of aid,if and for long as no action is taken during the period to certify theparent for participation in the Work Incentive program under Part 224,or if the State IV-A agency has an approved JOBS plan pursuant to andSection;250.20, no action is taken during the period to undertake appropriate stepsdirected toward the participation of such parent in a program under Part250; and <ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * * </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="52">PART 234_FlNANClAL ASSlSTANCE TO lNDlVlDUALS </ITAG>1. The authority citation for Part 234 is revised to read as follows andall other authority citations which appear throughout Part 234 are removed:<ITAG tagnum="21"><T4>Authority: </T4>Sections 402, 403, 406 and 1102 of the Social SecurityAct (42 U.S.C. 602, 603, 606, and 1302); Section 201 of Pub. L. 100-485,102 Stat 2359.</ITAG>2. Section 234.60 is amended by revising paragraph (a)(12) to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 234.60</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Protective, vendor and two-party payments for dependent children.</ITAG>(a) * * * (12) In cases where an individual is sanctioned for failure to participatein WIN, employment search, CWEP, or JOBS, the State plan must provide thatwhen protective or vendor payments are made pursuant to andSection; 224.52(a)(1),andSection; 238.22, andSection; 240.22(a)(1), andSection; 240.22(b)(1) and andSection;250.34(c) of this chapter, only paragraphs (a)(7), (9)(ii), and (11)(i)and (ii) of this section will be applicable. * * * <ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * * </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="52">PART 238_COMMUNITY WORK EXPERIENCE PROGRAM </ITAG>1. The authority citation for Part 238 is revised to read as follows andall other authority citations which appear throughout Part 238 are removed:<ITAG tagnum="74">Authority: </ITAG>Section 409 and 1102 of the Social Security Act (42U.S.C. 609 and 1302); sections 202 and 204 of Pub.L. I00-485, 102 Stat2378, 2381.2. Section 238.01 is revised to read as follows: <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 238.01</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Scope of this part. </ITAG>(a) <T3>General. </T3>State IV-A agencies may operate community work experienceprograms (CWEP) which serve a useful public purpose, and require AFDC recipientsto participate in them as a condition of AFDC eligibility. The purposeof these CWEP programs is to provide work experience for AFDC recipients.CWEP projects must meet appropriate standards for health and safety andmay not displace persons currently employed or fill established unfilledvacancies. Subject to the conditions specified at andSection; 238.16, StateIV-A agencies must provide necessary transportation, day care, and otherrelated services or reimburse CWEP participants for costs directly relatedto participation in the program. Allowable costs to operate CWEP (see SubpartD) are matched by the Federal government at the AFDC administrative matchlevel (50 percent). (b) <T3>Applicability. </T3>The provisions of this part do not apply to anyState IV-A agency which has an approved JOBS plan under andSection; 250.20.A list of State IV-A agencies with approved JOBS plans is available fromthe Family Support Administration, Office of Family Assistance, 370 L'EnfantPromenade, SW., Washington, DC 20447. For all State IV-A agencies, theprovisions of this part are repealed as of October 1, 1990.<ITAG tagnum="52">PART 239_WORK SUPPLEMENTATION PROGRAM </ITAG>1. The authority citation for Part 239 is revised to read as follows andall other citations which appear throughout Part 239 are removed:<ITAG tagnum="21"><T4>Authority: </T4>Sections 414 and 1102 of the Social Security Act (42U.S.C. 614 and 1302); sections 202 and 204 of Pub. L. 100-485, 102 Stat.2378, 2381.</ITAG>2. Section 239.01 is revised to read as follows: <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 239.01</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Scope of this part. </ITAG>(a) <T3>General. </T3>Under the work supplementation program, State IV-A agenciesmay use AFDC funds to develop and subsidize work for AFDC recipients asan alternative to aid provided to AFDC recipients. The work supplementationprogram may be implemented notwithstanding the definitions contained insection 406 of the Social Security Act or any other provision of law. Underthis program AFDC recipients may choose, on a voluntary basis, to acceptan offer of work to the extent such jobs are made available. In order topay for the costs of developing and subsidizing these jobs, a State IV-Aagency may reduce the need standard in effect for selected categories ofrecipients on the basis of their ability to participate in the work supplementationprogram. The reduction of the need standard may be made for either theentire State or for selected geographical areas. The total amount of Federalfinancial participation for operation of a State IV-A agency's work supplementationprogram is limited as provided in Subpart D of this part. (b) <T3>Applicability. </T3>The provisions of this part do not apply to anyState IV-A agency which has an approved JOBS plan under andSection; 250.20.A list of State IV-A agencies with approved JOBS plans is available fromthe Family Support Administration, Office of Family Assistance, 370 L'EnfantPromenade SW., Washington, DC 20447. For all State IV-A agencies, the provisionsof this part are repealed as of October 1, 1990. <ITAG tagnum="52">PART 240_EMPLOYMENT SEARCH </ITAG>1. The authority citation for Part 240 is revised to read as follows andall other citations which appear throughout Part 240 are removed:<ITAG tagnum="21"><T4>Authority: </T4>Sections 402(a) and 1102 of the Social Security Act(42 U.S.C. 602(a) and 1302); sections 202 and 204 of Pub. L. 100-485, 102Stat. 2377, 2381.</ITAG>2. Section 240.01 is revised to read as follows: <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 240.01</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Scope of this part. </ITAG>(a) <T3>General. </T3>Each State with a plan approved under title IV-A of theSocial Security Act may establish a program of employment search in accordancewith the requirements in this part. The single State agency designatedin the State plan to administer or supervise the AFDC program must administerthe employment search program. (b) <T3>Applicability. </T3>The provisions of this part do not apply to anyState IV-A agency which has an approved JOBS plan under andSection; 250.20.A list of State IV-A agencies with approved JOBS plans is available fromthe Family Support Administration, Office of Family Assistance, 370 L'EnfantPromenade, SW., Washington, DC 20447. For all State IV-A agencies, theprovisions of this part are repealed as of October 1, 1990. Title 45, Chapter II, Code of Federal Regulations is amended by addinga new Part 250 to read as follows: <ITAG tagnum="56">Part 250_JOB OPPORTUNITIES AND BASIC SKILLS TRAINING PROGRAM </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="74">Subpart A_Purpose and Definitions </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="70">Sec. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">250.0 Purpose. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">250.1 Definitions. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="74">Subpart B_Administration </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">250.10 State IV-A agency administration. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">250.11 Requirement for a statewide program. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">250.12 Coordination and consultation. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">250.13 Contracting authority. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="74">Subpart C_State Plan Requirements and Content </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">250.20 Requirement for a State JOBS plan. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">250.21 State plan content.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="74">Subpart D_Participation Requirements, Exemptions and Sanctions </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">250.30 Requirements for individual participation and exemptions. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">250.31 Volunteers. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">250.32 Participation requirements for education. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">250.33 Participation requirements for unemployed parents. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">250.34 Sanctions. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">250.35 Good cause. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">250.36 Conciliation and fair hearings. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="74">Subpart E_Operation of State JOBS Programs/Program Components </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">250.40 Providing information to AFDC applicants and recipients. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">250.41 Initial assessment and employability plan. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">250.42 Agency-participant agreement. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">250.43 Case management. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">250.44 Mandatory components. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">250.45 Optional components. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">250.46 Postsecondary education. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">250.47 Other education, training and employment activities. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">250.48 Self-initiated education or training.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="74">Subpart F_[Reserved] </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="74">Subpart G_Optional Components of State JOBS Programs </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">250.60 Job search program. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">250.61 On-the-job training. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">250.62 Work supplementation program. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">250.63 Community work experience program. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="74">Subpart H_Funding </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">250.70 JOBS allocation entitlement. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">250.71 Allotment of JOBS limit of entitlement. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">250.72 Maintenance of effort. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">250.73 Matching rates. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">250.74 Reduced matching rate. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">250.75 Activities excluded from FFP. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">250.76 Financial reports, records, statements and audits. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">250.77 Costs matchable as AFDC payments. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="74">Subpart I_Uniform Data Collection Requirements</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">250.80 Uniform data collection requirements. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">250.81 State data systems options. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">250.82 Required case record data.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="74">Subpart J_Operation of JOBS Programs by Indian Tribes and Alaska NativeOrganizations </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">250.90 Scope and purpose. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">250.91 Eligible Indian Tribe and Alaska Native organization grantees.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">250.92 Selection criteria for eligible Alaska Native organizations.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">250.93 Funding formula. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">250.94 Program administration, implementation and operations. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">250.95 Supportive services. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">250.96 Waiver authority. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">250.97 Application requirements and documentation. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">250.98 Maintenance of effort for Indian Tribes and Alaska Native organizations.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26"><T4> Authority:</T4> Sections 402, 403, 481, 481 note, 482, 483, 484, 485,486, 487, and 1102 of the Social Security Act as amended (42 U.S.C. 602,603, 681, 682, 682 note, 683, 684, 685, 686, 687, and 1302); section 204(b)of Pub. L. 100-485, 102 Stat. 2381.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="52">Subpart A_Purpose and Definitions </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 250.0</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Purpose. </ITAG>(a) The purpose of the Job Opportunities and Basic Skills Training (JOBS)program under titles IV-A and IV-F of the Social Security Act is to encourage,assist, and require applicants for and recipients of AFDC to fulfill theirresponsibilities to support their children by preparing for, acceptingand retaining employment. To assure that needy families with children areprovided the means to avoid long-term welfare dependency, the JOBS programis intended to: (1) Provide individuals with the opportunity to acquire the basic educationand skills necessary to qualify for employment; (2) Provide necessary supportive services, including transitional childcare and medical assistance, so that individuals can participate in JOBSand accept employment; (3) Promote coordination of services at all levels of government in orderto make a wide range of services available, especially for individualsat risk of long-term welfare dependency, and to maximize the use of existingresources; and (4) Emphasize accountability for both participants and service providers.(b) This part provides that a State IV-A agency, as a condition of participationin the AFDC program, must operate a JOBS program. In addition, these regulationsrequire that States provide child care and other supportive services forparticipants in the JOBS program, as well as certain other individuals,pursuant to Parts 255 and 256. This part contains the policies, rules andregulations pertaining to the Job Opportunities and Basic Skills Training(JOBS) program. (c) This part is applicable to States with approved JOBS programs pursuantto andSection; 250.20, and to all States as of October 1, 1990. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 250.1</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Definitions. </ITAG>Except to the extent otherwise specified in this section, terms used inPart 250 shall have the same meaning otherwise applicable to the Aid toFamilies with Dependent Children (AFDC) program. <T3>Adult recipient </T3>means an individual other than a dependent child(unless such child is the minor custodial parent of another dependent child)whose needs are met (in whole or in part) with payments of Aid to Familieswith Dependent Children. <T3>Basic literacy level </T3>means a literacy level that allows a personto function at the level of an individual who has successfully completedthe eighth grade. <T3>Component </T3>means any of the services or activities available underthe provisions of andSection; 250.44 through andSection; 250.48. <T3>CWEP </T3>means the community work experience program authorized inandSection; 250.45 and andSection; 250.63. <T3>Department </T3>means the U.S. Department of Health and Human Services.<T3>FFP </T3>means Federal financial participation in expenditures madeby a State. <T3>Institution of higher education </T3>means any institution determinedby the Secretary of Education to meet: (1) The definition of such term contained in either section 1201(a) orsection 481(a) of the Higher Education Act of 1965 (20 U.S.C. 1001 <T3>et seq.</T3>), as amended; or (2) The definitions of ``proprietary institution of higher education''or ``postsecondary vocational institution,'' which are defined at sections481 (b) and (c) of that Act. <T3>Intensive job search </T3>is, for purposes of andSection; 250.74(c),job search by a parent in an Unemployed Parent case that is either groupor individual job search for a monthly average equivalent to 20 hours perweek. <T3>JAS </T3>means a JOBS Automated System authorized under andSection; 250.81for a State to support its operation of the JOBS program. <T3>JOBS </T3>is the Job Opportunities and Basic Skills Training programrequired by section 402(a)(19) of the Social Security Act, as amended bysection 201(a) of the Family Support Act of 1988 (Pub. L. 100-485) andset forth in Part F of title lV of the Social Security Act, as added bysection 201(b) of the Family Support Act. <T3>JOBS plan </T3>means the statewide operational plan for JOBS. <T3>Limited English proficiency </T3>means limited ability in speaking,writing, or understanding the English language by a person whose nativelanguage is a language other than English, or who lives in a family orcommunity environment where a language other than English is the dominantlanguage.<T3>Make good progress</T3> and <T3>Making satisfactory progress </T3>in an educational component meanthat the participant in any educational activity is meeting, on a periodicallymeasured basis of less than one year, such as a term or quarter, a consistentstandard of progress based upon a written policy that was: developed bythe educational institution or program in which she is enrolled; and approvedby the appropriate State or local education agency and the State welfareagency. Such standard includes both a qualitative measure of a participant'sprogress, such as a grade point average, and a quantitative measure, suchas a reasonable time limit by which a student is expected to complete herstudies. If the educational institution or program is accredited by anaccrediting body that is listed by the Secretary of Education and thathas established a satisfactory progress policy, then that body's policyshall apply. Upon review and approval by the State education agency andthe State IV-A agency, the standard may provide that a student who doesnot meet the institution's or program's progress standard is nonethelessmaking satisfactory progress during a probationary period, or shall bedeemed to be making satisfactory progress because of mitigating circumstances.<T3>Make good progress </T3>and <T3>Making satisfactory progress </T3>in a training component (i.e., OJTand skills training) mean that the participant is meeting, on a periodicallymeasured basis of less than one year, such as quarterly, a consistent standardof progress based upon a written policy that was: Developed by the trainingprovider, and approved by the State IV-A agency. Such standard includesboth a qualitative measure of a participant's progress, such as competencygains or proficiency level, and a quantitative measure, such as a reasonabletime limit for completion of the training program. <T3>MSA </T3>means Metropolitan Statistical Area, a system of geographicalareas defined and maintained by the Executive Office of the President,Office of Management and Budget. <T3>OJT </T3>means on-the-job training as authorized in andSection; 250.45and andSection; 250.61. <T3>Participation: </T3>(1) For purposes of determining a State's participationrate under andSection; 250.74(b) and andSection; 250.74(c), an individual isparticipating if she is: (i) An AFDC recipient who is assigned to a JOBS program component specifiedin paragraph (5) of this definition for at least the minimum activity levelspecified in that paragraph, or an applicant assigned to the job searchprogram for the State's specified activity level; and (ii) Participating at the assigned level of activity or has provided documentedgood cause for temporary absence in accordance with State policy. (2) An individual active only in orientation, assessment, or employabilitydevelopment planning or case management is not a participant for thesepurposes. (3) When an individual is assigned to activities in more than one component,she is a participant if the total of her hours meets the average hoursrequirement of the assigned components. (4)(i) For purposes of the UP work requirement at andSection; 250.33, a parentin a UP family is a participant if his or her activity level is at least16 hours per week in work supplementation, CWEP, OJT, or a State designedwork program approved by the Secretary. (ii) A parent under the age of 25 in such a family who has not completedhigh school or an equivalent course of education will meet the UP workrequirement if the State requires, in lieu of the work requirement in paragraph(4)(i) of this definition, the parent to participate in educational activitiesdirected at attaining a high school diploma or its equivalent or completinga basic education program, and he or she is making satisfactory progress.(5) The specified minimum activity levels for JOBS program components arethe average monthly activity levels equivalent to the following: (i) For any of the educational activities specified in andSection; 250.44:Making satisfactory progress; (ii) Job skills training: At least 20 hours of instruction or trainingper week; (iii) Job readiness activities: At least 20 hours of structured, guidedactivity per week; (iv) Individual job search: The equivalent in structured activity and employercontacts of 20 hours per week. (v) Group job search: At least 20 hours per week. (vi) OJT: Full-time work according to the standard of the occupation. (vii) Work supplementation program: Full-time work according to the standardof the occupation. (viii) CWEP: The lower of 20 hours per week or the CWEP maximum hours forthat individual. (ix) Other work experience: As defined by the State and approved by theSecretary; except that for the purpose of the UP work requirement, theactivity, to qualify for participation, must constitute actual work, andnot training, and be at least 16 hours per week. (x) Postsecondary education: Making satisfactory progress. (xi) Other allowed activities: As defined by the State and approved bythe Secretary. (6) This definition of participation is directly related to the requirementsof andSection; 250.74 and does not preclude a State from assigning an individualto a component for fewer hours than required to meet the participationrate if appropriate.<T3>Postsecondary education </T3>means a program of postsecondary instructionoffered by: (1) An institution of higher education determined by the Secretary of Educationto meet section 1201(a), or section 481 (a), (b), or (c) of the HigherEducation Act of 1965, as amended; (2) An institution of higher education or a vocational school determinedby the Secretary of Education to meet section 435(b) or section 435(c)of the Higher Education Act of 1965, as amended; or (3) A public institution that is legally authorized by the State to providesuch a program within the State. <T3>Secretary </T3>means the Secretary of Health and Human Services. <T3>Target population </T3>means that group composed of each individualwho: (1) Is receiving AFDC, and who has received such aid for any 36 of thepreceding 60 months; (2) Makes application for AFDC, and has received such aid for any 36 ofthe 60 months immediately preceding the most recent month for which applicationhas been made; (3) Is a custodial parent under the age of 24 who: (i) Has not completed a high school education and, at the time of applicationfor AFDC, is not enrolled in high school (or a high school equivalencycourse of instruction); or (ii) Had little or no work experience in the preceding year; or (4) Is a member of a family in which the youngest child is within 2 yearsof being ineligible for AFDC because of age.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10">For a particular State, this term will include, in lieu of individualslisted, such alternative groups of long-term or potential long-term recipientsas the State has demonstrated to the satisfaction of the Secretary arefeasible target populations in that State's caseload. <T3>UP </T3>means Unemployed Parent and refers to that segment of the AFDCprogram authorized in section 407 of the Social Security Act which providesaid with respect to a dependent child who is deprived of parental supportor care by reason of the unemployment of the parent who is the principalearner. <ITAG tagnum="52">Subpart B_Administration </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 250.10</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">State IV-A agency administration. </ITAG>(a) The State agency responsible for the administration or supervisionof the State's title IV-A plan is responsible for the administration orsupervision of the JOBS program. (b) The provisions of andSection; 205.100(b) apply to this section. (c) Examples of functions which must be retained by the State IV-A agencypursuant to andSection; 250.13 of this part include the following: (1) Establishment of optional provisions and components of the program;(2) Responsibility for program planning, design of program, and determiningwho should participate; (3) Establishment of program participation requirements; (4) Development of definition of good cause for failing to participate;(5) Development of definition of failure to participate; and (6) Determination of how assistance shall impact on the AFDC grant as aresult of a dispute involving an individual's participation. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 250.11</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Requirement for a statewide program. </ITAG>(a) Not later than October 1, 1992 the State must make the JOBS programavailable in each political subdivision (county, parish or independentcity) where it is feasible to do so. (b) Although all required and at least two optional components, as describedin andSection;andSection; 250.44 and 250.45, must be included in a State JOBSprogram, all such components need not be operated in every political subdivisionof the State, nor need the State operate each such component to the sameextent in each political subdivision. (c)(1) If the State IV-A agency concludes that a statewide program is notfeasible, appropriate justification must be submitted to the Secretaryfor review and approval as part of its JOBS plan, unless the followingcriteria are met: (i) A minimal JOBS program would be available in a number of politicalsubdivisions sufficient to serve 95 percent of adult recipients; and (ii) A complete JOBS program would be available in all Metropolitan StatisticalAreas in the State, and in a number of political subdivisions sufficientto serve 75 percent of adult recipients. (iii) A minimal program includes high school or equivalent education, asspecified at andSection; 250.44, one optional component from among thosespecified at andSection; 250.45, and information and referral to availablenon-JOBS employment services. A complete program includes all mandatorycomponents as well as any two optional components. (2) The justification must include the following: (i) The number of adult recipients that would be excluded and a comparisonof: (A) The estimated average annual unit cost per participant were the JOBSprogram extended to them with (B) The estimated average annual unit cost per JOBS participant in theincluded areas; (ii) A description of the local economic conditions that make operationof the program in such areas infeasible; and (iii) Whether the State expects to expend all of its limit of entitlement,pursuant to andSection; 250.70, for the period covered by the JOBS plan.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 250.12</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Coordination and consultation. </ITAG>State IV-A agencies are required to assure coordination of JOBS programservices, including child care pursuant to andSection; 255.3(h) of the regulations,with related services provided by other agencies. (a) The Governor shall assure that JOBS program activities are coordinatedwith programs under the Job Training Partnership Act (JTPA) and with anyother relevant employment, training, and education programs available withinthe State. At a minimum, this means that the appropriate job training andpreparation components of the State JOBS plan shall be consistent withthe coordination criteria specified in the Governor's coordination andspecial services plan required under section 121 of the JTPA. (b) In developing the JOBS plan and carrying out the JOBS program, includingthe supportive services provisions, the State IV-A agency must consultand coordinate with other providers, including those specified in paragraph(c) of this section, to identify existing resources to prevent duplicationof services, assure that other program services are available to enableparticipants to achieve self-sufficiency, and assure that costs for theseother services for which welfare recipients have been eligible are notincurred by the JOBS program pursuant to andSection; 250.72. (c) At a minimum, the State IV-A agency must consult and coordinate with:(1) The State agency responsible for JTPA; (2) The State agency responsible for the Employment Service; (3) The State education agency for programs under the Adult Education Act(20 U.S.C. 1201 <T3>et seq.</T3>) and Carl D. Perkins Vocational Education Act (20 U.S.C.2301 <T3>et seq.</T3>); and (4) The State agencies responsible for child care activities as describedin andSection; 255.3(h). (d) The State IV-A agency and local welfare agencies, as appropriate, mustconsult with the private industry councils (as established under section102 of the JTPA): (1) On the development of arrangements and contracts under JOBS, as describedin andSection; 250.13, and under the JTPA; and (2) To identify and obtain advice on the types of jobs available, or likelyto become available, in the area. The State IV-A agency must ensure thatJOBS provides training only for the types of jobs which are, or are likelyto become, available in the area, and that resources are not expended ontraining for jobs that are not likely to become available. (e) The State IV-A agency must exchange certain information with an eligibleIndian Tribe or Alaska Native organization interested in conducting a separateJOBS program under andSection; 250.91. (1) This information includes available data on adult Tribal or AlaskaNative organization AFDC recipients necessary to determine a Tribe or organization'sJOBS funding level and designated service area, as appropriate, as describedin andSection; 250.93(b). State and Tribal and Alaska Native organizationrepresentatives receiving such AFDC recipient data must follow comparablestandards of confidentiality as described in andSection; 250.93(b)(2). (2) Since the State IV-A agency maintains responsibility for providingbasic AFDC program services, such as eligibility notifications, as wellas child care funds or services, to Tribal and Alaska Native organizationJOBS participants, the State and such grantee must coordinate interrelatedactivities as described in andSection; 250.94(a) and Part 255. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 250.13</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Contracting authority. </ITAG>The State IV-A agency shall carry out the JOBS program directly or througharrangements or under contracts with administrative entities under section4(2) of the Job Training Partnership Act (JTPA), with State and local educationalagencies, and with other public agencies, Indian Tribes or Alaska Nativeorganizations or private organizations (including community-based organizationsas defined in section 4(5) of the JTPA). (a) Arrangements and contracts entered into under this section may coverany service or activity (including outreach, information and referral)to be made available under the JOBS program. Such contracted service oractivity must be consistent with the requirements under andSection; 250.10and must not otherwise be available on a nonreimbursable basis, as specifiedin andSection; 250.72(c). (b) The State IV-A agency must consult with the private industry councilson the development of arrangements and contracts under JOBS pursuant toandSection; 250.12. (c) In selecting service providers, the State IV-A agency must take intoaccount appropriate factors which may include past performance in providingsimilar services, demonstrated effectiveness, fiscal accountability, costefficiency, ability to meet performance standards, and such other factorsas the State IV-A agency may determine to be appropriate. (d) For purposes of claiming FFP, the State IV-A agency must segregatecosts by the applicable matching rates, as defined at andSection; 250.73(b)(1),in any arrangement or contract entered into under this section. (e) Services contracted under JOBS are subject to the requirements of Part92, excluding the provisions at andSection; 92.30(d)(4).<ITAG tagnum="52">Subpart C_State Plan Requirements and Content </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 250.20</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Requirement for a State JOBS plan. </ITAG>(a) As a condition of participation in the AFDC program, the agency responsiblefor administering or supervising the administration of the IV-A plan must:(1) No later than October 1, 1990, establish and operate a JOBS programunder a JOBS plan that has been approved by the Secretary before implementationand that meets the requirements of this Part; (2) Submit its initial JOBS plan to the Secretary for review and actionat least 45 days prior to the anticipated implementation date; and (3) Submit its initial Supportive Services plan, in accordance with andSection;andSection;255.1 and 256.1 concurrent with the initial JOBS plan, except that a Statewhich has not submitted a JOBS plan prior to April 1, 1990, must submita Supportive Services plan for transitional child care in accordance withandSection; 256.1 at least 45 days prior to implementation. (b) The initial JOBS plan and Supportive Services plan will be subjectto prior approval by the Secretary. FFP will only be available for expendituresincurred after approval by the Secretary. (c) A State JOBS plan and Supportive Services plan must be submitted to:(1) The Governor for review and comment; and (2) The State Job Training Coordinating Council (SJTCC) and the State educationagency for review and comment at least 60 days prior to submittal to theSecretary. The plan shall be published and otherwise made available tothe public, including members of federally-recognized Tribes and AlaskaNative organizations in the State, for review and comment, concurrent withsubmittal to the SJTCC and the State education agency. Comments receivedshall be resolved by the State. (d)(1) State JOBS plans and Supportive Services plans submitted to theSecretary prior to the issuance of the JOBS and Supportive Services planpreprints shall be considered interim plans. (2)(i) A State operating a JOBS program and providing supportive servicesunder interim plans shall submit a new JOBS plan and a new Supportive Servicesplan for approval within 60 days of the date that JOBS and Supportive Servicesplan preprints are issued by the Secretary. (ii) The new JOBS and Supportive Services plans must be submitted to theSJTCC no later than the date submitted to the Secretary, if substantialchanges to the interim plans have been made. (iii) Interim plans shall remain in force until formal action on the newplans is taken (i.e., approval or disapproval) by the Secretary. (e)(1) The State must submit an update of its JOBS and Supportive Servicesplans to the Secretary for approval not less than every two years. Theupdate shall be considered a new JOBS plan and Supportive Services plan,and shall be submitted to the Secretary for approval at least 90 days priorto beginning of the next biennial period. The State must follow the publicreview and comment provisions in paragraph (c) of this section. (2) The update must consist of: (i) Assurances regarding those parts of the State JOBS Plan and SupportiveServices plan that remain unchanged; (ii) A description of any changes in program operations including but notlimited to changes in components and target populations served; (iii) An estimate of the number of persons to be served by the programduring the next biennium; and (iv) An assurance that the State JOBS plan is consistent with the coordinationcriteria specified in the current Governor's Coordination and Special ServicesPlan required under section 121 of the JTPA. (3)(i) For all States the first biennial update must be submitted by July1, 1992, for the period beginning October l, 1992. (ii) A State JOBS plan and Supportive Services plan approved pursuant toparagraph (d)(2) of this section shall remain in force until formal actionis taken (i.e., approval or disapproval) by the Secretary on the firstbiennial update. (iii) Each approved biennial update shall remain in force until formalaction is taken (i.e., approval or disapproval) by the Secretary on theupdate for the following biennial period. (f) The State shall submit proposed amendments to approved plans as necessaryand they shall be reviewed according to the process described at andSection;201.3 (f) and (g). (g) A State that submits a plan, an amendment to an existing plan, or abiennial update that is not approvable will be given the opportunity tomake revisions before formal disapproval; upon formal disapproval, a Statemay request a hearing pursuant to the process set forth in andSection; 201.4and Part 213.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 250.21</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">State plan content. </ITAG>A State's JOBS plan must include the following: (a) Assurances that the title IV-A agency will, upon approval of the JOBSplan by the Secretary, have in effect and operation: (1) A JOBS program that meets the requirements of section 402(a)(19) andtitle lV-F of the Act, including assurances: (i) By cross-reference to appropriate statutory and regulatory citations,that the JOBS program will meet all statutory and regulatory requirements;and (ii) That to the extent the program, including child care, is availablein a political subdivision of a State and the State's resources otherwisepermit, the State will require non-exempt recipients to participate; and(2) A program for providing child care and other supportive services consistentwith the requirements of the Act and with the State's separate SupportiveServices plan, pursuant to andSection;andSection; 255.1 and 256.1. (b) A statement of the goals and objectives of the State JOBS program,and how the State intends to implement the program during the bienniumto support those goals and objectives. If the program is not implementedinitially on a statewide basis, this description must include the anticipatedschedule for phased implementation. (c) A description of the administrative structure for the JOBS program,including: (1) A description of the conciliation process and any alternative fairhearing process the State proposes; and (2) The manner in which the title IV-A agency will assure, in accordancewith section 402(a)(44) of the Act, that the benefits and services undertitle IV-F of the Act will be furnished in an integrated manner with thoseof titles IV-A and IV-D of the Act. (d) Annual estimates of the numbers of persons to be served on a monthlybasis during the biennium covered by the plan. (e) Identification of the subdivisions, if any, proposed to be excluded.For any period after September 30, 1992, appropriate justification as requiredin andSection; 250.11(c) must be included for not establishing the programin such subdivisions. (f) A description of the nature of coordination with public and privateeducation and training agencies and organizations, at the political subdivisionand State levels, as required at andSection; 250.12, and a description ofthe services identified as available and appropriate for participants inthe State JOBS program. (g) Descriptions of program operations to include: (1) The required and optional components that will be provided, and theextent to which the range of services will vary by political subdivisionor otherwise; (2) The needs to be addressed through the provision of these services;(3) The extent to which and the bases upon which, the State anticipateseach service and activity will be available to JOBS participants duringthe biennium: (i) On a non-reimbursable basis; (ii) Through direct agency provision; and (iii) On a purchase basis; (4) The contracting processes that will be used to deliver services forthe State IV-A agency, pursuant to andSection; 250.13, including: (i) The service providers such as JTPA agencies, educational agencies,and other public agencies or private organizations; and (ii) The types of services to be provided such as skills training, vocationaleducation, etc.; (5) The orientation processes the IV-A State agency will use to provideprogram information to AFDC applicants and recipients pursuant to andSection;250.40(a); this description must specify the methods and timeframes forproviding this information; (6) The assessment processes the State IV-A agency will use, includingvariations among political subdivisions, pursuant to andSection; 250.41(a).This description must include: (i) The types of assessment tools selected (self-assessment survey, literacytests, vocational aptitude testing, etc.); and (ii) The bases for selection; (7) If the State elects to use agreements or contracts with participants,pursuant to andSection; 250.42(a), the purpose and content of such agreementsor contracts and the basis for determining the groups of participants forwhich they will be used; (8) If the State elects to use a case management system pursuant to andSection;250.43, (i) The functions; (ii) The participants to be included under the system (target populationsvs. all participants); and (iii) If not statewide, identification of the populations or areas thatwill use case management; and (9) The process for developing an employability plan, pursuant to andSection;250.41. (h) A description of any work experience program under andSection; 250.63or other employment, education, or training under andSection; 250.47 thatthe State proposes. (i) A description of how the State will determine the appropriateness ofeducational activities for different categories of participants, to include:(1) State policy on educational requirements for parents under age 20 whohave not completed high school or its equivalent, including any criteriafor excluding parents under age 18 from such requirements; (2) Any training or work alternatives in the case of a parent aged 18 or19 who has not completed high school or its equivalent; (3) State policy on educational activities for those age 20 or over withouta high school diploma or GED; (4) Criteria for determining those for whom attendance in higher educationor a school or course of vocational or technical training is appropriate;and (5) Policies for approval of postsecondary education (under section 482(d)(1)(B)(i)of the Act). (j) A description of the criteria that will be used to refer participantsto services and activities. The plan must describe the approaches the programwill use for individuals who are: (1) Members of the target populations described in andSection; 250.1; and(2) Parents and caretakers with children under the age of 6, includingthe State's exemption policy for those with children between the ages of1 and 3. (k) With regard to Unemployed Parent cases, (1) A description of agency policies on exemptions and participation ofa principal earner and the other parent; and (2) A description of any State-designed work program to meet the UP workrequirements at andSection; 250.33.(l) The State's policy for determining whether self-initiated educationand training constitutes participation consistent with the individual'semployment goals, and if the education or training is appropriate, howthe State will assure that any other participation by such individual inthe JOBS program will not be permitted to interfere. (m) A description of any agreements the State IV-A agency has reached withthe State's education agency, with regard to determining, consistent withthe relevant definitions in andSection; 250.1: (1) Whether an individual is attending such education or training activitiesin good standing; (2) Whether an individual is making satisfactory progress in such educationor training; and (3) How attendance that meets these specifications will be regularly determinedto be continuing. (n) A description of the State IV-A agency's actions to assure that trainingand education activities conducted under JOBS are directed toward specificjobs that are available, or are likely to become available, in the State.(o) An assurance that individuals are not discriminated against on thebasis of race, sex, national origin, religion, age, or handicapping conditionin assignment to training and education developed under the JOBS program.<ITAG tagnum="52">Subpart D_Participation Requirements, Exemptions and Sanctions </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 250.30</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Requirements for individual participation and exemptions. </ITAG>A State JOBS plan must provide that: (a) Where State resources otherwise permit, all recipients of AFDC wholive in a subdivision covered by a JOBS program and for whom the StateIV-A agency has guaranteed child care in accordance with Part 255 shallbe required to participate in JOBS except as provided under paragraph (b)of this section. (b) An individual shall be considered exempt and not be required to participateif she: (1) Is a dependent child who is under age 16 (except a minor parent whois considered an adult recipient for purposes of this part) or attends,full-time, an elementary, secondary, vocational or technical school; (2) Is ill, when determined by the State on the basis of medical evidenceor another sound basis that the illness or injury is serious enough totemporarily prevent entry into employment or training; (3) Is incapacitated, when verified by the State that a physical or mentalimpairment, determined by a physician or a licensed or certified psychologist,by itself or in conjunction with age, prevents the individual from engagingin employment or training under JOBS; (4) Is 60 years of age or older; (5) Resides in a subdivision of the State where the JOBS program is available,but in a location which is so remote from a JOBS program or activity thateffective participation is precluded. The individual shall be consideredremote if a round trip of more than 2 hours by reasonably available publicor private transportation, exclusive of time necessary to transport childrento and from a child care facility, would be required for a normal workor training day. However, if normal round trip commuting time in the areais more than 2 hours, then the round trip commuting time shall not exceedthe generally accepted community standards; (6) Is needed in the home because another member of the household requiresthe individual's presence due to illness or incapacity as determined bya physician or a licensed or certified psychologist, and no other appropriatemember of the household is available to provide the needed care; (7) Is working 30 or more hours a week. The State IV-A agency may establishminimum standards in its JOBS plan for work that qualifies an individualfor this exemption; (8) Is pregnant, and it has been medically verified that the child is expectedto be born in the month in which participation would be required or withinthe following six-month period; or (9)(i) Subject to paragraph (b)(9)(iv) of this section, is the parent orother relative of a child under 3 years of age (or an age less than 3 butnot less than 1, if the State plan so provides) who is personally providingcare for the child; or (ii) Subject to paragraph (b)(9)(iv) of this section, is the parent orother relative personally providing care for a child under 6 years of age,unless the State IV-A agency assures that child care will be guaranteedand that participation in the program by the parent or relative will notbe required for more than 20 hours per week. (iii) Only one parent or other relative in a case may be exempt under paragraph(b)(9)(i) or paragraph (b)(9)(ii) of this section. (iv) In the case of a family eligible for AFDC by reason of the unemploymentof the parent who is the principal earner, only one parent may be exemptunder paragraph (b)(9)(i) or paragraph (b)(9)(ii) of this section. TheState IV-A agency may: (A) Limit the exemptions in paragraph (b)(9)(i) and paragraph (b)(9)(ii)of this section to the parent who is not the principal earner; (B) Make the exemptions in paragraph (b)(9)(i) and paragraph (b)(9)(ii)of this section inapplicable to both parents and require their participationin the program if child care in accordance with Part 255 is guaranteedwith respect to the family. (c) The State IV-A agency will reevaluate any exemption at such time asthe condition is expected to terminate but no less frequently than eachredetermination of AFDC eligibility.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 250.31</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89"> Volunteers. </ITAG>The State IV-A agency must provide that applicants for and recipients ofAFDC who are exempt under andSection; 250.30 from participation in the programor who are not otherwise required by the State IV-A agency to participatewill be allowed to do so on a voluntary basis to the extent that the programis available in the applicable political subdivision and State resourcesotherwise permit. (a) The State IV-A agency shall give first consideration to applicantsfor or recipients of AFDC who volunteer to participate in determining thepriority of participation within the target populations described at andSection;250.1. (b) When an individual who volunteers to participate stops participatingin the program without good cause as defined at andSection; 250.35, (1) If she has been determined to be exempt pursuant to andSection; 250.30,she shall not be given priority to participate so long as other individualsare actively seeking to participate. (2) If she has been determined not to be exempt pursuant to andSection; 250.30,she shall be subject to sanction as described at andSection; 250.34.  <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 250.32</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89"> Participation requirements for education. </ITAG>(a) To the extent that the program is available in the political subdivisioninvolved and State resources otherwise permit, in the case of a custodialparent who is not yet 20 years of age, has not completed a high schooleducation (or its equivalent) and is not exempt from participation underandSection; 250.30(b), the State shall require such a parent to participatein educational activities as described in andSection; 250.44(a)(1). For purposesof this section, custodial parent means the parent who lives with the child,and custodial parents exempt under andSection; 250.30(b)(9) because of theage of the youngest child. (l) The State IV-A agency may require full-time participation (as definedby the educational provider) in educational activities directed towardthe attainment of a high school diploma or its equivalent. This includesindividuals who would otherwise only have to participate on a part-timebasis because their youngest child is under 6 years of age. (2) The State IV-A agency may excuse a custodial parent who is under age18 from the school attendance requirement if such parent is determinedto be beyond the State's compulsory attendance requirements and if theState's JOBS plan contains criteria for making this determination. TheState's criteria: (i) Must provide that each determination is based  upon an individual assessmentof the parent rather than upon the application of categorical exemptions;(ii) May not rely solely upon grade completion; and (iii) Must provide for participation in another educational activity asdefined under andSection; 250.44(a) from which the individual could benefit.(3) The State IV-A agency may require a custodial parent who is age l8or 19, and required to participate in JOBS under this section, to participatein training or work activities (subject to the 20-hour limit in andSection;250.30(b)(9)(ii)) in lieu of educational activities described at andSection;250.44(a) if one of the following conditions is met: (i) Such parent fails to make good progress in successfully completingeducational activities, or (ii) Prior to any assignment of the individual to such educational activitiesit is determined, based on an educational assessment and the employmentgoal established in the individual's employability plan, that participationin educational activities is inappropriate for such parent. (b) If a State IV-A agency requires an individual who has attained theage of 20 years and has not earned a high school diploma (or its equivalent)to participate in JOBS, the State agency shall include educational activitiesconsistent with her employment goals as a component in the individual'semployability plan. Any other services or  activities may not be permittedto interfere with her participation in appropriate educational activitiesunder andSection; 250.44. However, a State IV-A agency may elect not to requirean individual to participate in educational activities if: (l) The individual demonstrates a basic literacy level; or (2) The long-term employment goal of the individual, as identified by theState IV-A agency in her employability plan, does not require a high schooldiploma (or equivalent). <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 250.33</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Participation requirements for unemployed parents. </ITAG>(a) The State IV-A agency shall require that at least one parent, in anyfamily eligible for AFDC by reason of the unemployment of the parent whois the principal earner, participate for a total of at least 16 hours aweek in a work supplementation program, a community work experience program,or other work experience program, on-the-job training, or a State-designedwork program described in the State JOBS plan and approved by the Secretary.A State-designed work program may not substitute education or trainingactivities for the work requirement. (b) In the case of a parent under age 25 who has not completed high schoolor an equivalent course of education, the State IV-A agency may requirethe individual to participate in educational activities as defined at andSection;250.44(a) in lieu of one or more of the programs specified in paragraph(a) of this section. An individual meets the participation requirementsof this section if he or she is making satisfactory progress as definedat andSection; 250.1. (c) An individual participating in a community work experience programunder andSection; 250.63 shall be considered to have met the participationrequirement in paragraph (a) of this section if the individual participatesfor the maximum number of hours in any month calculated in accordance withandSection; 250.63(d)(1). <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 250.34</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Sanctions. </ITAG>(a)(1) When an AFDC recipient who is required to participate in the JOBSprogram, including those individuals required to participate because theState IV-A agency exercised its option under andSection; 250.30(b)(9)(iii),fails without good cause to participate in the program or refuses withoutgood cause to accept employment, the sanctions in paragraph (c) of thissection shall apply during the following periods: (i) For the first such failure or refusal, until the failure or refusalceases; (ii) For the second such failure or refusal, until the failure or refusalceases, or 3 months, whichever is longer; and (iii) For any subsequent failure or refusal, until the failure or refusalceases, or 6 months, whichever is longer. (2) Failure to participate in the program includes failure to meet StateIV-A agency requirements for orientation, assessment, employability development,plan or case management. (b) For the purpose of determining that an individual's failure to complyhas ceased in the instance of a first sanction, a State IV-A agency mayrequire the individual to participate in the activity to which she waspreviously assigned or an activity designed by the State to lead to fullparticipation for a period of up to two weeks before terminating the sanction.If she successfully participates in such activities, the sanction willbe considered to have terminated as of the day she agreed to participate.If no such activity is available, the sanction will terminate on the dayshe agrees to participate. (c) During the sanction period: (1) The State IV-A agency will not take into account the individual's needsin determining the family's need for assistance and the amount of the assistancepayment. (2) If the individual is a parent whose family is eligible in accordancewith andSection; 233.100, the State IV-A agency will not take into accountthe needs of his or her spouse in determining the family's need for assistanceand the amount of the assistance payment unless the spouse is participatingin the JOBS program. (d) If such individual is a parent or other caretaker relative, paymentsfor the remaining members of the assistance unit will be in the form ofprotective or vendor payments in accordance with andSection; 234.60(a)(12).However, if after making reasonable efforts the State IV-A agency is unableto locate an appropriate individual to whom protective payments can bemade, the State may continue to make payments on behalf of the remainingmembers of the assistance unit to the sanctioned caretaker relative.(e) The State IV-A agency will promptly remind any individual in writingwhose failure or refusal has continued for 3 months, of the individual'soption to end the sanction. The notice shall advise that: (1) She may immediately terminate the first or second sanction by participatingin the program or accepting employment; and (2) She may terminate any subsequent sanction after six months have elapsedby participating in the program or accepting employment. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 250.35</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Good cause. </ITAG>For the purposes of andSection; 250.34(a), good cause for failure to participatein the program or refusal to accept employment shall be found if: (a) The individual is the parent or other relative personally providingcare for a child under age 6 and the employment would require such individualto work more than 20 hours per week; (b) Child care (or day care for any incapacitated individual living inthe same home as a dependent child) is necessary for an individual to participateor continue participation in the program or accept employment and suchcare is not available and the State agency fails to provide such care;(c) The employment would result in the family of the participant experiencinga net loss of cash income. A participant may not claim good cause underthis paragraph if the State IV-A agency assures that the family will notexperience a net loss of cash income by making a supplemental payment.Net loss of cash income results if the family's gross income less necessarywork-related expenses is less than the cash assistance the individual wasreceiving at the time the offer of employment is made. Gross income includes,but is not limited to, earnings, unearned income and cash assistance; or(d) The individual meets other grounds for good cause set forth by theState IV-A agency in its JOBS plan. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 250.36</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Conciliation and fair hearings. </ITAG>(a) Each State IV-A agency shall establish a conciliation procedure toresolve disputes related to an individual's participation in the JOBS Program.(b) If a dispute is not resolved through conciliation, the State shallprovide the individual with an opportunity for a hearing. The hearing processmay follow the provisions of andSection; 205.10. Alternatively, the hearingprocess may be established especially for the JOBS program. However, assistancemay not be suspended, reduced, discontinued, or terminated as a resultof a dispute involving an individual's participation in JOBS unless thehearing meets the due process standards set forth by the U.S. Supreme Courtin <T3>Goldberg </T3>v. <T3>Kelly, </T3>397 U.S. 254 (1970).<ITAG tagnum="52">Subpart E_Operation of State JOBS Programs/Program Components </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 250.40</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Providing program information to AFDC applicants and recipients. </ITAG>(a) The State IV-A agency must at the time of application or redeterminationinform all AFDC applicants and recipients, in writing and orally as appropriate,of the availability of the program activities and the supportive servicesfor which they are eligible, and agency and participant responsibilities,including: (1) Education, employment, and training opportunities available under theJOBS plan; (2) Supportive services, including, but not limited to, child care duringparticipation, transitional child care, health coverage transition optionspursuant to section 1925 of the Act, and transportation and other work-relatedsupportive services provided under the JOBS plan; (3) The obligations of the State IV-A agency including the program andsupportive services to be provided, as described in paragraphs (a) (1)and (2) of this section; (4) The rights, responsibilities, and obligations of participants in theprogram, including but not limited to, the grounds for exemptions fromparticipation and the consequences for refusing or failing to participate(including the effect on volunteers as described in andSection; 250.31);(5)(i) The types and locations of child care services reasonably accessibleto participants in the program. Such information may be provided directlyor through arrangement with others such as the appropriate human servicesor resource and referral agency; (ii) The assistance that is available to help participants select appropriatechild care services; and (iii) The assistance available, on request, to help participants obtainchild care services. (b) The agency must also inform applicants and recipients of their responsibilityto cooperate in establishing paternity and enforcing child support obligations,as described in Part 232, and must assist individuals in obtaining thepaternity establishment and child support services for which they may beeligible. (c)(1) After the State IV-A agency gives an AFDC applicant the informationdescribed in paragraphs (a) (b) of this section, the State IV-A agency must notify the individual,in writing, within one month of the determination of eligibility, of theopportunity to indicate her desire to participate in the program and providea clear description of how to enter the program. (2) After the State IV-A agency gives an AFDC recipient the informationdescribed in paragraphs (a) and (b) of this section, the State IV-A agencymust notify the individual, in writing, within one month of providing thatinformation, of the opportunity to indicate her desire to participate inthe program, and provide a clear description of how to enter the program.(3) The notification provision in paragraph (c)(1) and (c)(2) of this sectiondoes not prohibit the State IV-A agency from requiring non-exempt recipients,or applicants in the case of job search, to participate in the JOBS programprior to the one-month notice. (4) If a non-exempt individual indicates a preference not to participate,in response to such notification under paragraph (c)(1) or (c)(2) of thissection, such a preference does not prevent the State IV-A agency fromotherwise requiring participation in JOBS. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 250.41</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Initial assessment and employability plan. </ITAG>(a)(1) Within a reasonable time period prior to participation the StateIV-A agency must make an initial assessment of employability based on:(i) The individual's educational, child care, and other supportive servicesneeds; (ii) The individual's proficiencies, skills deficiencies and prior workexperience; (iii) A review of the family circumstances, which may include the needsof any child of the individual; and (iv) Other factors that the State IV-A agency determines are relevant indeveloping the employability plan, as described in paragraph (b) of thissection. (2) The State IV-A agency may conduct the initial assessment through variousmethods such as interviews, testing, counseling and self-assessment instruments.(b) On the basis of the assessment described in paragraph (a) of this section,the State IV-A agency must develop an employability plan in consultationwith the participant, including a participant in a self-initiated activitypursuant to andSection; 250.48 of this part. (1) The employability plan must: (i) Contain an employment goal for the participant; (ii) Describe the services to be provided by the State IV-A agency, includingchild care and other supportive services pursuant to Part 255;(iii) Describe the JOBS activities, as described in Subpart E of this part,that will be undertaken by the participant to achieve the employment goal;and (iv) Describe any other needs of the family, pursuant to paragraph (a)(1)(iii)of this section, that might be met by JOBS, such as participation by achild in drug education or in life skills planning sessions. (2) The employability plan shall take into account: (i) Available program resources; (ii) The participant's supportive services needs; (iii) The participant's skills level and aptitudes; (iv) Local employment opportunities; and (v) To the maximum extent possible the preferences of the participant.(3) The employability plan shall not be considered a contract. (4) Final approval of the plan rests with the State IV-A agency. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 250.42</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Agency-participant agreement. </ITAG>(a) Following the initial assessment and the development of the employabilityplan as described in andSection; 250.41, the State IV-A agency may requirethe participant (or the adult caretaker in the family of which the participantis a member) to negotiate and enter into an agreement with the State IV-Aagency. (1) Such agreement should indicate at a minimum: (i) The purpose of the agreement; (ii) The participant's obligations under the program; (iii) The length of participation in the program, including the numberof hours of participation per week; and (iv) The educational, training and employment activities and the supportiveservices, including child care, to be provided by the agency during theperiod of participation. (2) If the State IV-A agency elects this option, it must give the participantsuch assistance as she may need to review and understand the agreement.(3) This agreement may be considered a contract between the State IV-Aagency and the JOBS participant, pursuant to applicable State laws andregulations. (b) If the State IV-A agency elects to use agreements or contracts, itdoes not have to use them in all political subdivisions having JOBS programs.The State IV-A agency, however, must apply this provision to participantson an equitable basis. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 250.43</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Case management. </ITAG>(a) The State IV-A agency may assign a case manager to a participant andthe participant's family. The decision to assign a case manager may bemade on a case-by-case basis. (b) The case manager must be responsible for assisting the family to obtainany services that may be needed to assure effective participation in theprogram. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 250.44</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Mandatory components. </ITAG>A State's JOBS program must include the following four services and activities.The State IV-A agency need not make each service or activity a discreteoffering, but may combine several into a single program activity, providedthat the State IV-A agency can adequately distinguish the principal componentsfor the purpose of Federal reporting requirements. The required servicesand activities are: (a) Any educational activity below the postsecondary level that the StateIV-A agency determines to be appropriate to the participant's employmentgoal. Such activities may be combined with training that the State IV-Aagency determines is needed in relation to the participant's employabilityplan. The educational activities that must be made available include, butare not limited to: (1) High school education or education designed to prepare a person toqualify for a high school equivalency certificate; (2) Basic and remedial education that will provide an individual with abasic literacy level, equivalent to successful completion of grade 8, inorder to fulfill an employment goal; basic education is instruction toprovide these educational skills for the first time; remedial educationinvolves repetition of such instruction previously given to the participant;and(3) Education in English proficiency for an individual who is not sufficientlycompetent to speak, read or write the English language to allow employmentcommensurate with her employability goal; (b) Job skills training, which includes vocational training for a participantin technical job skills and equivalent knowledge and abilities in a specificoccupational area. The State IV-A agency must develop qualitative measuresfor making good or satisfactory progress, pursuant to andSection; 250.1,for such programs, including those arranged through contracts and agreements,in order to qualify the training program as a component activity underJOBS; (c) Job readiness activities that help prepare participants for work byassuring that participants be familiar with general work place expectations,and exhibit work behavior and attitudes necessary to compete successfullyin the labor market; and (d) Job development and job placement activity by the agency, in solicitinga public or private employer's unsubsidized job opening, or in discoveringsuch job openings, and the marketing of participants, and securing jobinterviews for participants. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 250.45</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89"> Optional components. </ITAG>A State JOBS program must include, but is not limited to at least, twoof the following four components: (a) Group and individual job search, as described in andSection; 250.60;(b) On-the-job training, as described in andSection; 250.61; (c) Work supplementation, as described in andSection; 250.62; and (d) Community work experience program, or other approved work experienceprogram, as described in andSection; 250.63.  <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 250.46</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89"> Postsecondary education. </ITAG>A State's JOBS program may include referral of a participant to postsecondaryeducation, as determined necessary to meet any individual goals that aredirectly related to obtaining useful employment in a recognized occupation,within limits established by the State IV-A agency and reflected in theState JOBS plan. In accordance with andSection; 233.20(a)(2)(v), the costsof such education, including tuition, books and fees, do not qualify forFFP as special needs.  <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 250.47</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89"> Other education, training, and employment activities. </ITAG>(a) A State's JOBS program may include education, training, and employmentactivities other than those described in andSection;andSection; 250.44 through250.46, but which are included in the approved State JOBS plan. (b) In no event will a State program of public service employment be approvedunder JOBS. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 250.48</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Self-initiated education or training. </ITAG>(a) The State IV-A agency may allow a parent or other caretaker relativeor any dependent child in the family who is attending in good standingan institution of higher education (as defined in section 481(a) of theHigher Education Act of 1965), or a school or other entity offering a courseof vocational or technical training, at the time she would otherwise berequired to commence participation in the JOBS program, to continue toattend. Vocational or technical training consists of postsecondary education,as defined in andSection; 250.1, that both leads to useful employment ina recognized occupation and results in other than a baccalaureate or advanceddegree. Such participation shall meet the individual's obligation to participatein accordance with requirements at andSection; 250.30 if the following conditionsare met: (1) The participant is attending at least half-time as defined by the institution;and (2) The participant is making satisfactory progress in such institution,school, or course; and (3) The course of study is consistent with the individual's employmentgoal. (b) An applicant or recipient shall appear for an assessment and the developmentof an employability plan so that the State IV-A agency may determine theappropriateness of the educational or training activity. (c) If the State IV-A agency approves the educational or training activity,any other JOBS activities in which such individual participates may notbe permitted to interfere with the education or training activity. (d) A State IV-A agency may restrict postsecondary education or trainingin its State JOBS plan. (e) The costs of such education or training shall not constitute federallyreimbursable expenses under JOBS. (f) The costs of child care, transportation and other supportive serviceswhich the State IV-A agency determines are necessary for such attendanceare eligible for Federal reimbursement pursuant to andSection; 255.4. <ITAG tagnum="52">Subpart F_[Reserved] </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="56">Subpart G_Optional Components of State JOBS Programs </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 250.60</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Job search program. </ITAG>(a) A State IV-A agency may operate a job search program as a componentof its JOBS program. A job search program may serve participants in eithergroup or individual job-seeking activities. (1) Individual job search includes the provision of counseling, training,information dissemination and support on a one-to-one basis. (2) Group job search includes the provision of counseling and trainingin a group setting where applicants or recipients are taught job-seekingskills, and may include a phone bank from which participants contact potentialemployers. (b) In addition to non-exempt recipients, a State IV-A agency may requirean individual applying for AFDC to participate in job search unless sheis exempt under andSection; 250.30(b). (c) A State IV-A agency may require an individual to participate in a jobsearch program from the time she files an application for aid for an initialperiod of up to eight consecutive weeks. Following this initial period(which may extend beyond the date when eligibility is determined) the StateIV-A agency may require additional participation in job search not in excessof eight weeks (or its equivalent) in any period of 12 consecutive months.The first such period of 12 consecutive months shall begin at any timefollowing the close of the initial period. (1) A State IV-A agency may not delay the processing of an individual'sapplication for aid because of her participation in job search. (2) In no event may an individual be required to participate in job searchfor more than 3 weeks before the State IV-A agency conducts an assessmentas provided at andSection; 250.41. (d) Additional job search activities beyond those required in paragraph(c) of this section may be required only in conjunction with some othereducational, training, or employment activity designed to improve the individual'semployment prospects. (e) Job search by an individual under this section shall in no event betreated, for any purpose, as an activity under JOBS if the individual hasparticipated in such job search for 4 months out of the preceding 12 months.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 250.61</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">On-the-job training. </ITAG>(a) A State IV-A agency may operate an on-the-job training (OJT) programas a component of its JOBS program. Under OJT a participant is hired bya private or public employer and while engaged in productive work receivestraining that provides knowledge or skills essential to the full and adequateperformance of that job. The State IV-A agency or its agent shall enterinto a contract with the OJT employer to subsidize the extraordinary costsincurred by the employer in providing training and additional supervisionto the participant. (b) Payments to an employer for on-the-job training shall not exceed anaverage of 50 percent of the wages paid by the employer to the participantduring the period of such training. (c) A participant in OJT shall be compensated by the employer at the samerates, including benefits and periodic increases, as similarly situatedemployees or trainees and in accordance with applicable law, but in noevent less than the higher of the Federal minimum wage or applicable Stateor local minimum wage law. (d) Wages paid to participants in OJT will be considered to be earned incomefor purposes of any provision. (e) If a participant in OJT becomes ineligible for AFDC pursuant to therules applicable to earned income at andSection; 233.20, or pursuant to the100-hour rule at andSection; 233.100 in the case of a principal earner inan unemployed parent case, she shall remain a JOBS participant for theduration of the OJT and may be eligible for supportive services under Part255 available to other JOBS participants similarly situated. (f) If the individual would have been eligible for transitional child carepursuant to Part 256 at the time the ineligibility for AFDC occurred, sheshall be eligible for transitional child care after the OJT ends for thenumber of months that remain in the 12-month period following the monthin which she became ineligible for AFDC after OJT ended. As an alternative,the State IV-A agency may treat all child care provided after an individualin an OJT job loses eligibility for AFDC as transitional child care ifthe individual meets the requirements at Part 256. (g) The State IV-A agency must develop qualitative measures for makinggood or satisfactory progress, pursuant to andSection; 250.1, for OJT, inorder to qualify as a component activity under JOBS.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 250.62</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Work supplementation program. </ITAG>(a) A State IV-A agency may operate a work supplementation program as acomponent of its JOBS program. Under the work supplementation program,a State IV-A agency may use AFDC funds to develop and subsidize jobs forAFDC recipients as an alternative to aid. (b) A ``supplemented job'' is a job provided under this section to an eligibleindividual by the State or local agency administering the State IV-A planor by any other employer for which all or part of the wages are paid bysuch State or local IV-A agency. (1) The State IV-A agency may use whatever means it determines appropriateto provide or to subsidize jobs for participants. (2) The State IV-A agency may provide or subsidize any type of job. Itmay determine the length of time the position is to be provided or subsidized,the amount of wages to be paid to the recipient, the amount of subsidyto be provided by the State or local IV-A agency, and the conditions ofparticipation, except that no participant may be assigned to fill any established,unfilled position vacancy in accordance with section 484 of the Act. (c) An eligible individual is an individual who is in a category whichthe State IV-A agency determines should be eligible to participate in thework supplementation program, and who would, at the time of placement inthe supplemented job, be eligible for AFDC if the State IV-A agency didnot have a work supplementation program in effect. For the purpose of thissection, time of placement is defined as the date on which the State IV-Aagency and the employer reach agreement on the terms of the placement andthe specific individual to be placed. (d) A State or local IV-A agency administering the State plan is not requiredto provide employee status to any eligible individual to whom it providesa job position or with respect to whom it subsidizes all or part of thewages paid to such individual by another entity under this program, noris it required to provide that eligible individuals filling job positionsprovided by other entities under such program be provided employee statusby such entity during the first 13 weeks in which they fill such position.(e) Participants in supplemented jobs will be paid wages which shall beconsidered to be earned income for purposes of any provision of law. (f) The State IV-A agency may elect to calculate the amount of an eligibleindividual's residual (direct AFDC) grant, if any, at the time of placementin the supplemented job and base the amount of the residual grant (theAFDC grant minus earnings and other countable income) for the durationof the individual's participation in the supplemented job (in whole orpart) on that calculation. Such a policy is known as ``freezing the grant.''If the individual becomes otherwise ineligible for AFDC benefits, the StateIV-A agency may allow the individual to continue in the supplemented joband divert the AFDC grant to the wage pool, but the State IV-A agency shallnot pay a residual grant to the individual. (g) At State option, individuals who hold supplemented jobs may be exemptfrom the retrospective budgeting requirements at Part 233 and monthly reporting,and the amount of the aid which is payable to the family of any such individualfor any month, or which would be so payable but for the individual's participationin a supplemented job, shall be determined on the basis of the income andother relevant circumstances in that month. (h) If an individual in a supplemented job would have been eligible fortransitional child care pursuant to Part 256 at the time the ineligibilityfor AFDC occurred, she shall be eligible for transitional child care afterher supplemented job ends for the number of months that remain in the 12-monthperiod following the month in which she became ineligible. In the alternative,the State IV-A agency may treat all child care provided after an individualin a supplemented job loses eligibility for AFDC as transitional childcare if the individual meets the requirements at Part 256. (i) A State IV-A agency may adjust the standard of need under the StateIV-A plan as the State determines to be necessary and appropriate to carryout a work supplementation program. Such changes in the need standard maybe made notwithstanding andSection; 233.20. (1) The standard of need in effect in those subdivisions of the State inwhich such program is in operation may be different from the need standardin effect in subdivisions in which such program is not available. (2) The standard of need for categories of recipients of aid may vary amongsuch categories as the State IV-A agency determines to be appropriate onthe basis of ability to participate in the work supplementation program.(3) A State IV-A agency may make further adjustments in the amount of aidpaid under the title IV-A plan to different categories of recipients inorder to offset increases in benefits from other government-provided, needs-relatedprograms as the State IV-A agency deems necessary and appropriate to furtherthe purpose of the work supplementation program. (j) A State IV-A agency may reduce or eliminate the amount of earned incometo be disregarded from participation in a supplemented job. (k) Notwithstanding the time limitations on the $30 and one-third and the$30 disregard in andSection; 233.20(a)(11), a State IV-A agency may allowa participant employed in a supplemented job to receive the $30 and one-thirdor the $30 disregards for one or more of the first nine months of suchemployment. (l) Payments by the State IV-A agency to individuals or to entities providingjobs for recipients under the work supplementation program shall be expendituresincurred by the State IV-A agency for AFDC and shall not exceed the amountthat would otherwise be payable under the title IV-A plan if the familyof each individual employed in the program had received the maximum amountof aid payable to such a family with no income for a period of either 9months or the length of the individual's employment in the program, whicheveris less. (This amount is determined without regard to any adjustments madeunder paragraphs (i), (j), and (k) of this section, and for each monthof participation, may be based upon the maximum amount that would otherwisehave been payable for a month at the time of placement in the program).(m) A State IV-A agency may determine the amounts to be reserved and usedfor providing and subsidizing jobs under this section by using a samplingmethodology. The State IV-A agency must describe its sampling methodologyin its JOBS plan.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 250.63</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Community work experience program. </ITAG>(a) A State IV-A agency may operate a community work experience program(CWEP) as a component of its JOBS program. The purpose of CWEP is to improvethe employability of individuals not otherwise able to obtain employmentby providing work experience and training to assist them to move promptlyinto regular public or private employment. (b) The State IV-A agency shall provide coordination among a communitywork experience program, any program of job search, and the other employment-relatedactivities under the JOBS program to insure that job placement will havepriority over participation in CWEP, and that individuals eligible to participatein more than one program under JOBS are not denied AFDC on the groundsof failure to participate in one such program if they are actively andsatisfactorily participating in another. The State IV-A agency may providethat part-time participation in more than one such program may be requiredwhere appropriate. (c) Community work experience programs shall be limited to projects whichserve a useful public purpose in fields such as health, social service,environmental protection, education, urban and rural development and redevelopment,welfare, recreation, public facilities, public safety, and day care. (d)(1) The maximum number of hours that an individual may be required towork or undergo training (or both) in CWEP is the number of hours whichwould result from dividing the family's monthly grant amount by the greaterof the Federal or the applicable State minimum wage. (2) A State IV-A agency may include the value of food stamp benefits incomputing the maximum number of hours that a food stamp recipient, whois exempt from food stamp work registration by virtue of her participationin a CWEP program under JOBS, is required to participate. No food stamprecipient, who is exempt from food stamp work registration, may be requiredto participate in CWEP under JOBS more than 120 hours per month. (3) The portion of a recipient's aid for which the State is reimbursedby a child support collection (except for the $50 pass-through) shall beexcluded in determining the maximum number of hours that she is requiredto work. (e) Nothing contained in this section shall be construed as authorizingthe payment of AFDC as compensation for work performed, nor shall a participantbe entitled to a salary or to any work or traininq expense provided underany other provision of law by reason of her participation in a CWEP program.(f) To the extent possible, a State IV-A agency should take into accountthe prior training, experience and skills of a recipient in making appropriatework assignments. (1) After each six months of an individual's participation in a communitywork experience program and at the conclusion of each assignment undersuch a program the State IV-A agency must provide a reassessment and revision,as appropriate, of the individual's employability plan. (2) After an individual has been assigned to a position for a total ofnine months, such individual may not be required to continue in that assignmentunless the maximum number of hours of participation is no greater thanthe family's grant divided by the highest of: (i) The Federal minimum wage; or (ii) The applicable State minimum wage; or (iii) The rate of pay for individuals employed in the same or similar occupationsby the same employer at the same site.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10">The portion of a recipient's aid for which the State is reimbursedby a child support collection (not including the $50 pass-through) shallcontinue to be excluded in determining the number of hours that such individualmay be required to work. (g) Participants in CWEP may perform work in the public interest (whichotherwise meets the requirements of this section) for a Federal officeor agency with its consent, and, notwithstanding 31 U.S.C. 1342, or anyother provision of law, such agency may accept such services, but suchparticipants shall not be considered to be Federal employees for any purpose.(h) Nothing in this section or in any State plan approved under andSection;250.20 shall be construed to prevent a State IV-A agency from operating(on such terms and conditions and in such cases as the State IV-A agencymay find to be necessary or appropriate) a community work experience program.(i) CWEP participants must not fill established, unfilled position vacanciesin accordance with section 484 of the Act. (j) FFP is not available for: (1) Capital expenditures, depreciation or use allowances in connectionwith a CWEP; (2) The cost of making or acquiring materials or equipment in connectionwith participation in a project; or (3) The cost of supervision of participants. (k) The State IV-A agency may offer any other work experience program whichis described in the JOBS plan and approved by the Secretary. (1) The program narrative for such a program should include a descriptionof the potential sponsors; the type of activities; the hours or lengthof participation required; target group(s); and how the program is differentfrom CWEP. (2) The limitations on FFP for CWEP in paragraph (j) of this section applyto all State work experience programs. (3) Any other work experience program must meet the general program standardsat section 484 of the Act.<ITAG tagnum="50">Subpart H_Funding </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 250.70</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89"> JOBS allocation entitlement. </ITAG>(a) Federal matching for JOBS program expenditures is limited to a nationaltotal equal to the amounts authorized and appropriated for each fiscalyear. (b) A State IV-A agency with an approved JOBS plan shall be entitled topayments from this annual limit. The maximum annual payment for a Statewill be the sum of two amounts: (1) An amount equal to the State's WIN or WIN Demonstration allotment forfiscal year 1987; and (2) An amount allocated from the balance of the annual national limitationon the basis of each State's relative average monthly number of adult recipientsas defined at andSection; 250.1. (c) In accordance with andSection; 92.23, JOBS funds allocated to a StateIV-A agency for a given Federal fiscal year are for use during that fiscalyear and must be obligated by the State no later than the end of the fiscalyear. Carry forward of an unobligated balance of Federal funds to a succeedingFederal fiscal year is not permitted. An unobligated Federal fund balanceat the close of a Federal fiscal year will be returned to the Federal governmentthrough the issuance of a negative grant award by the Department followingreceipt of the final quarterly  expenditure report for the fiscal year.(d) A State must liquidate all obligations incurred under the title IV-Fgrant awards not later than one year after the end of the fiscal year forwhich the funds were awarded and obligated. The Federal share of unliquidatedobligations will be returned to the Federal government.  <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 250.71</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89"> Allotment of JOBS limit of entitlement. </ITAG>(a) For a State IV-A agency that implements JOBS in a quarter of a fiscalyear prior to October l, l990, the State's allotment from its JOBS limitof entitlement for that period will be proportional to the number of suchquarters that JOBS is operational in that State in that fiscal year. (b) An Indian Tribe or Alaska Native organization which receives the Secretary'sapproval to conduct a JOBS program shall receive a direct payment for operationof its JOBS program, without the requirement for a non-Federal share, pursuantto andSection; 250.93. (1) The amount of any such direct payment will be deducted from the amountof the State's allotment, and will be proportional to the Tribe's or organization'sproportion of the State's adult AFDC recipient population, as establishedpursuant to andSection; 250.93. (2) The remaining allocation to a State IV-A agency shall be subject tothe regulations governing FFP at andSection; 250.73. (c) The following rules apply to Puerto Rico, Guam, the Virgin Islandsand American Samoa which are subject to the provisions of section 1108of the Act: (1) The limitations on payments contained in section 1108 do not applyto a State's annual limit of entitlement for the JOBS program as describedin andSection; 250.70(b).  (2) The availability of FFP for child care under Part 255 and the relatedappropriate FFP rates are described at andSection; 255.4(b)(2) and andSection;255.4(g). (3) The availability of FFP for transitional child care under Part 256and the related appropriate FFP rates are described at andSection; 256.4(b).<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 250.72</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Maintenance of effort. </ITAG>(a) Federal JOBS funds shall not be used to supplant non-Federal fundsfor existing services and activities that promote the purposes of JOBS.Non-Federal funds include both State and local match of Federal funds forexisting services for AFDC applicants and recipients and the amounts spentdirectly by the State IV-A agency without benefit of Federal matching funds.(b) State and local IV-A agency expenditures for these purposes shall notbe less than the fiscal year 1986 level. At a minimum, this requirementapplies to non-Federal funds expended for programs to increase self-sufficiency,reduce welfare dependency, and increase earnings of AFDC applicants andrecipients. (c) State IV-A agency contracts and arrangements may be made for servicesonly to the extent that they are not otherwise available on a non-reimbursablebasis. ``Not otherwise available'' here means that if the services wereavailable for AFDC applicants and recipients before JOBS, the State IV-Aagency's provider must maintain that level of service before the StateIV-A agency may contract for additional services of the same sort fromthat agency. (d) Any State IV-A agency arrangement or contract must contain a certificationfrom the provider that the services being contracted for are not otherwiseavailable from that provider on a non-reimbursable basis. Services providedon a ``non-reimbursable basis'' are those services that a State is requiredto provide to all citizens or to the low income population, including AFDCapplicants and recipients. (e) A State IV-A agency directly providing JOBS component services mustcertify in the State JOBS plan that such services are not otherwise availableon a nonreimbursable basis. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 250.73</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Matching rates. </ITAG>(a) From a State IV-A agency's total annual limit of entitlement, FFP isavailable at a rate of 90 percent for expenditures up to an amount equalto the State's WIN or WIN Demonstration allotment for fiscal year 1987.The State's match for this amount may be in cash or in kind fairly evaluated.(b)(1) FFP will be available for the balance of a State IV-A agency's limitof entitlement as follows: (i) At the higher of the State's Medicaid matching rate or 60 percent forprogram costs as described in paragraph (c) of this section, and for personnelcosts (salaries and benefits) for full-time staff working in any capacityin the JOBS program; and (ii) At 50 percent for all other administrative costs, as described inparagraph (d) of this section, and transportation, work-related expenses,and work-related supportive services as defined in Part 255. (2) A State's match for these amounts must be in cash, not in kind. TheState share for private and public funds must meet the requirements ofandSection; 235.66. (c) The term ``program costs'' includes: the costs for an individual'sparticipation in a component, such as OJT payments to an employer, andtuition and fees, where not excluded, for an individual's participationin a JOBS education component; the personnel costs (salaries and benefits)for staff and first-line supervisors directly providing component servicesto participants, and the costs for equipment, supplies and materials usedby a JOBS participant while she is actively participating in the activitiesof a component. (d) ``Administrative costs'' are those costs not considered ``program costs'',including overhead expenditures, JOBS subsystems costs, personnel costs(salaries and benefits) for staff not directly providing component servicesto participants such as second-line supervisors and above, personnel administrationcosts, and all other indirect costs. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 250.74</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Reduced matching rate. </ITAG>(a)(1) FFP for a State IV-A agency shall be 50 percent (rather than therates described in andSection; 250.73) in any fiscal year in which that Statespends less than 55 percent of the State's JOBS expenditures on applicantsand recipients who are members of the State's target populations as definedin andSection; 250.1. (2) lf any State IV-A agency demonstrates to the satisfaction of the Secretarythat the characteristics of the caseload in that State make it infeasibleto meet the requirements of paragraph (a)(1) of this section, and thatthe State is targeting an approved set of long-term or potential long-termrecipients, the match rate in andSection; 250.73 shall be applied. (3) A State IV-A agency need not require or allow participation of an individualin the program if, as a result of such participation, the amount payableto the State for quarters in a fiscal year with respect to the programwould be reduced pursuant to paragraph (a)(1) of this section. (b)(1) FFP for a State IV-A agency shall be 50 percent (rather than therates described in andSection; 250.73) in any fiscal year for the State'sJOBS expenditures if the State's participation rate (determined under paragraph(b)(2) of this section) for the preceding fiscal year does not equal orexceed: (i) 7 percent if the preceding fiscal year is 1990;(ii) 7 percent if such year is 1991, however, no reduction in FFP shallbe made in 1991 for any failure to meet the participation rate specifiedin (b)(1)(i) of this section; (iii) 11 percent if such year is 1992; (iv) 11 percent if such year is 1993; (v) 15 percent if such year is 1994; and (vi) 20 percent if such year is 1995. (2) The State IV-A agency's participation rate for a fiscal year shallbe the average of its participation rates for computation periods in suchfiscal year. The computation periods shall be: (i) The fiscal year, in the case of fiscal year 1990; (ii) The first six months, and the seventh through twelfth months, in thecase of fiscal year 1991; (iii) The first three months, the fourth through sixth months, the sevenththrough ninth months, and the tenth through twelfth months, in the caseof fiscal years 1992 and 1993; and (iv) Each month, in the case of fiscal years 1994 and 1995. (3) The State IV-A agency's participation rate for a computation periodshall be the number, expressed as a percentage, equal to: (i) The averagemonthly number of individuals required or allowed by the State to participatein the program, who have participated (as defined in andSection; 250.1) insuch program in months in the computation period, plus the number of individualsrequired or allowed by the State to participate in such program, who haveso participated in that month in such period for which the number of suchparticipants is the greatest; divided by (ii) twice the average monthlynumber of individuals required to participate in such period (other thanindividuals described in paragraphs (9)(i) and (9)(iv) of andSection; 250.30(b)with respect to whom the State IV-A agency has exercised its option torequire their participation and individuals sanctioned under andSection;250.34). (4) If the Secretary determines that the State IV-A agency has failed toachieve the participation rate for any fiscal year specified above, hemay waive, in whole or in part, the reduction in the payment rate otherwiserequired by paragraph (b)(1) of this section if he finds that: (i) The State is in conformity with section 402(a)(19) and Part F of theAct; (ii) The State has made a good faith effort to achieve the applicable participationrate for such fiscal year; and (iii) The State has submitted a proposal which is likely to achieve theapplicable participation rate for the current fiscal year and the subsequentfiscal years (if any) specified therein. (c)(1) FFP for a State IV-A agency shall be 50 percent beginning in fiscalyear 1995 for the State's JOBS expenditures (rather than the rates describedin andSection; 250.73) if the percentage of UP cases meeting the participationrequirements in andSection; 250.33, for the preceding fiscal year does notequal or exceed: (i) 40 percent in the case of the average of each month in fiscal year1994; (ii) 50 percent in the case of the average of each month in fiscal year1995; (iii) 60 percent in the case of the average of each month in fiscal year1996; and (iv) 75 percent in the case of the average of each month in each of thefiscal years 1997 and 1998. (2) The percentage of participants for any month in a fiscal year for thispurpose shall equal the average of: (i) The number of individuals describedin andSection; 250.33 who have met the requirement therein; divided by (ii)the total number of principal earners (but excluding those in familieswho have been recipients of aid for 2 months or less if, during the periodthat the family received aid, at least one parent engaged in intensivejob search as defined in andSection; 250.1). (3) If the Secretary determines that the State IV-A agency has failed toachieve the participation rate for any fiscal year specified above, hemay waive, in whole or in part, the reduction in the payment rate otherwiserequired by paragraph (c)(1) of this section if he finds that: (i) The State is in conformity with section 402(a)(19) and Part F of theAct; (ii) The State has made a good faith effort to achieve the applicable participationrate and has been unable to do so because of economic conditions in theState, including significant numbers of recipients living in remote locationsor isolated rural areas where the availability of work sites is severelylimited, or because of rapid and substantial increases in the caseloadthat cannot reasonably be planned for; and (iii) The State has submitted a proposal which is likely to achieve theapplicable participation rate for the current fiscal year and the subsequentfiscal years (if any) specified therein. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 250.75</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Activities excluded from FFP. </ITAG>(a) The costs of education or training activities (such as tuition, books,fees, room, board) that the State IV-A agency determines may constituteparticipation under the provisions of andSection; 250.48 shall not constitutefederally reimbursable expenses for purposes of the JOBS program. (b) No funds shall be used for construction. (c) No funds shall be used to assist, promote, or deter union organizing.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 250.76</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Financial reports, records, statements and audits. </ITAG>(a) Financial reporting of JOBS program expenditures are generally subjectto the requirements of the existing regulations at andSection; 201.5 andandSection; 92.41, as appropriate. (b) Financial records and accounts shall be made available for audit purposesto the Secretary or any authorized representative. (c)(1) JOBS program funds are subject to the administration of grant regulationsat Part 92. (2) Program funds and activities shall be audited in conformity with therequirements of andSection;andSection; 92.26 and 74.62(a). (3) JOBS program records are subject to the ``retention and access requirementsfor records'' at andSection; 92.42. (d) FFP improperly claimed under the JOBS program is subject to disallowance.If a State IV-A agency disagrees with a decision to disallow FFP, it canappeal within 30 days of the date of the disallowance decision. The proceduresfor appeal of AFDC disallowances apply, including review of the DepartmentalAppeals Board in accordance with Part 16 of these regulations. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 250.77</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Costs matchable as AFDC payments. </ITAG>(a) Costs incurred by the State IV-A agency for supplemental AFDC paymentsshall be treated as title IV-A costs with respect to which sections 403(a)(1)or 403(a)(2) of the Act apply, when such payments are made in order thata recipient's family shall not experience a net loss of cash income fromthe recipient having been required by the State to accept a job. (b) Payments to employers under work supplementation as described at andSection;250.62(1) shall be expenditures incurred by the State IV-A agency for AFDC.<ITAG tagnum="52">Subpart I_Uniform Data Collection Requirements </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 250.80</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Uniform data collection requirements. </ITAG>(a) A State IV-A agency must provide to the Department a sample of monthlyunaggregated case record data containing such data and identifiers as arespecified in andSection; 250.82. The sample must be provided in formats specifiedby the Department. Each record of the sample must contain an identifierthat is not the Social Security number, and that protects the privacy ofthe individual relative to the requirements of andSection; 205.50. The samplemust be large enough to provide a precision of plus or minus one percentagepoint at a 95 percent confidence level, for at least those data elementsnecessary to determine a State's FFP as required in andSection; 250.74. Submissionof the universe of JOBS case records is also acceptable. Data must be submittedelectronically on an ongoing basis, with all cases submitted no later than45 days after the end of the month. (b) For purposes of determining participation rates, a State IV-A agencymust report, for each month, on a quarterly basis, the aggregate numberof individuals required to participate as specified in andSection; 250.74(b)(3)(ii).(c) A State IV-A agency must annually develop and submit to the Secretarya table of the previous Federal fiscal year's average total cost per participantper month of participation, separately stated with regard to each componentand service the State IV-A agency makes available. The Department willdetermine a State IV-A agency's eligibility for enhanced FFP as specifiedat andSection; 250.74(a) by applying a State's activity levels of targetpopulation participants to that State's table of average costs. (d) A State IV-A agency must submit any other information that the Secretarydetermines necessary.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 250.81</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">State data systems options. </ITAG>(a) A State IV-A agency may integrate its JOBS Automated System (JAS) withan existing or planned title IV-A system. A State IV-A agency may alsouse a stand-alone system. Either option must be a client-based informationsystem capable of producing at a minimum all data elements required inandSection; 250.82. FFP may be available from either title IV-A or titleIV-F funds, as described in paragraphs (b) and (c) of this section. (b)(1) Title IV-A funding is available for acquisition and developmentof the JOBS interface between title IV-A and title IV-F requirements. Theinterface of an automated JOBS program with the title IV-A system, forverification of eligibility and reconciliation of data, includes planning,development and implementation of title IV-A subsystems to: (i) Manage information on eligibility factors and target group membership;(ii) Effect notifications and referrals including non-cooperation; (iii) Check records of applicants and recipients on a periodic basis withother agencies to verify continued eligibility; and (iv) Notify appropriate officials when a recipient ceases to be eligible.(2) If the JAS interfaces with an existing or planned FAMIS-type systemand all FAMIS requirements are met, 90 percent FFP is available. Otherwiseinterface expenditures are matched at 50 percent. (c) JOBS funding is available at a 50 percent administrative rate for theacquisition and development of the remainder of the JAS, subject to therequirements of andSection; 205.37. This excludes the JOBS interface withthe title IV-A subsystem, but includes all other input, maintenance andreporting of those data elements required in andSection; 250.82 that cannotbe obtained from the title IV-A subsystem through the JOBS interface. Acost allocation plan must be approved to share the cost among all Federaland State programs benefiting from the State's JAS. (d) The Advance Planning Document (APD) for each subsystem must meet allexisting requirements for such a system pursuant to andSection; 205.37. (e) Administrative funding under either title IV-A or title IV-F for systemsdevelopment, implementation, operation and/or automatic data processingequipment acquisition must comply with the requirements of andSection; 95.611.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 250.82</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Required case record data. </ITAG>(a) In order for a State IV-A agency to produce unaggregated case recorddata that are required to be reported with regard to individuals who areserved in the JOBS program, the data elements specified below are requiredto be maintained in the State IV-A agency's individual case record foreach JOBS participant and for each individual in a self-initiated activitythat the State has determined to be eligible for support services. To theextent the State IV-A agency's JAS can access the required elements inthe required form from other subsystems, duplicate entry is to be avoided.(b) The minimum data elements are: (1) Case identifier in lieu of Social Security Number; (2) Date of birth; (3) Basis of eligibility, including codes for UP or regular AFDC, and fordeprivation factor; (4) Applicant or recipient status; (5) Beginning date of current AFDC eligibility; (6) Prior receipt of AFDC; (7) Education level; (8) Literacy level, when established through an educational assessmentusing TABE or other State-prescribed tool; (9) Target group codes to identify, for that month, which of the targetgroups specified in andSection; 250.1 an individual was a member of, if any,at the time of assessment; (10) Participation status as defined in andSection; 250.1(1). (11) Participation status in a component as defined in andSection; 250.1(5),including separate identification of self-initiated educational or trainingactivity; (12) Participation status in intensive job search as defined in andSection;250.1 or UP work participation as defined in andSection;andSection; 250.1(4)(i) and (ii); (13) Date entered into current JOBS component, or initial assessment; (14) Date entered into initial JOBS component as defined in andSection;andSection;250.1 (5) or (6); (15) Amount of child care payment during the month, pursuant to section402(g)(1)(A). <ITAG tagnum="52">Subpart J_Operation of JOBS Programs by Indian Tribes and Alaska NativeOrganizations </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 250.90</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Scope and purpose. </ITAG>The purpose of an Indian Tribe or Alaska Native organization JOBS programis to assure that Tribal (refers to both an Indian Tribe and Alaska Nativeorganization) members receiving AFDC obtain the education, training andemployment services they need to avoid long-term dependency. Tribal granteesare subject to all the regulations under Part 250, unless otherwise indicatedin this subpart, and, as appropriate, regulations under Parts 255, 74,and 92, which include general funding and disallowance and terminationprovisions for Federal programs.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 250.91 Eligible Indian Tribe and Alaska Native organizationgrantees. </ITAG>Funds shall be allotted to operate a JOBS program pursuant to andSection;250.71 to groups meeting the following eligibility standards: (a) An Indian Tribe, defined as any Tribe, band, nation, or other organizedgroup or community of Indians which: (1) Is federally recognized as eligible for the special programs and servicesprovided by the United States Government to Indians because of their statusas Indians; and (2) Has a reservation, which means Indian reservations, public domain Indianallotments, or former Indian reservations in Oklahoma. (b) A consortium or Tribal organization representing more than one Tribeif each participating member Tribe meets the eligibility requirements forJOBS as defined in paragraph (a) of this section. Such organizations mustalso meet the following criteria: (1) All the participating members must be in geographic proximity to oneanother. However, a consortium may operate in more than one State; (2) The consortium must demonstrate that it has the managerial, technicalor administrative staff with the ability to properly administer governmentfunds, manage a  JOBS program, and comply with the provisions of the Statuteand of the regulations; (3) The consortium must submit with its JOBS application a resolution fromeach participating Tribe authorizing the consortium to receive JOBS fundson behalf of each Tribe in its JOBS program. (c) An Alaska Native Organization including any Alaska Native village,or regional or village corporation eligible to operate a Federal programunder Public Law 93-638 (Indian Self-Determination and Education AssistanceAct, 25 U.S.C. 450) or such group's designee. The boundaries of an AlaskaNative organization are those of the geographical region, established pursuantto section 7(a) of the Alaska Native Claims Settlement Act, (85 Stat. 688)within which the Alaska Native organization is located.  <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 250.92</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89"> Selection criteria for eligible Alaska Native organizations. </ITAG>(a) The Secretary may approve only one application from an Alaska Nativeorganization for each of the 12 geographical regions established pursuantto section 7(a) of the Alaska Native Claims Settlement Act. The Departmentshall designate the Alaska Native grantee for each geographic region basedon the following criteria: (1) Previous experience in operating an effective employment and trainingprogram serving Indians and Native Alaskans; (2) The number and kinds of activities of similar magnitude and complexitythat the applicant has successfully completed; and (3) The ability to provide services effectively to all eligible NativeAlaskans residing in the region. (b) In order to be approved an Alaska Native application must promote theefficient and nonduplicative administration of the JOBS program in theState of Alaska. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 250.93</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Funding formula. </ITAG>(a) A Tribal grantee's share of program funds will be calculated annuallypursuant to andSection; 250.71 and will be based on the following ratio:(1) The number of adult members of the Indian Tribe receiving AFDC wholive in the designated service area_defined as reservation only, the reservationplus adjacent counties, or the reservation plus adjacent land within aspecified distance which would be reasonably accessible for Indian TribalJOBS participants_compared to the total number of adult AFDC recipientsin the State; or (2) The number of adult Alaska Natives receiving AFDC who reside withinthe boundaries of the region which the organization represents to the totalnumber of adult AFDC recipients in the State of Alaska. (b)(1) The State IV-A agency and the Indian Tribe or Alaska Native organizationmust exchange available information on adult Tribal AFDC recipients neededto determine the eligible Tribal population and to define the designatedservice area, if other than the reservation or trust lands, as appropriate.State and Tribal representatives receiving such AFDC recipient data mustfollow standards of confidentiality to assure that recipient and Tribalprivacy is protected pursuant to andSection; 205.50. (2) If sufficient data on adult AFDC members of a Tribe or of an AlaskaNative organization are not available, the State IV-A agency and the Tribeor organization may enter into an agreement covering a mutually agreedupon estimated figure of the eligible Tribal population and the designatedservice area, as appropriate. (3) If the State IV-A agency and the Tribe or organization cannot agreeon the number of Tribal adult AFDC recipients and/or designated servicearea, the Secretary, in consultation with the Tribe or organization andState, will make the final determination of Tribal funding. (c) A Tribal grantee is not required to match Federal funds.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 250.94</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Program administration, implementation and operations. </ITAG>(a) The Tribal grantee must designate a Tribal agency or department toadminister the Tribal JOBS program. (1) The designated agency or department will be responsible for the administrationof the Tribal JOBS program including the requirements under 402(a)(19)and Part F of the Act. (2) The responsibility for the administration of JOBS, pursuant to paragraph(a)(1) of this section, includes functional areas such as exemption andpriority determinations (andSection; 250.30), orientation and referrals (andSection;250.40), assessment and the development of the employability plan (andSection;250.41), JOBS activities (andSection; 250.44 and andSection; 250.94(e)), disputeresolution and hearings (andSection; 250.36). Certain other related functionsare retained by the State IV-A agency. These include the imposition ofsanctions as described in andSection; 250.34 and the administration of provisionson child care (Part 255) and transitional child care services (Part 256).(3) The designated agency or department may not delegate or contract outany functions which involve agency discretion, as detailed in andSection;250.10 of the regulations. (b) The Tribe or organization may begin operating its JOBS program as ofthe first day of any quarter between July 1, 1989,and October 1, 1990,independent of the State's JOBS implementation date. If the Tribe or organizationelects to begin operating its program before the State, during this interimtime period: (1) The Tribe or organization must guarantee necessary child care (withoutadditional title IV-A funding for child care pursuant to Part 255) if itrequires an individual to participate in its JOBS program. (2) If the Tribe or organization cannot guarantee necessary child careas described in paragraph (b)(1) of this section, it cannot require anindividual to participate in its JOBS program but may operate an entirelyvoluntary program. (c) The Tribe or organization may not begin its JOBS program prior to approvalof the Secretary. Final documentation for the application (meaning supplementalmaterials submitted after the initial April 13, 1989, application) mustbe sent to the Department at least 45 days prior to implementation of theTribal program. This will allow sufficient time for the Department's reviewand approval. (d)(1) Tribes or organizations shall not be subject to the specific requirementsof andSection; 250.12 of the regulations, but must coordinate program serviceswith appropriate agencies as follows: (i) The Tribal application with final documentation must be submitted tothe State IV-A agency for its review and comment at least 30 days beforesubmittal to the Secretary. The Tribe or organization shall consider commentsmade by the State IV-A agency in its application submitted to the Secretary.(ii) The application with final documentation must also be made availableto Tribal members for review and comment at least 30 days prior to submittalto the Secretary. The Tribe or organization must certify in its applicationthat such public participation has taken place. (2) To operate a JOBS program, the Tribe or organization must coordinatewith the State IV-A agency to ensure that interrelated program functionsare effectively performed. These functions include State responsibilities_suchas providing to the Tribal grantee eligibility notifications and the necessarychild care funds or services for Tribal participation_and Tribal responsibilities_suchas notifying the State IV-A agency when Tribal members fail to participatewithout good cause. (3) A Tribe or organization must consult and coordinate with other providersincluding those specified in paragraph (d)(4) of this section, to identifyexisting resources, prevent duplication of services and ensure that themaximum level of services is available to enable participants to achieveself-sufficiency. (4) At a minimum, the Tribal grantee must consult and coordinate with:(i) The Tribal agency responsible for JTPA, if applicable; (ii) The Tribal agency responsible for other employment and training services,including those offered under the Bureau of Indian Affairs; (iii) The Tribal agency responsible for education including any programsunder the Bureau of Indian Affairs, the Department of the Interior, orunder the Office of Indian Education, of the Department of Education. (5) The Tribal grantee must consult with existing formal advisory councils,such as private industry councils, as appropriate, on the development ofarrangements and contracts under JOBS, as described in andSection; 250.12(d).(6) The Tribal grantee must consult with private industry councils andTribal Employment Rights Offices, as appropriate, to identify and obtainadvice on the types of jobs available, or likely to become available, withina reasonable commuting distance from the Tribe's designated service areaor the organization's boundaries. The Tribe or organization must ensurethat JOBS provides training for the types of jobs which are, or are likelyto become, available in or near its designated service area or organization'sboundaries and that resources are not expended on training for jobs thatare not likely to become available. (e) Tribal programs are subject to the requirements of andSection; 250.44but are not subject to the requirements of andSection; 250.45. (1) A Tribal JOBS program must include all the mandatory components atandSection; 250.44 unless the Tribe or organization can provide justificationto show that such activities are inappropriate. A Tribe or organization'sapplication must describe the types of activities and methods of deliveryfor each of the mandatory components. (2) Tribal programs are not subject to the provisions at andSection; 250.45but must include at least one of the following components unless a Tribeor organization can provide justification to show that such activitiesare inappropriate: (i) Group and individual job search, as described in andSection; 250.60;(ii) On-the-job training, as described in andSection; 250.61; (iii) Community work experience program, as described in andSection; 250.63,or a work experience program as approved by the Secretary; (iv) Work supplementation program, as described in andSection; 250.62; (v) Alternative education, training and employment activities which arenot described in andSection; 250.60, andSection; 250.61, andSection; 250.62 orandSection; 250.63, as approved by the Secretary. (A) Innovative approaches with the private sector are encouraged if theyare consistent with the purpose of JOBS to assist AFDC recipients to avoidlong-term dependency. (B) JOBS funds may not be used for public service employment or for allowancesother than for those required for supportive services as described in Part255. (3) Because the amount of the IV-A payment is an integral part of determiningparticipation in work supplementation and community work experience programs,a Tribe or organization may operate these programs only if adequate agreementswith the State IV-A agency are implemented. The agreements should coveroperational procedures and the exchange of information, including grantlevels and child support calculations for community work experience participantsand earnings for work supplementation participants.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 250.95</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Supportive services. </ITAG>(a) The Tribal grantee must provide, pay for, or reimburse necessary supportiveservices (other than child care) pursuant to Part 255, including transportationand other work-related expenses, that the Tribe or organization determinesare necessary to enable an individual to participate in JOBS. (b) The State IV-A agency is responsible for guaranteeing child care forTribal JOBS participants according to the provisions specified under Part255. (c) If the Tribe or organization is using child care funds or servicesprovided by the State pursuant to paragraph (b) of this section, it mustensure, based on a method which is mutually acceptable to the State IV-Aagency and Tribal grantee, that necessary child care is available whenrequiring an individual to participate in its program. (d) If the Tribe or organization does not choose to use State funds orservices for child care, it must provide (without additional title IV-Afunding for child care) these funds or services in order to guarantee necessarychild care when requiring an individual to participate. (e) Once the State has implemented its JOBS program, the Tribe or organization,in order to require an individual to participate, must guarantee necessarychild care either through the State IV-A agency, pursuant to paragraphs(b) and (c) of this section, or directly, pursuant to paragraph (d) ofthis section; but it may not operate an entirely voluntary JOBS program.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 250.96</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Waiver authority. </ITAG>The Secretary may waive any JOBS requirements set forth under titles IV-Aand IV-F that he determines inappropriate for Tribal JOBS programs. (a) The Secretary has determined that certain requirements of the Act areinappropriate for JOBS programs operated by Indian Tribes or Alaska Nativeorganizations. They cover the following provisions or sections of the regulations:(1) Section 250.10 (IV-A agency administration); (2) Section 250.11 (Statewide requirement); (3) Section 250.12 (Coordination and consultation); (4) Section 250.20 (State plan requirements); (5) Section 250.21 (State plan content); (6) Section 250.33 (UP-16 hour rule); (7) Section 250.45 (Optional components); (8) Section 250.70 (a) and (b) (Allocation entitlement); (9) Section 250.71 (b)(2) and (c) (Allotment); (10) Section 250.72 (Maintenance of effort); (11) Section 250.73 (Matching rates); (l2) Section 250.74 (Reduced matching rates including provisions relatingto target groups); (13) Section 250.81 (State data systems); (14) Section 255.1 (c) and (h) (Supportive Services plan requirements);(b) A Tribe or organization may request that the Secretary waive any otherrequirements of the Statute not listed under paragraph (a) of this sectionwith proper justification. The Secretary will consider the appropriatenessof such waivers on a case-by-case basis.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 250.97</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89"> Application requirements and documentation. </ITAG>(a) As a condition of participation in the JOBS program, the designatedTribal agency or department responsible for administering the JOBS programmust: (1) No later than October l, l990, establish and operate a JOBS programunder a JOBS application that has been approved by the Secretary beforeimplementation and meets the requirements of Parts 250 and 255, as appropriate.(2) Submit final documentation for the application to the Secretary forreview and action at least 45 days prior to the anticipated implementationdate. The Tribal grantee may not begin its JOBS program prior to the Secretary'sapproval pursuant to andSection; 250.94(c). (b) The Tribal application must be submitted to the State IV-A agency forcomment at least 30 days prior to submittal to the Secretary. The applicationshall be made available to Tribal members for review and comment at least30 days prior to submittal to the Secretary. Comments received shall beresolved by the Tribe or organization. (c)(1) The Tribal grantee must submit an update of its JOBS applicationto the Secretary for approval at least every two years. The update shallbe considered a new JOBS application and shall be submitted to the Secretaryfor approval at least 90 days prior to beginning of the next biennial period.The Tribal grantee must follow the public  review and comment provisionsin paragraph (b) of this paragraph. (2) The update must consist of: (i) Assurances regarding those parts of the Tribal JOBS application thatremain unchanged; (ii) A description of any changes in program operations including but notlimited to changes in component activities; and (iii) An estimate of the number of persons to be served by the programduring the next biennium. (3)(i) For all Tribal grantees the first biennial update must be submittedby July l, 1992, for the period beginning October l, 1992. (ii) Each approved biennial update shall remain in force until formal actionis taken (i.e. approval or disapproval) by the Secretary on the updatefor the following biennial period. (d) The Tribal grantee shall submit proposed amendments to the approvedapplication as necessary, and they shall be reviewed according to the processdescribed at andSection;andSection; 201.3(f) and 201.3(g). (e) A Tribe or organization that submits an application, an amendment toan existing application, or a biennial update to its application that isnot approvable will be given the opportunity to make revisions before formaldisapproval; upon formal disapproval, a Tribe or organization may requesta hearing pursuant to the process  set forth in andSection; 201.4 and Part213. (f) A Tribal applicant must submit documentation (which is in additionto the information requested in the application) covering the followingitems for the Secretary's review before final approval of the applicationcan be determined: (1) Assurances that the administering Tribal agency will have in effecta JOBS program which meets the requirements of section 402(a)(19) and titleIV-F of the Act, unless waived by the Secretary, and including crossreferencesto all appropriate statutory and regulatory requirements that the JOBSprogram will meet; (2) A description of the administrative process and methods of deliveryfor: (i) Providing program information under andSection; 250.40; (ii) Assessments pursuant to andSection; 250.41; (iii) Agency-participant agreements, if this option is elected; (iv) Case management system (andSection; 250.43), if this option is elected;(3) A description of the mandatory and elected optional component activitiesdescribed under andSection; 250.94(e) and the methods of delivery; (4) A description of the selection and assignment criteria that will beused to refer participants to the various services and activities providedunder the Tribal  JOBS program; (5) A description of the coordination processes with other programs, includingany agreements with the State IV-A agency, Tribal JTPA agency, other employmentand training agencies and educational agencies. Specify how these otheragencies will track and report to the Tribe or organization on satisfactoryparticipation and use of JOBS funds, if applicable; (6) A description of how the administering Tribal agency will determineeligibility for work-related expenses such as clothing or transportationand other supportive services; a listing of the work-related expenses andthe supportive services it will provide to its JOBS participants; the methodsof delivering these supportive services; and (7) A description of the conciliation and hearings procedures which meetthe due process standards specified in proposed andSection; 250.36, includingnotification to the State IV-A agency of formal decisions that a non-exemptTribal member has failed to participate. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 250.98</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Maintenance of effort for Indian Tribes and Alaska Native organizations.</ITAG>Tribal programs are not subject to the requirements in andSection; 250.72but are subject to the following requirements: (a) JOBS funds shall be used only for education, training and employmentactivities that are in addition to those which would otherwise be availableto Tribal AFDC recipients in the absence of such funds. (b) A Tribe or organization may contract for services only to the extentthat such services are not otherwise available to AFDC Tribal recipientson a non-reimbursable basis. Title 45, Chapter II, Code of Federal Regulations is amended by addinga new Part 255 to read as follows: <ITAG tagnum="56">PART 255_CHILD CARE AND OTHER WORK-RELATED SUPPORTIVE SERVICES DURINGPARTICIPATION IN EMPLOYMENT, EDUCATION, AND TRAINING</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="70">Sec. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">255.0 Purpose. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">255.1 State plan requirements. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">255.2 Eligibility. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">255.3 Methods of providing child care and other supportive services.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">255.4 Allowable costs and matching rates. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">255.5 Child care standards. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">255.6 Uniform reporting requirements for child care.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21"><T4>Authority: </T4>Sections 402, 403 and 1102 of the Social Security Actas amended (42 U.S.C. 602, 603 and 1302). </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 255.0</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Purpose. </ITAG>This part contains the regulations pertaining to child care and other supportiveservices for families receiving, and in some cases applying for, AFDC.State IV-A agencies must provide such services, under conditions specifiedbelow, to eligible families to allow participation in employment, educationor training.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 255.1</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">State plan requirements. </ITAG>A State IV-A agency operating a program under title IV-A must submit aSupportive Services plan to the Secretary which includes the following:(a) The methods the State IV-A agency will use to provide child care inaccordance with andSection; 255.3. (b) The dollar amount which the State IV-A agency establishes for limitingthe amount of payment or reimbursement for child care, if the State IV-Aagency elects pursuant to andSection; 255.4(a)(1), to set an amount higherthan the amount of the disregard at andSection; 233.20(a)(11)(i). (c) A description of the types of other supportive services and work-relatedexpenses, including transportation, which will be available to participantsin the JOBS program under Part 250, the monetary limits to be applied toeach type of service or activity, and the basis for determining need foreach type. (d) A description of the priorities to be applied in determining when neededchild care will be guaranteed for accepting or maintaining employment andfor education or training, including JOBS participation; (e) An assurance that procedures are established to ensure that: (1) Child care meets applicable standards of State and local law in accordancewith andSection; 255.5; (2) Child care activities are coordinated in accordance with andSection;255.3(h); and (3) Any entity providing child care allows parental access as requiredunder andSection; 255.4(c)(1). (f) An assessment of the availability of child care services provided ona non-reimbursable basis by Federal, State and local sources other thantitle IV-A. (g) Specification of a State IV-A agency's policies on interim child careand other supportive services as provided in andSection; 255.2(d). (h) Specification of a State IV-A agency's policy on provision of one-timework-related expenses in accordance with andSection; 255.2(g), including:(1) The types of any such expense; and (2) The monetary limits to be applied to such benefits. (i) A description of the methodology used for setting local market ratespursuant to andSection; 255.4(a)(2). Such methodology must address ratesestablished for each type of care (i.e., center, group family day care,family day care, and in-home care) provided. The plan must address variationsin the costs of care for infants, toddlers, preschool and school-age children,whether care is full or part-time, and reduction in the cost of care foradditional children in the same family if such variations exist. The ratesmust be submitted to the Family Support Administration Regional Officeand must be updated periodically, but no less than biennially. (j) A description of how the State will assure that sufficient child carewill be available to meet the participation rates in andSection; 250.74.(k) In States where Tribal entities are directly funded to operate a JOBSprogram, a description of how the State will provide child care servicesfor JOBS participants served by those Tribal entities. (l) An assurance that child care provided or claimed for reimbursementis reasonably related to the hours of participation or employment. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 255.2</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Eligibility. </ITAG>(a) The State IV-A agency must guarantee child care for a dependent childunder age 13, or who is physically or mentally incapable of caring forhimself or herself, as verified by the State consistent with the verificationrequirement at andSection; 250.30(b)(3), (and for a child who would be adependent child except for the receipt of benefits under Supplemental SecurityIncome under title XVI or foster care under title IV-E), to the extentthat such child care is necessary to permit an AFDC eligible family memberto: (1) Accept employment or remain employed; or (2) Participate in an education or training activity (including participationin the JOBS program under Part 250) if the State IV-A agency approves theactivity and periodically (but not less then every three months) determinesthat the individual is satisfactorily participating in the activity. Anapproved activity is one that is consistent with the individual's employabilityplan. (b) The guarantee under paragraph (a) of this section also applies to AmericanIndians and Alaska Natives who are subject to participation requirementsunder Subpart J of Part 250, consistent with the requirement in paragraph(f) of this section. (c) The State IV-A agency must provide, pay for, or reimburse for transportationand other work-related expenses (including other work-related supportiveservices) which it determines are necessary to enable an individual toparticipate as required in the JOBS program under Part 250. (d) The State IV-A agency may provide for child care and other necessarysupportive services for a period of up to two weeks for an individual whois waiting to enter an approved education, training, employment, or JOBScomponent. (e) The State IV-A agency must provide child care and supportive servicesnecessary for applicants to participate in job search pursuant to andSection;250.60 and in other activities to prepare them for participation in theJOBS program, if such participation is required. (f) The State IV-A agency must make child care services available to recipientswho are participating in a JOBS program operated by an Indian Tribe orAlaska Native organization, pursuant to andSection;andSection; 250.94 and 250.95.Child care services, which are also appropriate in meeting any specialneeds of Tribal participants, must be made available on an equitable basis.To the extent it is appropriate, the same range of reimbursement methodsmust be available to Tribal JOBS participants as are available to participantsin the State JOBS program. (g) The State IV-A agency may provide one-time work-related expenses toan applicant or recipient so that she may accept or maintain employment.(h) AFDC applicants and recipients are entitled to hearings under the provisionsof andSection;andSection; 205.10 or 250.36, as appropriate, on issues concerningthe denial of, prompt issuance of, or intended actions to discontinue,terminate, suspend or reduce assistance under this Part. However, changesin the manner of payment are not subject to timely notice requirements,and the provisions of andSection; 205.10(a)(6) regarding aid paid pendinga hearing do not apply. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 255.3</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Methods of providing child care and other supportive services. </ITAG>(a) The State IV-A agency may use any of the following methods for guaranteeingthe availability of child care: (1) Providing the care directly; (2) Arranging the care through providers by use of purchase of servicecontracts or vouchers; (3) Providing cash or vouchers in advance to the caretaker relative inthe family; (4) Reimbursing the caretaker relative in the family; (5) Arranging with other agencies and community volunteer groups for non-reimbursedcare; (6) Using the child care disregard as provided in andSection; 233.20(a)(11)(i);or (7) Adopting such other arrangements as the State IV-A agency deems appropriate.(b) In arranging for child care, the State IV-A agency must take into accountthe individual needs of the child, including the reasonable accessibilityof the care to the child's home and school, or caretakers' place of employmentor training, and the appropriateness of the care to the age and specialneeds of the child. (c) If more than one type of child care is available, e.g., center, groupfamily care, family day care or in-home care, the caretaker relative mustbe provided an opportunity to choose the arrangement. The State IV-A agencymay select the method of payment under paragraph (a) of this section. (d)(1) An individual required to participate under Part 250 may refuseavailable appropriate child care as determined by the State IV-A agency,if she can arrange other child care or can show that such refusal willnot prevent or interfere with participation in approved education or trainingactivities (including JOBS) or employment. (2) The State IV-A agency must establish at least one method by which self-arrangedchild care can be paid. (e)(1) If a State IV-A agency chooses to meet the cost of child care througha method other than use of the child care disregard at andSection; 233.20(a)(11)(i),the State IV-A agency must then determine AFDC eligibility and paymentamount without this disregard, except for families described in paragraph(e)(2) of this section. (2) In the case of a family which was receiving AFDC on October 13, 1988,based on application of the child care disregard at andSection; 233.20(a)(11)(i),if such a family would be disadvantaged as a result of meeting the costof child care other than through the child care disregard, the State isprohibited from choosing such alternate method of payment. (f) For cases subject to retrospective budgeting, for the first and secondmonths of employment, the State IV-A agency may meet the cost of childcare directly or through reimbursement and apply the child care disregardat andSection; 233.20(a)(11)(i) to offset income received in those monthswhen used to determine the amount of the AFDC payment for the correspondingpayment months. The State IV-A agency's payment shall not be counted asincome or resources for any month. Under these circumstances, a State IV-Aagency may not apply the disregard to income used to determine the amountof the payment for the month(s) following the month in which child careceases. (g) The State IV-A agency may assure the availability of necessary transportationand other work-related expenses (including other work-related supportiveservices) through direct provision, or payment, or reimbursement of costsconsistent with its Supportive Services plan. (h) Each State IV-A agency must coordinate its child care activities withexisting early childhood education programs in the State, including HeadStart programs, preschool programs funded under Chapter 1 of the EducationConsolidation and Improvement Act of 1981, and school and nonprofit childcare programs (including community-based organizations receiving fundsdesignated for preschool programs for handicapped children).<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 255.4</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89"> Allowable costs and matching rates. </ITAG>(a) FFP is available for the actual cost of child care up to a statewidelimit established by the State IV-A agency in its State Supportive Servicesplan, but not for more than the applicable local market rate. (1) In setting the statewide limit, the State IV-A agency may choose theamount of the child care disregard at andSection; 233.20(a)(11)(i), or somehigher amount. (2) The applicable local market rates must be determined: (i) Based on representative samples of child care providers; (ii) For areas no larger than political subdivisions; and (iii) Based on the 75th percentile cost of such types of care in the localareas. (3) Local market rates must: (i) Be established for center care, group family care, family day care,and in-home care; (ii) Differentiate among care for infants, toddlers, pre-school and school-agechildren, where applicable; (iii) Differentiate between full-time and part-time care, if applicable;and (iv) Consider reductions in the cost of care for additional children inthe same family.  (b)(1) Except for Puerto Rico, Guam, the Virgin Islands, and American Samoa,in the case of amounts expended for child care, FFP shall be at the Federalmedical assistance (Medicaid) rate and is included in the title IV-A generalprogram entitlement. (2) For Puerto Rico, Guam, the Virgin Islands, and American Samoa, therate is 75 percent and is included in the JOBS limit of entitlement. (c) FFP is available only if: (1) The entity providing the care allows parental access; and (2) The care meets applicable standards of State and local law. (d) In the case of amounts expended for transportation and other work-relatedexpenses and supportive services for eligible individuals, FFP shall beat the rate of 50 percent and is subject to the annual limit of entitlement,pursuant to andSection; 250.73(b)(1). (e) The State IV-A agency is not permitted to provide payment for childcare or any other supportive service or work-related expense as an AFDCspecial need pursuant to andSection; 233.20(a)(2)(v)(B)(2). (f) No Federal matching is available for the recruitment or training ofchild care providers, resource development, or licensing activities. (g) The matching rate for child care administrative  costs under this partis 50 percent and, except for the Puerto Rico, Guam, the Virgin Islands,and American Samoa, the amount is outside the funding limitation for JOBS.(h) The State IV-A agency must take reasonable precautions to guard againstfraud and abuse in the funding of child care costs. (i)(1) Federal matching funds improperly claimed for child care servicesor administration are subject to disallowance under Part 201. If the StateIV-A agency disagrees with the decision to disallow FFP, it can appealunder existing IV-A procedures, including review of the Departmental AppealsBoard in accordance with Part 16 of these regulations. (2) Financial reporting of child care expenditures is generally subjectto the requirements of the existing regulations at andSection; 201.5. (3) Child care expenditures are generally subject to the requirements ofPart 201, including the provisions at andSection; 201.5(e) (regarding theapplicability of most of the requirements of Part 74 to the administrationof grants to States), the provisions at Subpart B (regarding review andaudits), and the provisions of andSection; 201.67 (regarding treatment ofuncashed or cancelled checks).  <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 255.5</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89"> Child care standards. </ITAG>(a) The State IV-A agency must establish procedures to ensure that center-basedchild care will be subject to applicable standards of State and local lawincluding those designed to ensure basic health, safety protection, andfire safety. Such standards must be made available upon request by theSecretary. (b) The State must also endeavor to develop guidelines for family day careif it has not already done so. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 255.6</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Uniform reporting requirements for child care. </ITAG>Each State IV-A agency shall be required to provide such child care informationand data as are determined to be necessary by the Secretary to ensure theeffective implementation of the provisions under this part and Part 250.The uniform reporting requirements include, at a minimum, the average monthlynumber of families served, the types of such families, the amounts expendedwith respect to families assisted, and the length of time for which suchfamilies are assisted. The information and data for these families shallbe separately stated with respect to families who have earnings and thosewho do not, and with respect to families who are receiving aid under theState IV-A plan and those who are not. Title 45, Chapter II, Code of Federal Regulations is amended by addinga new Part 256 to read as follows: <ITAG tagnum="52">PART 256_TRANSITIONAL CHILD CARE </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="70">Sec. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">256.0 Purpose. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">256.1 State plan requirements. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">256.2 Eligibility. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">256.3 Fee requirement. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">256.4 Other provisions.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21"><T4>Authority: </T4>Section 402, 403 and 1102 of the Social Security Actas amended (42 U.S.C. 602, 603 and 1302). </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 256.0</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Purpose. </ITAG>This part contains the regulations pertaining to child care available tofamilies whose eligibility for AFDC assistance has ceased due to increasedhours of, or earnings from, employment or as a result of the loss of incomedisregards due to the expiration of the time limits at andSection; 233.20(a)(11).<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 256.1</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">State plan requirements. </ITAG>(a) The State Supportive Services plan specified under andSection; 255.1must include a description of: (1) The methods the State IV-A agency will use to provide extended childcare; and (2) The sliding fee scale under which families will contribute toward thecost of child care. (b) A State IV-A agency which has not implemented a JOBS program as ofApril 1, 1990 must submit a Supportive Services plan for transitional carewhich includes the provisions described in this part and the provisionsat andSection; 255.1 which apply to transitional child care (i.e., paragraphs(b), (d), (e), (f), (i) and (l)).<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 256.2</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Eligibility. </ITAG>(a) The State IV-A agency must guarantee child care for a child who isunder age 13 or who is physically or mentally incapable of caring for himselfor herself, as verified by the State consistent with the verification requirementat andSection; 250.30(b)(3), and who would be a dependent child, if needy(and for a child who would be a dependent child except for the receiptof benefits under Supplemental Security Income under title XVI or fostercare under title IV-E), to the extent that such care is necessary to permita member of an AFDC family to remain employed. (b) A family is eligible for transitional child care provided the followingconditions are met: (1) The family must have ceased to receive AFDC as a result of increasedhours of, or increased income from, employment or the loss of income disregardsdue to the time limitations at andSection; 233.20(a)(11); (2) The family must have received AFDC in at least three of the six monthsimmediately preceding the first month of ineligibility; and (3) The family must apply for transitional child care benefits in writing.There is no eligibility for benefits prior to the month of application.(c) Eligibility for transitional child care begins with the first monthfor which the family is ineligible for AFDC, for the reasons included inparagraph (b)(1) of this section, and continues for a period of 12 consecutivemonths. Families may begin to receive child care in any month during the12-month eligibility period. (d) The family is not eligible for child care under this part for any remainingportion of the 12-month period if the caretaker relative: (1) Terminates employment without good cause, as defined in andSection; 250.35;or (2) Fails to cooperate with the State IV-A agency in establishing paymentsand enforcing child support obligations, as defined in andSection; 232.12.(e) If the caretaker relative loses a job with good cause, and then findsanother job, the family can qualify for the remaining portion of the 12-montheligibility period. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 256.3</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Fee requirement. </ITAG>(a) The State IV-A agency must require each family receiving transitionalchild care to contribute toward the payment for such care based on thefamily's ability to pay. (b) In accordance with limits established by the Secretary, each StateIV-A agency shall establish a sliding fee scale which will include minimumincome levels at which fees will be assessed, the income levels at whichfull costs will be charged to the family, and the proportional share ofthe costs for families with intermediate levels of income. (c) A State IV-A agency may vary the period of collection for differentfee levels. (d) In cases where the family's contribution under this section is paidto the State IV-A agency, such contribution is subject to the program incomerequirements in Part 74, Subpart F. (e) Individuals who fail to cooperate in paying required fees will, subjectto appropriate notice and hearings requirements, lose eligibility for benefitsunder this part for so long as back fees are owed, unless satisfactoryarrangements are made to make full payment. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 256.4</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Other provisions. </ITAG>(a) The State IV-A agency, in providing transitional child care, must meetthe requirements in andSection;andSection; 255.3 (a), (b), (c), and (f), 255.5,and 255.6, pertaining to the methods of providing child care, child carestandards, disallowances, coordination, services to Indians and AlaskaNatives and uniform reporting requirements. (b) The provisions on child care costs and matching rates at andSection;255.4 shall apply to this part, except in the case of Puerto Rico, Guam,the Virgin Islands, and American Samoa, child care expenditures under thispart are not covered as JOBS expenditures, but as expenditures subjectto the limitation under section 1108 of the Act. (c) The State IV-A agency must notify all families of their potential eligibilityfor transitional child care services under this part in writing, and orallyas appropriate, at the time they become ineligible for AFDC. The notificationmust include information on the steps they must take to establish eligibilityfor benefits and the consequences of failing to apply promptly, i.e., theloss of benefits for any month prior to the month of application. (d) Provision of benefits under this part are subject to the notice andhearings provisions at andSection; 205.10, except that timely notice requirementsdo not apply to changes in the manner of payment.<ITAG tagnum="40">[FR Doc. 89-9267 Filed 4-17-89; 8:45 am]</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="68">BILLING CODE 4150-04-M </ITAG></ITAG></ITAG></TEXT></DOC>